Limitarianism : the case against extreme wealth / Ingrid Robeyns.

Copyright © 2024 by Ingrid Robeyns
All rights reserved. Copying or digitizing this book for storage, display, or distribution in any other medium is strictly prohibited.

For information about permission to reproduce selections from this book, please contact
permissions@astrahouse.com.

Astra House
A Division of Astra Publishing House
astrahouse.com
Library of Congress Cataloging-in-Publication Data
Names: Robeyns, Ingrid, author.


Description: First edition. | [New York] : Astra House, [2024] | Summary: “An original, bold, and convincing argument for a cap
on wealth by the philosopher who coined the term ‘limitarianism’ that invites us to a radical reimagining of our world”—Provided
by publisher.

Identifiers: LCCN 2023034715 | ISBN 9781662601842 (hardcover) | ISBN 9781662601859 (ebook)
Subjects: LCSH: Income distribution. | Limitarianism (Philosophy) | Wealth–Moral and ethical aspects. | Rich people.

Classification: LCC HC79.I5 .R63 2024 | DDC 339.2—dc23/eng/20230908
LC record available at https://lccn.loc.gov/2023034715
First edition
To all activists who are fighting against injustice
Contents
Introduction
  1.  How Much Is Too Much?
  2.  It’s Keeping the Poor in Poverty While Inequality Grows
  3.  It’s Dirty Money
  4.  It’s Undermining Democracy
  5.  It’s Setting the World on Fire
  6.  Nobody Deserves to Be a Multimillionaire
  7.  There’s So Much We Can Do with the Money
  8.  Philanthropy Is Not the Answer
  9.  The Rich Will Benefit, Too
10.  The Road Ahead
Acknowledgments
Notes
Index
About the Author
Introduction
In 2022, Elon Musk, the owner of Tesla and SpaceX, was ranked first in the
billionaires list published by Forbes.

1 At that point, his estimated assets
were worth $219 billion. That sounds like a lot of money. But how much is
it, really? In truth, most of us aren’t really able to grasp how much money
that is, simply because it’s so far outside the parameters of wealth as we
know it. We have no frame of reference. Someone could add or subtract a
zero and we wouldn’t really understand the difference. Perhaps even the
super-rich no longer have a proper grasp of what those numbers actually
stand for, except as a means of comparing themselves with others.

So let’s try to reformulate $219 billion into something that we can
understand. Suppose you work fifty hours a week, between the ages of
twenty and sixty-five—week in, week out; year in, year out. How much
would your hourly wage need to be so that, by the end, you’d have amassed
$219 billion? The answer is $1,871,794 per hour. Almost two million
dollars per hour. Every working hour for forty-five years.

Forbes would be quick to point out that the wealth of billionaires can
shrink significantly in a very short time. After Elon Musk bought Twitter
for a whopping $44 billion in October 2022, Tesla shares lost more than a
third of their value, and Musk’s estimated fortune contracted by nearly 20
percent, dropping to $180 billion. The following spring, the Frenchman
Bernard Arnault (owner of luxury brands such as Louis Vuitton, Christian
Dior and Tiffany) took first place on the Forbes list, his wealth having
grown by $53 billion in 2022, leaving him with a total fortune of $211
billion.

Bernard Arnault, Elon Musk, Jeff Bezos, Bill Gates, and the other
billionaires that top the global rich list might be seen as exceptional. In
some sense they are. Yet dizzying sums of money don’t just belong to those
at the very top: in 2022 there were 2,668 billionaires on the Forbes list, and
together they held $12,700,000,000,000. Do you, like me, see all those
zeros dancing before your eyes? That’s because we don’t know how to take
in that number. Spelled out, it reads: twelve thousand seven hundred billion
dollars. That means that, on average, the value of their assets is $4.75
billion. If we ask the same question again—what’s the equivalent lifetime
hourly wage—we get $40,598 per hour, the equivalent to what many
American families earn in a year.

And this is just the tip of the iceberg. A billion is one thousand million—
but there are many more multimillionaires than billionaires. If you had fifty
million dollars, pounds or euros, you might not be able to buy Twitter or fly
to space, but you’d still have enough to never ever have to worry about
financial security again—and then some.

For a long time, I felt that there was something wrong with an individual
amassing so much money, but I couldn’t properly articulate why. I was
dissatisfied with the broad-brush explanation that “capitalism” was to blame
for growing inequality, as if capitalism could operate like a machine with a
will of its own, without people controlling it. I became intrigued by the
protests of the Occupy movement in 2011 following the 2008 financial
crisis: I couldn’t help but feel that the activists had noticed much earlier
than most academics that something was deeply wrong with the
concentration of wealth in the hands of so few. Although the Occupy
movement faded, it sowed a new and growing awareness of wealth
disparities. “We are the 99 percent,” they declared—making the general
public aware that the remaining 1 percent might be causing problems for us
all.2
So in 2012 I decided to deploy my training in philosophy and economics
to answer the question: can a person be too rich? This meant figuring out
what “too rich” meant, and also looking for reasons why having too much
money might be a bad thing—if they were at all plausible, of course. After
all, it was possible that none of the arguments against wealth accumulation
would be any good. I knew that I could be mistaken—that there might be
nothing wrong with having many millions or even billions in the bank. I
just wanted to find out.

Some of my colleagues—professors in philosophy, economics, and
related disciplines—were initially amused that I wanted to delve into all
this. Some argued that poverty was what mattered, not inequality. A few felt
that focusing on the rich was an indication of envy on my part. This was a
chastening reaction—forming a belief merely based on envy is obviously a
very bad thing to do—and one I would increasingly hear as my research
developed, whether from politicians or people commenting on social media.

I wasn’t alone, however. Across various disciplines, not just my own,
scholars were starting to see that something was happening at the upper
levels of society, and that we ought to pay attention. Philosophers were
beginning to develop new arguments identifying the problems with
inequality. Sociologists had started to study the effects of extreme wealth on
the lives of the super-rich and their children, and to consider how such
wealthy people could justify having so much in an increasingly unequal
world. Economists had begun piecing together the data necessary to
ascertain how the distribution of income and wealth had changed over time.

Their studies showed that while wealth and income inequalities had
decreased in industrialized countries during the first half of the twentieth
century, this general tendency came to an end in the 1980s. In some
countries, wealth and income inequalities had actually started increasing
again, including, notably, the US and the UK. Political economists,
meanwhile, had been finding explanations for rising inequality as they
looked at how the economic system had changed thanks to deliberate
adjustments to the rules that govern markets. From different fields of
research, different pieces of the puzzle were coming together.


As I continued on this journey, it became abundantly clear that the
problems created by extreme wealth weren’t just practical and political;
they were profoundly moral, too. Assessing the legitimacy of inequality,
and of extreme wealth in particular, meant confronting a number of
fundamental philosophical questions. How do we understand ourselves as
human beings? How do we conceptualize our relation to others in society?
What are our responsibilities toward vulnerable people and toward the
provision of public goods? And what should we make of the justifications
given by the extremely wealthy as to why they have so much money and so
much power?
I started to think through the ethics of extreme wealth concentration in a
systematic way, and published some of my findings. This didn’t go
unnoticed in academia, and led other scholars to conduct further research
into these questions. After a decade of analyzing and debating extreme
wealth, I became convinced that we must create a world in which no one is
super-rich—that there must be a cap on the amount of wealth any one
person can have. I call this limitarianism.4
As a concept, limitarianism is simple. But what does it mean in practice?
Are we talking about limiting wealth through political coercion, or through
institutional reform, or is this just a matter of encouraging more charitable
giving? Am I suggesting that the governments should swoop in and
confiscate billionaires’ fortunes? Or are we looking at gradually increasing
progressive tax rates, and clamping down on the enormous tax fraud that is
rampant today? Would limitarianism require us to overhaul our economic
and political rules so that we make societies limitarian from the outset,
before people start to work, sell, save, invest, and buy stuff, ensuring, in
other words, that no one can become super-rich in the first place?
This book will endeavor to answer all these questions. But I should say
up front that limitarianism doesn’t come with a silver bullet or a single
policy that would solve everything. It can best be understood as a regulative
ideal—an outcome to strive for, but which is unlikely to be definitively
achieved, given the way in which the world is currently organized. This is
the case for most of our societal ideals, including the elimination of poverty
(there will always be some people who cannot be reached by povertyreducing strategies) and ending discrimination (since realizing this ideal
would require morally flawless action on the part of all persons and
institutions). Obviously, acknowledging that eliminating poverty and ending
discrimination are regulative ideals doesn’t make them any less important.

The same holds true for limiting individual wealth.

This isn’t to say that societal ideals can never be fully realized—the
eradication of lethal diseases spread by viruses is a case in point.

International health institutions have long tried to eliminate these diseases,
and their track record shows how difficult this is. However, they did
succeed in the case of smallpox—a disease caused by the variola virus,
which killed about three out of every ten people who caught it. After years
of intensive vaccination campaigning in the 1960s and 1970s, smallpox was
declared fully eradicated by the World Health Organization in 1980. Such
successes are rare, though, and in truth the eradication of smallpox is the
exception to the rule that most ideals cannot be definitively achieved. That
doesn’t mean we should give up on trying to achieve them, though. Our
aspiration should be to move closer to realizing our ideals, drawing on the
full range of measures available to us.

In practical terms, limitarianism calls for three kinds of action. First,
there is structural action. Our societies’ key social and economic
institutions should give people genuinely equal opportunities, through
affordable childcare, free high-quality education, and a comprehensive antipoverty strategy. We should also strive to design our economies in such a
way that we end up with an equitable distribution of wealth, and a decent
standard of living for all. In other words, we need policies such as a
guaranteed minimum wage that allows people to live in dignity, affordable,
universal healthcare, and protection of the housing markets against the
distortive effects of speculators and commercial predators. This kind of
structural action limits inequality by strengthening the economic position of
the poor and the middle classes: it means a larger piece of the pie goes to
the poor, and less goes to those who are currently taking the most.

The more structural steps we take to reduce inequality, the less need
there will be for the second strategy: fiscal action. Structural measures such
as those mentioned above will not, on their own, be enough to prevent large
inequalities from emerging, nor to allow all people to lead dignified lives.

The fiscal system, meaning the tax and benefits system, remains
indispensable. If taxation were our only tool for achieving a limitarian
society, the tax rate would need to be set at 100 percent for wealth and
income beyond a certain point (spoiler alert: it is not the only tool). Still, as
I will argue, there is nonetheless a very strong case for imposing a cap on
extreme wealth.

But even with serious structural change and a meaningful tax on extreme
wealth, limitarianism will not be possible without the commitment of each
of us. And so the third kind of action limitarianism calls for is ethical
action: we all need to embrace a limitarian ethos. It may not be possible in
the short run to implement the structural and fiscal measures that
limitarianism requires, given political inertia and the fact that wealthy elites
disproportionally influence our politics. Dominant ideological norms and
interests suggest that there will be significant political resistance to
limitarianism. And there will always be outliers: even in a world with
effective social structures and fiscal rules in place, a person still might find
themselves excessively rich due to some major stroke of good luck. In all
these circumstances, limitarianism gives the super-rich reasons to donate
their excess wealth in ways that reduce suffering and address collective
problems. If a moneyed person agrees with the arguments against extreme
wealth concentration, then they shouldn’t wait to act until society at large
embraces limitarianism. As we will see, there is so much that they could do
in the meantime to move us away from current levels of inequality and
injustice, and in the direction of a fairer world—a world in which no one
can become, or remain, excessively rich.5
Over the years, I’ve encountered a large number of people who don’t think
limitarianism is all that radical a proposal. They’ve been thinking along
these lines for a very long time and are happy to learn that what they
believe now has a name; that the time has finally come for a wider
conversation about the dangers and risks of extreme wealth concentration,
and the opportunities that a wealth cap offers us all. Such reactions have
come from a very diverse set of people. Once, when presenting my research
on limitarianism in New York, a man in the audience who introduced
himself as working for Goldman Sachs told me that he agreed with what I
was proposing. On another occasion, at a talk to local residents in a
Protestant church in the Netherlands, I noticed a priest sitting at the back
nodding in agreement as I unpacked my arguments. Afterward he came up
to me to tell me how much we needed this kind of debate. And I have
received countless emails and letters from individuals who have read my
articles in newspapers or magazines, and just wanted to let me know that
they strongly agreed.

There are, as I will show, many moral, political and practical reasons to
support the intuitions that these people have—reasons that support the case
against extreme wealth; or, to put it another way, the case for limitarianism.

I am hopeful that, if we can have an honest discussion about inequality and
genuinely listen to the arguments for limitarianism, most people will be
convinced.

We should first agree, though, on what constitutes a sound debate. In the
early months of 2023, there was a heated argument in the Dutch and
Belgian media about limitarianism. What happened was entirely
predictable: people who wanted to shut down the debate began to attack
implausible straw man versions of the proposal. In particular, several critics
assumed limitarianism would necessarily imply progressive taxation on
income (rather than on wealth), with a highest tax rate of 100 percent. This
would mean that after someone’s salary reached a certain point, all of the
additional money they earned would be taxed away. They failed to
understand that there are other ways to achieve a limitarian society, but that
hardly seemed to matter to them. Some even went so far as to claim that
limitarianism didn’t consider what would happen to all the extra money
gained through taxation. It was just about making sure the rich were
punished for being rich.

This is a dishonest way to try to stifle a debate on some very urgent and
largely overlooked questions. Can a person be too rich? Does extreme
wealth have negative consequences? And if the answer is yes, a person can
be too rich, and yes, the consequences are dire, then what should be done?
We can surely do better than resorting to caricature and ridicule.

Occasionally, someone will agree that inequality is a bad thing while
also saying that putting a limit on how much we can have is too drastic a
measure. Such a claim is puzzling. How could that be the case? We’re
talking here about two sides of the same coin: limiting inequality from the
top down, and eliminating the harms and waste caused by excessive wealth
concentration. If you want no one to remain in poverty and think that too
much inequality is a bad thing, then it follows that there must be a limit to
how much a person can have. After all, seen in terms of numbers, inequality
is the distance between the bottom and the top. If inequality is ever to be
curbed, then there must be an upper boundary, and that upper boundary
gives us our wealth limit. Of course, there will be disagreement about
where to draw this line. And there will be disagreement over whether and
how it should be enforced. Yet anyone who thinks that inequality is unjust
and undesirable must endorse the imposition of some form of upper limit to
wealth.

So where should the limit lie? Ultimately, this is for each country’s
citizens to decide in a well-regulated political process. In a healthy public
domain, the arguments for limitarianism would be carefully debated, and
that debate would feed into political deliberation on how much is too much.

But if this were all I had to say on the matter, you might understandably be
disappointed, and it wouldn’t really help move the debate forward; it makes
a huge difference, after all, whether you argue for a wealth cap at $5,000 or
at $50 billion. So I’ll come out and say where I think the limit should be,
though I would stress that I’m sharing my views simply as a springboard for
further discussion.

I propose not one but two upper limits. The top limit is political: it is the
limit that our societal structures and fiscal system should enforce. The
second, lower limit is personal—this is where ethics come into play.

At what level should the higher, political limit be set? Some people say
that every billionaire represents a policy failure, and so they would put the
threshold at a billion. There’s a joke circulating on social media that anyone
who becomes a billionaire should be given a trophy congratulating them for
having “won capitalism.” They should have a dog park named after them,
and any additional wealth should be confiscated.

The joke is funny—but a billion is way too much. To calculate the
political limit, we must start by thinking about the context in which it will
be implemented (we’ll cover this in more detail in the next chapter). In a
country with a socio-economic profile similar to the Netherlands, where I
live, we should aim to create a society in which no one has more than €10
million. There shouldn’t be any decamillionaires. This figure, whether in
euros or dollars or pounds, roughly holds for most developed economies,
though it is important to note that, more than the specific amount, the
method for calculating it is what matters. As we’ll see, this method should
allow anyone living in a different socio-economic system to make their own
estimate of where the upper limit should be pitched.

When it comes to calculating the lower, ethical limit, there are—in most
circumstances—very good reasons to set the limit at much less than the
political threshold of ten million. I contend that, for people who live in a
society with a solid collective pension system, the ethical limit will be
around one million pounds, dollars or euros per person. The ethical limit
likewise depends on context and, as I will argue, in some circumstances this
limit will be lower, in others higher. Here, too, what is essential is not the
precise number, but the way we arrive at it. No doubt there will be
disagreement on the level of both thresholds—and some will argue that the
ethical threshold should be much lower than what I have proposed here.

Let’s pause for a moment to consider a handful of objections that some
readers will doubtless have raised by now. The first is: doesn’t limitarianism
mean equal outcomes for everyone, regardless of what they do? The answer
is simply: no. Limitarianism does not advocate strict equality. There are
reasons, based on principle as much as pragmatism, why some degree of
inequality is justified. Some people work much harder than others, take
more risks or assume more responsibility. Some do dangerous or extremely
stressful work, or work that takes a toll on their health. Some work hours
that jeopardize a normal family life. Some need to be constantly on standby.

Others, meanwhile, lead sober lifestyles that generate savings over time.

There are still more reasons why some level of inequality can be justified,
which we’ll touch on later. But nothing can justify limitless inequality. And
this is the most important point with regard to limitarianism.

The second objection is that limiting how much wealth a person can
accrue would require us to give up private property or the market
mechanism, and force us into a USSR-style communism. I find this
objection astonishing in what it reveals about the quality of our public
debate. Such an objection is nonsense, and it’s probably just another attempt
to silence meaningful criticism of the status quo. But since I’ve heard it so
often, I want to say up front: I am not advocating USSR-style communism,
nor any other type of regime that requires the abolition of markets or private
property. Markets are a very powerful tool for securing material welfare;
private property is a cornerstone of our security, autonomy, and prosperity;
both are essential for a functioning society, in conjunction with public
goods and collective resources accessible to all. We would be shooting
ourselves in the foot if we were to get rid of them. The real question, which
we must seek to answer, is rather which constraints on the market and on
private property we need if we are to achieve limitarianism.

The third objection is one we encountered earlier: that discussions which
question the legitimacy of extreme wealth are driven by envy. This is one of
the most common criticisms—faced not just by advocates of limitarianism
but anyone who wants to make taxation more progressive. When Bernie
Sanders and Elizabeth Warren proposed taxes on wealth during the 2020
Democratic Party primaries for the US presidential elections, they were
accused of jealousy. When German politicians discussed a proposal to
introduce a wealth tax in 2019, their critics framed it as eine Neiddebatte
(an envy discourse). When the British deputy prime minister Nick Clegg
suggested in 2012 that there should be a one-time tax on the wealth of
super-rich Britons to combat the economic recession and avoid social
unrest, he was criticized for engaging in a politics of envy. Dutch
conservative and right-wing politicians have even coined a new word—they
speak of jaloesiebelasting (envy tax) every time someone proposes
introducing a tax that will disproportionally affect the very rich. In all these
countries, we see variations on the same theme: if you’re focused on the
rich, you must be jealous.6
The general sentiment, even among some moderate progressives, is that
begrudging the super-rich their wealth is bad. Given all their hard work,
effort, and talent, they deserve it. Criticizing them is in bad taste,
embarrassing, even: it suggests that you don’t have the talent, or the
character to work hard. It’s not only conservatives and right-wing citizens
who frame critiques of excess wealth this way. Barack Obama captured the
sentiment well, when he responded to a journalist’s question about bonuses:
“And I, like most of the American people, don’t begrudge people’s success
or wealth. That’s part of the free-market system.”7
Since this allegation is so pervasive, let me take it seriously and show
why it is flawed. The most straightforward way to refute it is by pointing to
the number of very rich people who advocate political measures to reduce
inequality from the top down. Many multimillionaires and billionaires have
warned that inequalities are becoming too great and that governments must
increase taxes on the richest. In January 2023, about two hundred
multimillionaires signed a letter addressed to the attendees of the World
Economic Forum Annual Meeting in Davos to argue for higher taxation on
the rich. Bill Gates has called for the same on multiple occasions.

Seventeen super-rich people, including George Soros, called upon the 2020
US presidential candidates to introduce a wealth tax. Surely it’s a
contradiction to say that someone who advocates greater taxation on their
own class, and is often actively engaged in giving away their money, is
jealous of the wealth that they and their peers enjoy. That would make no
sense. How could you be jealous of yourself?8
Beyond this, we might also point out that anyone who objects to
limitarianism on this basis is cutting off their nose to spite their face.

Reducing inequality would also reduce the grounds for envy between
people, and thus ultimately reduce envy itself, as the Danish political
theorists David Axelsen and Lasse Nielsen have argued. Axelsen and
Nielsen suggest that people who raise the “envy objection” tend to think
that state policies should not encourage the less fortunate to want what
others have. Instead, less fortunate individuals should focus on their own
projects, and try to improve their own lives. Axelsen and Nielsen point out
that people wouldn’t be so distracted by what others have if inequality was
limited by a cap on how much one can accumulate and spend. There would
be less competition for status goods, and hence less conspicuous
consumption to inspire jealousy in the first place. A limitarian society
would be better for everyone, including for the very rich, because it
eliminates the unending rat race provoked by status goods. If you’re against
envy, then you have very good reason to favor limits on the excessive
consumption that comes with excess wealth.9
There is one final response to the envy objection. Even if a random
individual advocating a wealth cap were to experience some feelings of
jealousy, it doesn’t really matter. What does matter is whether that person
has sound arguments for limiting inequality. As long as they do, we can say
that their jealous feelings are regrettable and sad, but that the limitarian
proposal stands. We should focus on the arguments themselves, and not on
the attitude ascribed to those advancing them. In the end, the envy objection
is best understood as another distraction strategy to prevent us from talking
about the harms associated with excessive wealth, and the case for
limitarianism. So let’s keep our eye on the ball.10
One heartening discovery of the past few years is that there are super-rich
people who have already implemented limitarianism in their own lives. One
British decamillionaire I interviewed had decided that he and his spouse
should not keep more than £2 million for themselves and their children;
they are planning to give all the rest away by 2030. They have enough
money to buy several homes, but have chosen to live in a standard family
home and not spend their money on extravagancies. His reason for giving it
all away was precisely that they didn’t need more in order to be fulfilled:
with £2 million, a British family of four has ample resources for living a
good life, and the rest of the money can be very well used to improve the
lives of the less fortunate.

It’s not just anonymous millionaires who think that there should be a
limit to how much a person should have, though; there are some welldocumented examples of limitarian behavior on a much grander scale.

Charles “Chuck” Feeney, a former billionaire, gave away virtually all of his
wealth after finding himself in midlife with a large fortune, but also a deep
aversion to the conspicuous consumption that he saw around him. He
decided that the best response would be to give the money away before he
died. And that’s exactly what he did: he gave away about $8 billion, the vast
bulk of his fortune, and closed his philanthropic foundation in 2020. At the
age of ninety-one, he is reported to live with his wife in a rented two-
bedroom apartment, having kept about $2 million. His five children do not
expect to inherit a large fortune. They have said that they are grateful that
they have been able to live normal lives.11
More recently, Yvon Chouinard, the founder of the outdoor-apparel
maker Patagonia, decided to transfer ownership of his company to a nonprofit organization, so that its profits could be used to fund action on
climate change, as well as the protection of undeveloped land worldwide.

The company is valued at about $3 billion, generating profits of about $100
million a year. In contrast to Feeney, Chouinard’s decision had less to do
with his own lifestyle, although given that reportedly he doesn’t own a
mobile phone, let alone a computer, it’s unlikely that he’s living
extravagantly. Rather, his decision to give it all away is based on his view
that the raison d’être of the company is to have a positive impact on the
planet. Chouinard may have an unorthodox business vision—putting people
and planet before profits—but he has shown how even successful
multinational companies can embrace a limitarian worldview.


In the end, almost all the super-rich people I interviewed agreed that
inequality was a serious political issue and that governments were letting
the very wealthy off the hook. I sought out these men and women because I
wanted to get a better sense of how they regarded their own fortunes and
how they had experienced the dynamics of wealth. It was illuminating to
hear them talk about the dilemmas they faced around giving their wealth
away. It’s hardly surprising that many wealth holders will try to come up
with ways of justifying their having accrued so much money—after all,
they are human beings just like everyone else, and we all try to defend the
choices we make, with many of us unable or unwilling to confront our own
privileges. Nevertheless, all of the very wealthy people I spoke to had a
keen sense of the problems generated by current levels of inequality. They
were not, for the most part, theorists or academics or writers, yet many of
them echoed the limitarian views and arguments that you will encounter in
this book. It was reassuring to discover that so much of this thinking was
shared by people who belong to the group that stand to lose the most money
from a shift to limitarianism.

Of course, it goes without saying that examples such as these are rare.

There are far more examples of multimillionaires and billionaires who hold
on to their money and give away a few crumbs, at best. Or, even worse,
who give away their money in a manner that makes them even richer, by
creating charitable foundations that serve their own business interests and
enable tax deductions. It is unfortunate that those decamillionaires who feel
entitled to their wealth are not at all keen to talk about it. Based on my
experience in the media—and in researching this book—it is hard to find
anyone who is willing to go on record to defend this position, whether on
stage or on air. The conservative super-rich are particularly averse to
debating the moral limits of wealth inequality in public. In January 2022,
the television channel CBS interviewed me about limitarianism, and then
spoke with the Disney heiress and film producer Abigail Disney about her
political activism to combat increasing inequality. From what I understood,
CBS tried for months to find a very rich person who would go on air to
defend the principle of financial accumulation by the super-wealthy. They
were unable to find anyone. Eventually they were able to bring in Vivek
Ramaswamy, a first-generation American entrepreneur and investor, who
would later become a presidential candidate for the Republican Party. He
shared a not very relevant story about the importance of equal
opportunities. Of course, we’re all for equal opportunities! It’s laudable to
talk about trying to do good for the less fortunate—but the rich have learned
to do so in a way that evades any questions about unequal outcomes.

Because such questions sooner or later end up in an analysis of the societal
structures, political choices, and power differences that have led to those
inequalities. And the richest have nothing to win here. Not surprisingly, the
vast majority of them try to avoid the topic.13
We should continue trying to establish a dialogue with the super-rich,
though, even if some of them are so full of themselves that it is difficult not
to feel put off. It is, understandably, a common trap for progressives to
vilify the extremely wealthy. But I think that, while this is justified in some
individual cases, it is too easy a response. Extreme wealth concentration is,
first and foremost, a structural problem. We should therefore focus above all
else on the structural changes that are needed. We shouldn’t become fixated
on rich individuals per se, unless they are actively hampering the structural
changes that are needed.

We should also remember that the super-rich are a very broad church.

Some of the wealth holders I spoke to are politically organizing to protest
extreme wealth, and arguing for a redistribution of money and power from
the rich to the poor and the middle class. Some are even arguing for an
overhaul of the type of economy we have. It doesn’t do justice to this group
to lump them all together, not to mention that doing so would be
strategically very unwise for anyone who wants to enact real change.

Besides, on an even deeper level it is crucial that we keep lines of
communication open with people with whom we deeply disagree, as long as
all participants are willing to listen and avoid falling back on lies,
deception, or insults (though, admittedly, this requires our media to make
such debates possible, and thus to be free from corporate abuse of power,
which is a problem we will return to). If we condemn the extremely rich
rather than focusing on the wider problem of extreme wealth concentration,
it will make that conversation much more difficult. Exchanging ideas, and
being willing to have one’s point of view challenged or potentially changed,
is what defines us as reflective beings. It is the beating heart of a democratic
society. As Anand Giridharadas argues in his book The Persuaders, if we
want to live in a better world, we must be willing to try to persuade others,
and be open to being persuaded by them. That means that, when challenged,
we should not just shout about our political opinions but rather think about
why we hold them. We have to present our reasoning respectfully to those
around us, since in the end we all have to live alongside our fellow human
beings in each nation, and on this one planet.14
Over ten years ago, I started on a journey to answer the question of
whether there is something wrong with extreme wealth. Along the way, I
worked through a range of arguments, moral, political, and practical,
drawing on the wealth of information amassed by empirical research and
investigative journalism. In the end, I have written this book, which has
evolved into a public act of persuasion. I hope to convince readers that we
would all be better off in a world in which there weren’t any super-rich
people; a world in which the “merely” rich would, after having paid their
taxes, be willing to share more of what they have with those who are less
fortunate. That world wouldn’t just make almost all of us better off—it
would also be a world with much less injustice of all kinds.

Many progressives will find in these pages arguments that support what
they already believe. Most conservatives, neoliberals, and right-wing
libertarians occupy a position in the debate that is much further removed
from mine. Still, I hope that they, too, will be willing to engage. After all,
this concerns their future as well: they, like the rest of us, have much to lose
if we carry on with business as usual.


How Much Is Too Much?
When my eldest child was about twelve years old, we were cycling from
our home in Utrecht to a nearby village. Utrecht is a beautiful old city in the
middle of the Netherlands, with many medieval buildings. It buzzes with
life. As with all cities, it has its challenges, but thanks to many years of
progressive policymaking at the municipal level, the quality of life for its
residents is high. And, as elsewhere in the Netherlands, the biking
infrastructure is excellent, and almost everyone cycles, young and old, rich
and poor alike.

It was a gorgeous day, and we were chatting as we went. When we
reached the outskirts of the city, we passed a bench on which a man was
sleeping. He was unmistakably in a bad way: his clothes were frayed and
badly stained, his shoes worn out, and his face and hands covered in sores.

After we had passed him, my son interrupted me to ask: “Mom, did you see
that?” “Yes,” I said, “that’s a homeless person.” My son was silent for a
second or two, and then he said: “I’m ashamed that as a society we treat
people this way.”
The sight of a homeless person sleeping on a bench or on a piece of
cardboard on the pavement is ubiquitous, albeit much more prevalent in
some places than in others. The worst instances of poverty are usually
visible to all: whether it’s homelessness or other kinds of material
deprivation—think of children who always wear the same clothes to school
and rely on the free lunch they receive there. But vast wealth is often
invisible, by contrast. In fact, in many countries the rich and super-rich
prefer to stay out of sight. They build their mansions behind high fences or
in gated communities, dotted with cameras to keep snoopers at bay. They
dress up in expensive clothes and jewelry when going to events with other
super-rich people, but on the rare occasions that they find themselves in
public places among the rest of us, they often try to blend in. In public,
inequality presents itself as poverty more often than as extreme wealth.

It may sound obvious, but there are two sides to inequality. It can increase
because the poor become poorer. Or it can increase because the rich become
even richer—leaving the middle classes and the poor even further behind. If
inequality increases because the poor become poorer or the middle classes
get squeezed, it is more visible, and it is experienced firsthand by large
numbers of people. We notice when there are more homeless people or
beggars on the street. Food banks won’t hesitate to tell reporters when the
lines start to grow—when there are longer lines of families desperate for
support since their income is no longer enough to meet their essential needs.

If, on the other hand, the very rich become richer, there is nothing much to
see in public, and the daily experience of most of us does not change. Or at
least, not immediately. We can only find out what’s happened by consulting
the annual rich lists, or if the media choose to report on updated wealth
distribution statistics. That is, if they choose to report on these issues at all.

Perhaps this explains why, in the last two decades of the twentieth
century, very few people noticed that inequality had begun to increase. In
many countries there wasn’t a notable rise in poverty for quite a while, and
in some developing countries, especially China, the middle class was
growing. Most economists focused on the latter, celebrating the welcome
effects that the expansion of international trade had had on lowering levels
of extreme poverty in the Global South. The 2008 financial crisis did cause
a visible increase in the number of people who plummeted into destitution.

But the word “crisis” misled the public, suggesting this was a temporary
glitch in a system that in essence was creating higher welfare for all on an
equitable basis.

All of this changed in 2013 with the publication of Le Capital au XXle
siècle, or Capital in the Twenty-First Century, by the French economist
Thomas Piketty. The book landed like a bombshell. Piketty and his
international collaborators had been collecting new data, much of it from
previously unstudied sources such as historical tax records. This confirmed
the widely held view that inequality had decreased in many rich countries
during the period immediately after the Second World War. The war itself
had been a brutal equalizer, since many of the large fortunes of the time had
been destroyed; afterward, there was a united effort to rebuild a society in
which everyone could flourish. Yet Piketty’s analysis also showed that there
was a clear turning point toward the end of the 1970s, and that since then,
inequalities—in income, and even more so in wealth—had been steadily
increasing. Piketty exploded the myth that the high levels of inequality
experienced during feudal times would never return: if we didn’t intervene
politically, he warned, we’d be on our way to a new quasi-feudal era in
which the few would have almost everything, while the many would have
almost nothing at all.1
Unfortunately, he has been proved right. Given the political choices
we’ve made, extreme wealth gets a free pass. And it’s snowballing, making
inequality increasingly difficult to address. In the decade since Piketty’s
book was published, the rich have just kept getting richer: every year, the
Oxfam report on inequality delivers shocking statistics about global wealth
distribution. Take this one: between 2020 and 2022, the top 1 percent
gained twice as much in income and wealth as the remaining 99 percent of
people in the world.2
In order to have a shot at finding a solution to this problem, we need to
come to grips with the nature and scope of extreme wealth. When my son
sees a person on the street, we can talk about why this happens, and what
should be done about it; but we hardly ever—if at all—ask ourselves what,
if any, relation there is between the super-rich person living in the mansion
behind the gates and the homeless person surviving on the street, or the
middle-class parent struggling to pay the rent.3
By looking at statistics and other data, we can pinpoint how much the
best-off individuals in society typically earn and have; how their fortunes
grew over time, and how they earned them in the first place; and, most
importantly, how the 1 percent has increased its riches as a whole. But
before we delve into the numbers, we should find out who these people
actually are. Who are we talking about? What kind of lives do they lead?
Clearly, the super-rich all have a lot of money. We will return to the
question of what “a lot of money” is, but for now, let’s use as a working
definition of “super-rich” someone who has at least $5 million in assets, or
an income that would, over time, allow them to gather such a fortune. Many
earn substantial amounts—the CEOs of large companies often earn $10
million per year or more. Others might have more modest incomes, but
have considerable assets—such as land, or property, or inherited money in
the bank. Sizable capital of this kind means that they can let their wealth
reproduce itself, as the returns on investments and loans for such assets are
much greater than what they would be on the savings of a middle-class
family. An ordinary person with modest savings in the bank typically
receives less than 1 percent interest, but for individuals with large sums and
who can invest over the long term, the returns are generally 5 percent or
higher.

Yet if you look at their lives, how they accumulated their fortunes, what
they do with their wealth, and their views about the legitimacy of that
wealth, the super-rich are very diverse. That doesn’t change the fact that
wealth concentration poses risks to society: in all cases, there are weighty
objections to the size of their fortunes. But the diversity of the super-rich is
nevertheless important. When we turn to the arguments for (or against)
limitarianism, we will see that an awareness of the many sources of wealth
enjoyed by the super-rich helps us identify which of the arguments for
limitarianism applies to each of them (multiple arguments will apply, but
not all arguments will apply to all of them, or not to the same degree). In
addition, if we want to have a political conversation about extreme wealth,
then we must make sure that we don’t fixate on just one specific subgroup
of super-rich people, and generalize our claims. Doing so tends to mean that
the super-rich get glorified or vilified in one fell swoop.

Of course, they do all have one thing in common: what unites them is
having lots of money and, as we will see later, living in a system that
protects that wealth and enables it to accumulate further. But if we want to
find explanations for growing inequality and to understand the
consequences of extreme wealth, then we will need a more complete
picture. So: who are they?
Let’s start with the feel-good success stories. These are the rare
multimillionaires who became super-rich against the odds and are
ostensibly living proof that anybody can “make it.” Take J. K. Rowling,
who wrote her first Harry Potter book while she was a single mother living
on social security benefits. The success of her novels and the subsequent
film franchise made her the best-selling living author in Britain today,
leading her to accumulate a fortune that is estimated to be around £1 billion.

Or think of Oprah Winfrey, who grew up in abject poverty and was
repeatedly sexually abused as a child. Despite those extremely harsh early
years, she built a skyrocketing career in television. It made her one of the
most influential media personalities in America—and turned her into a
billionaire. But we must not get carried away by J. K. Rowling and Oprah
Winfrey’s rags-to-riches tales: yes, some individuals can become affluent
against the odds, but that does not mean everyone who grows up in poverty
or destitution can succeed. Quite the reverse. It is extremely rare that a
hardworking, aspiring, poor or lower-middle-class person becomes a
billionaire. Most can only dream of the exceptional transformations
individuals like J. K. Rowling and Oprah Winfrey have undergone. Despite
these few exceptions that we gladly put in the limelight, the overwhelming
majority of the poor and lower-middle classes will remain poor or middleclass, despite their best efforts.

More common are the “self-made” super-rich businesspeople who grew
up in (upper-) middle-class families. They generally start off without
inherited wealth, and work for a while in modestly paid jobs. At some point,
they set up businesses in favorable markets. When they sell these
companies and retire—usually in their late forties or fifties—they find
themselves with an awful lot of money in their bank accounts. Some of
these firms can become really, really big over time, but there are many selfmade decamillionaires who are not doing absurd things like buying Twitter
or developing space-tourism programs; businessmen and women who still
have their feet firmly on the ground. This was true of several of the
decamillionaires that I interviewed. They spent the first decades of their
lives leading ordinary, middle-class existences, and perhaps that partly
explains why they do not feel comfortable having so much money. Some
are actively seeking to give it away in a thoughtful manner. Others feel a
deeper sense of unease with their wealth, and have joined political
organizations that argue for higher taxes on the very wealthy, such as the
Patriotic Millionaires in the USA and the UK; taxmenow, which operates in
German-speaking Europe; and Millionaires for Humanity, which operates
globally.


Some of these enterprising multimillionaires and billionaires may appear
to be completely self-made—as though, like Oprah, they’ve really come
from nothing. Often, this turns out not to be true, however. They will
usually have had parents who actively stimulated and invested in their
talents; teachers who went the extra mile. Or wealthy family members who
paid for their university tuition so that they weren’t burdened with having to
pay back huge loans when entering the labor market. Or they may have
been the beneficiaries of policies that gave them a head start, or that keep
supporting them even when they are already comfortably off.

Then we have a more ambiguous group of super-rich people who did not
set up a business themselves, but have worked their way up the corporate
ladder. They exemplify and embody success in the game of capitalism.

These are the people who drive the institutions that are shifting major
resources around the globe, producing the goods and services that respond
to consumer demand, and who create financial wealth (though whether they
create welfare for consumers, or well-being for anyone, is another matter;
not all goods that are sold and bought increase our well-being). Take Ben
van Beurden, the CEO of Shell between 2014 and 2022. Among his key
achievements as its CEO over that period, Shell’s corporate website
proclaims, he oversaw a significant improvement in the company’s
financial performance, including a 65 percent increase in adjusted earnings
and a doubling in shareholder distributions. He is clearly very skilled in
conducting business in today’s globalized capitalist world. In March 2019,
there was some debate in the Netherlands about his earnings over the
preceding year, which increased from €8.9 million in 2017 to €20.1 million
in 2018—which amounts to €55,000 a day. Most years, his total earnings at
Shell were more in the range of €5 million to €8 million.5 By Dutch
standards, this is a very large income. Still, if Van Beurden were to look
elsewhere, especially to his peers in the UK and US, he might well consider
this a modest salary. After all, in 2018 the average earnings of a CEO of one
of the 350 largest American companies was $14 million, or $17.2 million,
taking stock options into account.6 There will always be someone who earns
more.

Of course, there is also a sizable group that did nothing to make their
money: the heirs to a fortune. For starters, the royals. Most members of
royal families were born into great wealth and are enjoying substantial
annual incomes. Prince William, who became Prince of Wales upon the
death of Queen Elizabeth II, is now the owner of a duchy worth about £1
billion, with an annual revenue that surpassed £20 million in recent years.7
Monarchs are not alone when it comes to enjoying the privilege of a vast
inheritance, however. More than half of current wealth derives from an
inheritance (or a series of inheritances, as the dynastic super-rich prefer to
see it). The beneficiaries of such inheritances might also have jobs, or they
might not work at all. Some use their inheritances as seed money to start
their own companies. Their wealth is then a combination of inherited wealth
complemented with additional wealth generated from business activities,
but it is important to note that their businesses were, at the very least,
supported by the capital they started out with. Inheritors of large fortunes
can choose any kind of job they like, of course, but interestingly there are
class-specific expectations of what they ought and, especially, ought not to
do. One of my interlocutors, who had interviewed many rich people in the
financial world, mentioned that, in elite circles in Europe, young women are
encouraged to study art history so they can take care of the family’s art
collections while their husbands work in finance.

This isn’t to say there aren’t those who, like Chuck Collins, inherited a
fortune and decided not to keep it. Growing up in suburban Detroit during
the 1960s and 1970s, Collins saw firsthand the vast gap in opportunities that
wealth inequality causes. He did not think it was fair that he was born with
a trust fund, while people living in mobile homes had to worry about being
evicted. He was also repelled by the arguments made by the older members
of his network of wealth holders, who sternly warned young millionaires
not to slaughter the goose that laid the golden eggs. In other words, don’t
touch the capital that has been passed on to you by your parents and
grandparents—let it grow and live off the rent. In 1985, at the age of
twenty-six, Collins gave away his inheritance ($500,000 at the time, which
a journalist estimated would have been over $7 million in 2016). Since
then, he has been involved in various organizations that conduct research
and raise awareness about inequality, and that develop policy proposals to
do something about it. He has also published multiple books on this topic,
including one co-written with Bill Gates Sr. in which they argued against
the repeal of the estate tax, the US equivalent of inheritance tax.8
Collins is not the only heir who felt that they should not keep the money
that they’d been given. In Europe, one of the loudest voices criticizing the
legitimacy of large inheritances is the Austrian-German Marlene Engelhorn.

In 2022, she drew global attention because she declared her discomfort with
the double-digit millions she would inherit from her grandmother. After all,
she had done nothing to deserve this money. She has told journalists that
she will give at least 90 percent of it away, though, ideally, she would want
to be taxed, alongside all other very rich people, since she believes it is not
up to her to decide what it should be spent on.9
Engelhorn’s view is widely shared by the members of Resource
Generation, an American organization that has limitarian principles
enshrined in its mission (though without labeling them as “limitarian”).

Resource Generation started about twenty-five years ago as an informal
network of wealthy younger people who attended philanthropic conferences
and felt a disconnect with the older generation. They were looking for a
community of like-minded individuals. But following a series of political
events that underscored the systemic injustice inherent in American society,
this network developed into a formal organization. The first major turning
point was the financial crisis back in 2008, which saw many ordinary
people’s lives ruined by the unfettered profit-seeking and increasingly risky
choices of financial institutions. Shortly thereafter came the Occupy
movement in 2011. Members of the Resource Generation community joined
the protest in solidarity, carrying signs proclaiming “I am the 1 percent, tax
me.” Resource Generation became a dues-paying organization for the top
10 percent of wealthy Americans aged between eighteen and thirty-five, and
it currently has more than 1,100 members across the US. It encourages its
members to adhere to an average standard of living—a lifestyle that,
ideally, everyone would adopt—and work toward giving all their excess
wealth away. Members are urged to do so in ways that support social-justice
movements and progress toward a society in which there isn’t a privileged
class of people who have too much.10
Last but not least, we must include in this parade of very rich people
those whose wealth is associated with crime, oppression, or exploitation.

Think, for example, of the Russian super-rich, those oligarchs who became
extraordinarily wealthy when they seized formerly state-owned companies
after the USSR imploded. These are the people who have massive yachts
and mansions in London or Berlin, and second citizenship in Malta or other
European countries. Vladimir Putin should probably be included on this list.

In the first half of 2022, the general view was that Elon Musk was the
richest person on the planet, with his net wealth standing at an estimated
$260 billion. Yet in March 2022, when asked in an interview how it felt to
be the richest person on earth, Musk replied that he thought Vladimir Putin
was significantly richer than him. Access to details of Putin’s actual wealth
is to a very large extent firmly barred to anyone wishing to investigate,
whether scholars, journalists, or, indeed, Russian citizens. Some insiders
have estimated that his wealth could be more than $200 billion, though
there is no evidence to back up this figure. Still, from what we know about
how he operates, and given all the accounts of how he extracts money from
Russian oligarchs, that figure is not implausible. Whatever the size, it’s
likely that his wealth is intimately linked to illegitimate financial
transactions.11
These people all come from profoundly different backgrounds, and they all
have different levels of wealth. What unites them is that they all belong to
the 1 percent: they are all extremely wealthy. We’re not just talking about
the rich here—these are the super-rich. And whether they are heirs, captains
of industry, or kleptocratic state leaders, they all have much, much more
than they need, as well as much, much more than they deserve. This group
is pulling away from the rest of us.

It doesn’t get talked about much, but there is a line between “rich” and
“super-rich”—as academic studies have begun to show. Two teams of
academics have done research on the question about whether it is possible
to distinguish the rich from the super-rich. In Britain, a team of scholars led
by the sociologist Abigail Davis recently conducted a qualitative study
using focus groups as its methodology. In this study, six groups, each
consisting of ten people, deliberated over the question of how to distinguish
between different levels of living standards in London. It is one of the most
unequal cities in the world, its population comprising both those living
below the poverty line and those living in great affluence. Interestingly,
there was a large consensus among the participants as to how we should
distinguish between the different categories of living standards.12
At the bottom end of the scale are people who live below the poverty
line (called the “Minimum Income Standard” in Britain), and those living
just at that level. This is followed by three groups, which roughly
correspond to the lower-middle class, the middle class and the rich, and
then, right at the top, the separate category of the super-rich. In the lowermiddle class, people have slightly greater peace of mind than those living
on or below the poverty line. They might have some modest savings, and
enjoy a few inexpensive hobbies. Those in the middle class enjoy greater
levels of security and prospects: they might own a house (albeit with a
mortgage), and be able to afford formal childcare, as well as an occasional
holiday abroad. The rich can afford to buy a house without a mortgage and
possibly own an additional house abroad. They also enjoy more personal
private services (such as a nanny, gardener, or a financial adviser) as well as
owning multiple cars and some significant investments. The super-rich—
high-profile businesspeople, celebrities and entrepreneurs— own multiple
houses, employ a range of support staff, and might perhaps purchase a
private jet or a yacht if they want one.

Many (but not all) of these London-based participants in the study felt
that those they had labeled “super-rich” had much more than they needed to
lead very good lives. Some considered that this was also true of the merely
“rich.” These participants did not all think, however, that having more than
you needed to live well meant that you should not be allowed to keep the
excess money. On this point, the participants’ judgment depended a lot on
how the wealthy and super-rich had accumulated their fortunes, and
whether they were making the world better for others. Participants found it
much less problematic that J. K. Rowling was a billionaire than someone
who was “born with a silver spoon in their mouth.”
The second study was conducted by a team that I brought together at
Utrecht University in 2018. We conducted a poll in which respondents were
asked to label the standard of living that corresponded with particular
situations that we described, such as the kind of home a family of four had,
whether they had a second house, how many cars and what type of cars, the
frequency of their holidays, and their total savings and investments. Our
study showed that almost all respondents (96.5 percent) had no problem in
drawing a line between “rich” and “super-rich.” Where exactly they drew
that line did differ, however. About half of respondents held the view that a
lifestyle that included a fancy villa, a modest second home, two luxury cars,
three holidays a year and €200,000 in savings, was enough to lead a very
good life with some luxuries. Any more than that, and you’d be crossing the
“riches line,” moving into a situation in which you were “super-rich,” with
more than you needed for a high standard of living. Once that family’s
material standard of living was increased to include two luxury cars, five
holidays a year and €1 million in savings or assets, two-thirds of
respondents agreed that the family was super-rich. If their savings and
assets increased to €10 million, then 94 percent of the respondents
considered them super-rich. Our research team then estimated the total
monetary value of each of these lifestyles and corresponding assets. These
findings led us to conclude that 83 percent of respondents would say that
having total wealth above €2.65 million meant a family of four was superrich, rising to 89 percent of respondents if that family had more than €4.15
million.13
Based on this study, we were able to conclude that the overwhelming
majority of residents in the Netherlands believe that you do not need more
than €1 million per person (or €4 million for a family of four) to lead a very
good life indeed. This provides us with one possible way of establishing
what the ethical limitarian threshold should be—not the threshold that
politics should impose, but the one that any altruistic person should use as a
guide for themselves. And the English decamillionaires whom I interviewed
who had decided to give most of their money away essentially came to the
same conclusion: in addition to their house, they kept between £2 million
and £4 million for themselves and their families (which had two or three
kids).

The question of where to draw the line—of how much a person really
needs to lead a very good life—is also increasingly being asked outside
academia. The Patriotic Millionaires, for instance, lobby for higher taxes on
the rich, a livable wage, and equal political representation. To be a member,
you need to be “rich” (or, what on my account, would be “super-rich”); so
where do they draw the line? In the US, the Patriotic Millionaires define
rich as having an income of $1 million or higher and/or assets of $5
million; their sister organization in the UK has adopted the same criteria.

Their proposals for raising taxes are aimed at this group of people. But as
Erica Payne, president and founder of the US Patriotic Millionaires,
stresses, that doesn’t mean that in the US people on a lower income (say,
someone with an income of $250,000) should not also pay higher taxes.

Focusing on the super-rich does not mean that the tax contributions by those
who have a smaller income or assets, but still have much more than they
need to lead a good life, should not be increased.14
We’ve seen several cut-off points between the rich and the super-rich
being suggested here, such as €1 million per person in the Netherlands, or
$5 million per person in America. I know all too well what such numbers
do: everyone gets fixated on a particular figure, but hardly anyone pauses
and asks what it represents. This was precisely what happened when news
of the limitarian project reached Dutch media: newspaper columns and TV
talk shows mulled over the question of whether the figure that was debated
in the press—€2.2 million—was too low. Yes, some might find this a low
number. Is a family of four that has assets worth €2.2 million too rich?
Someone in New York, Tokyo, or Paris reading this might well think it
unreasonably low, since in those cities it’s very likely that lots of families
have assets—particularly property—worth €2.2 million, but still cannot
lead the life of luxury that the super-rich do.15
This is where context matters. In the Netherlands, where the study was
conducted, citizens and permanent residents receive a state-funded basic
pension, which is roughly at the level of the poverty line. In addition, all
employees, whether they work part or full time, accrue a pension via their
employer. For this reason, we excluded pension savings from this study.

Beyond this, even in the most expensive cities in the Netherlands, real
estate prices are not at the level of London or New York. So rather than
focusing on a specific figure, it is much more important to observe that
ordinary people have no trouble distinguishing between a group of rich
people and a group of super-rich people. Similar studies to those we’ve
looked at here could be conducted elsewhere. The goal of these
conversations should be to establish a local consensus of what “having a
standard of living that allows one to flourish” means in a given context.

So where does this leave us? As a general idea, the “riches line”
demarcates the level of personal wealth which, once reached, allows us to
fully flourish. Beyond this point, further increases in wealth will not have a
significant impact on a person’s quality of life. Where, in monetary terms,
the riches line gets drawn depends on the policies and public provisions in
the place where we live. For example, the question of whether high-quality
education is a public good that everyone has access to, or whether it is
considered to be more of a private investment available to the privileged
few, makes a huge difference to how much money you need in order to
move from being “rich” to “super-rich.” In Europe, one year’s tuition fees
for undergraduate studies tends to be in the range of €150 to €3,000 a year.

In England it’s £9,250. In the US, we’re looking at a range of $50,000 to
$65,000—and some private institutions are even more costly. If we think
that being able to go to university should not be a privilege reserved for the
super-rich alone, then the riches line in the US will necessarily be much
higher than in England, and even more so than in continental Europe.

This has important implications: if a society has adequately provided the
goods and services that everyone needs, then families will require much
less money to cover their healthcare, housing, and education. Similarly, if a
society provides the proper financial security that people seek, including
insurance for old age, unemployment, sickness, or disability, then families
will not need to stow away huge amounts for when they retire, or in case
they find themselves unemployed, unwell, or parents to a child with an
impairment or a chronic disease. In a society in which those basic public
goods are provided, and those risks are covered, citizens don’t need to
amass so much private wealth in order to protect themselves against bad
luck. The riches line in these societies—that is, in societies with a properly
functioning welfare state and social-security system—will be much lower.

There is simply no need to hoard money when the social safety net is
working properly.


From what we’ve seen, it is largely uncontroversial to assert that a “riches
line” exists—there is such a thing as “more than enough”—though where
precisely it gets drawn depends on context. Having established this, what
the limitarian project wants all of us to do next is to ask: can we, at some
point, have so much money that it would be immoral to keep it? It holds
that the answer to this question is: yes. At some point we can have too
much.

Limitarianism, then, makes a distinction between three thresholds: the
riches line, the ethical limit, and the political limit. Having three distinct
thresholds slightly complicates the story I want to tell, but these distinctions
are essential.

The riches line is the level at which additional money cannot increase
your standard of living, at least not in any significant way. The studies in
London and Utrecht we saw earlier are primarily investigations into the
riches line, and they show that people can readily identify it. It is,
essentially, descriptive, and doesn’t imply moral judgment: it is based on
the relationship that we can all observe between money and lifestyle.

The ethical limit is the maximum level of money one can own on moral
grounds. Above this ethical limit, we can’t in good conscience justify
keeping the excess money. For some people, the riches line is the same as
the ethical limitarian threshold. They think that they should not hold on to
money that cannot really be used to improve their own welfare, but they
also think that they do not have any moral obligation to give away anything
they have below this level. Taking our cue from the Dutch study of the
riches line, we could then put the ethical limit at €1 million per person.

Others, by contrast, will feel that €1 million is too high, and that, given all
the misery and injustice in the world, the ethical limitarian threshold that we
impose on ourselves should be lower than the riches line. After all, we can
live very good lives well below the riches line, as many people do.

The political limit is the ultimate limit on a person’s wealth that the state
should use as a goal when setting up its social and fiscal systems. Wealth
above this level is, I hold, immoral. Via policies and institutional design,
governments should try to make sure that no one accumulates more money
than this. This does not necessarily translate into a 100 percent tax rate upon
income above the political limit. Ideally, a package of different measures
should together dilute extreme wealth concentration. But this number
shouldn’t be taken as fanciful—it should be as hard a limit as possible.17
As with the riches line, both the political limit and the ethical limit
depend on context—locally and globally. In an ideal world, perhaps we
could all have half a dozen holidays abroad every year, everyone could
choose from multiple attractive jobs or perhaps choose not to work for
money at all, and all of us would be very rich. But that is a fantasy. It is not
our world. Our world is one where ecological resources have been
dramatically depleted. It is one with vast inequalities that are widening at an
alarming rate. It is one in which, every day, people are going to bed hungry
and worrying about problems that they can’t solve, because their causes are
structural.

In this deeply unjust world, I am advocating a political limit of, roughly,
ten million per person (and because I say “roughly,” it doesn’t matter
whether this is in euros, dollars, or pounds; we should focus on the general
principle and remember that we are discussing the order of magnitude, not
the precise figure). Why ten million? The full answer will become clear
over the next eight chapters. But the short answer is this: it strikes a balance
between what different moral and political considerations tell us is the
maximum level. There is the upper limit above which a fortune starts to
become utterly wasteful, since it could be better used to rectify climaterelated injustice and to meet urgent human needs. There is the upper limit
that political equality demands. The upper limit that reflects what we know
about the incentives that inspire very productive people to keep contributing
to the economy. The upper limit that would protect the well-being of the
super-rich themselves—to help them overcome their damaging addiction to
capital accumulation, and give their children a chance of growing up
without the harms caused by their parents’ excessive fortunes. If we work
out an average figure based on the upper thresholds suggested by these
considerations, we arrive at an upper limit of ten million.

Yet at the same time, let us not forget that limitarianism is not about a
number; it is about all the reasons why a world without extreme wealth
concentration would be better for us all.


It’s Keeping the Poor in Poverty While
Inequality Grows
In January 2023, when the global elite were gathering for their annual
meeting in Davos, Oxfam released its annual report on poverty and wealth.

The report documented the rising wealth of the world’s richest individuals
against a backdrop of multiple crises: hunger, the soaring prices of basic
goods and, for the first time in twenty-five years, a rise in global poverty.

Oxfam showed that, while the gains for the bottom 90 percent in the world
were negative or meager, we were witnessing sky-high wealth increases for
the 1 percent, and in particular for billionaires. For every $100 of wealth
created between 2012 and 2021, $54.40 went to the top 1 percent, and $0.70
went to the bottom 50 percent. Between October 2020 and 2022, for every
dollar the bottom 90 percent gained, billionaires received $1.7 million.

Billionaires, they showed, hold more wealth than 50 percent of the world
combined.1
When we step away from individual cases and instead look at overall
trends in rates of poverty and inequality, our intensifying wealth problem
becomes unavoidably clear. Oxfam’s report is full of telling statistics and
figures. In academia, economists have spent decades pulling together the
data that we need to understand where we are today. There is no other way
to discuss inequality and affluence: to understand it, we must conduct a
proper, numbers-led analysis of our situation. What do we see when we
look closely at the changes in poverty rates and inequality?2
Let’s start by looking at the global situation. We might hope that the
recent increase in global poverty is a temporary state of affairs. After all,
economists and statisticians consider the reduction of the number of people
living in extreme poverty around the world as one of the most important
positive developments in recent times. It is true that many indicators of
people’s quality of life have improved a great deal over the last few
decades. The economist Max Roser set up the research center Our World in
Data to analyze these changes, and its results are freely available to the
public. Several widely circulated graphs produced by Our World in Data
document the immense progress humanity has made in combating such
issues as child mortality, extreme poverty, illiteracy, and lack of access to
healthcare and education. According to these graphs, the percentage of
people living in extreme poverty fell from almost 90 percent in 1820 to less
than 10 percent in 2015—a phenomenal drop! Their data also shows that,
since 1800, child and maternal mortality rates have decreased enormously,
and average life expectancy and literacy levels have soared.3
We know that major recessions, financial crises, and other unexpected
disasters generally make global poverty worse. That is precisely what
happened with the Covid-19 pandemic in 2020–22. The number of people
living in extreme poverty rose by an estimated 11 percent—or 70 million
people—in 2020. The World Bank expects that with appropriate
government intervention the reduction of extreme poverty could resume,
but it has spoken of a “stalled recovery” due to weak global growth
prospects and higher food and energy prices. Still, we do not know what the
future will look like. The post-Covid spike in poverty could be just a blip.

So far, the long-term tendency does appear to be one of declining poverty
rates.4
For optimists, these figures are to be celebrated. These optimists include
not only economists, but also many wealthy philanthropists who believe in
the power of entrepreneurship to tackle major social ills. Quite aptly, the
Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation newsletter is called The Optimist, with
the subtitle “Relentless pursuit of an equitable world.” A year before the
start of the pandemic, Bill Gates tweeted one of the Our World in Data
graphs showing the dramatic decline in poverty, adding: “This is one of my
favorite infographics. A lot of people underestimate just how much life has
improved over the last two centuries.”5
But there is another way to look at those numbers.

As Jason Hickel, an economic anthropologist, has argued, the dominant
narrative—that in the past everyone was very poor, and we have greatly
reduced extreme poverty on a global scale—is misleading at best. There is a
counternarrative that urgently needs to be heard—a debate we need to have.

We need to recognize that the picture the Our World in Data graphs give us,
and which is being shared so enthusiastically, is part of a wider effort to
legitimize global capitalism, presenting it as the most effective way to
reduce poverty. So what are the problems here?6
The first problem is that there is simply not enough information to come
to the same conclusion as Our World in Data. With no meaningful data from
before 1981 on global poverty, any claim is based on models and estimates,
in particular on what one might guess people’s incomes would have been.

But those estimates are extremely rough. And, as the economist Robert
Allen has pointed out, if we use better data—data on how much people
spend rather than how much they earn—the “social progress” narrative
breaks down. In India, for example, extreme poverty rates were probably
lower in pre-colonial times; they appear to have doubled during British
colonial rule. Allen suggests that if we want to estimate the number of
people living in extreme poverty in the past, we should analyze the
available data on what people could eat, and how much they spent on
clothing, fuel, rent, and other necessities. Through the lens of such
consumption data, there appears to have been much less poverty in the past
—which puts the “enormous progress” narrative under pressure. So, the
data you use matters a lot, and the most widely circulated data may not be
the most appropriate.

The second problem is that the poverty line used by Our World in Data is
extremely low: $1.90 a day in 2011, in so-called “purchasing-power parity,”
which is an economic technique used to compare monetary value between
countries. If an economist talks about “$1.90 expressed in purchasingpower parity,” they are not referring to what a person could buy with $1.90
in New Delhi or Antananarivo, but rather what basket of goods a person
could buy with around two dollars in the US in 2011. We should let that
sink in. This is not poverty, but extreme poverty. Which also means that, if
we use that as our main indicator of social progress, we are putting the bar
very low indeed.

Many economists insist that the poverty line should be based on what
one could buy with between $7.40 to $15 a day in the US in 2011. Robert
Allen points out that the prevailing threshold of $1.90 a day makes for a
standard of living lower than that of enslaved people in the US in the
nineteenth century. Surely this absurdly low measure of extreme poverty
cannot be the basis of our understanding of social and economic progress?
If we instead set a poverty line of $10 a day, then we find that about twothirds of the world are still living in poverty, rather than just 10 percent.

And remember: we’re talking here about what a person could buy with a
ten-dollar bill in the US in 2011.7
The optimists’ win-win narrative—that standards of living are improving
for everyone, since increasing wealth has created a bigger pie for all of us to
share—works hard to try to make us view these developments in a positive
light; to believe that the global economic development we have seen over
the last two centuries has brought benefits for both rich and poor. We should
acknowledge that this is, broadly speaking, true. But many take this to
imply that the rich and the poor have benefited equally from globalization
and the spread of capitalism. Drawing this conclusion is problematic for a
number of reasons.

The first is that the question we should really be asking is: how were the
gains from globalization distributed? It’s not enough to ask whether we’re
in a win-win situation. We need, rather, to know whether it is a fair win-win
situation, or indeed, if it’s the best of all possible win-win situations.

Another issue is that most of the decline in poverty has come from China,
which is not capitalist in the usual sense of the word, since during the
period in which the number of Chinese people living in poverty fell, the
state was very strongly involved in managing the economy. Beyond this, as
Nobel Prize–winning economist Amartya Sen has been stressing for
decades, when we measure poverty, we should focus on what people can do
and what kind of life they can live, rather than on how much money they
have. We should not look at money, but at indicators of human
development, such as longevity, child-mortality rates, literacy, gender
equality, and so forth. In his joint work with the Belgian-Indian economist
Jean Drèze, Sen has shown that the human-centered economic and social
policies of (often, local) governments are what lift people out of poverty.

For example, the Indian state of Kerala scores much better on those
indicators of human development—and Kerala has implemented policies
that many would classify as “socialist” for decades. As the development
economist Ha-Joon Chang puts it, one of the myths about capitalism is that
free-market policies make poor countries rich. And a final reason to debunk
the win-win narrative is that historical research has shown that, as Piketty
summarized, “slavery and colonialism played a central role in the Western
world’s acquisition of wealth.” Many of global capitalism’s defenders
totally ignore the exploitation of the Global South that took place in
centuries past, but whose effects can still be felt today.


Even if we look only at the last few decades and focus purely on
financial indicators, the win-win narrative still shows cracks. It does not
account for the fact that the rich have taken the lion’s share from the
expansion of the global economy, leaving only scraps for the poor and
middle classes. That disparity is readily visible when we look at the
statistics. In 2016, the economists Christoph Lakner and Branko Milanovic
published a paper in the World Bank Economic Review which contained
another graph that sparked a lot of interest. Nicknamed “the elephant
graph” for its shape, this “growth incidence curve” shows the percentage by
which incomes increased for different groups of the world population
between 1988 and 2008. It reveals that, overall, the poorest 70 percent saw
the greatest increases in income (with the exception of the poorest 5 percent
of the world population, who saw an increase which was smaller than the
global average). People on a median income experienced the greatest
increases of all, about 75 percent on average. The top 20 percent had very
limited increases, with the exception of the top 1 percent, which saw its
income rise by about 65 percent.9
The optimists have used this graph to support their claim that everyone
wins thanks to capitalism, especially the middle classes. But here, too, we
are drawing the wrong conclusions. In 2019, Jason Hickel and Huzaifa
Zoomkawala updated the graph for the thirty-six-year period between 1980
and 2016. Their calculations produced a very similar elephant-shaped
graph, with the biggest gains for the bottom half of the global income
distribution. But as Hickel and Zoomkawala point out, these are gains in
percentages relative to one’s starting position, and if you start with almost
nothing, it is easy to make a huge leap forward in percentage terms. If you
have $1 a day to live on, an improvement to $2 a day is a 100 percent
increase, but you are still very poor. If you have $1,000 a day to live on,
moving to $1,001 a day is a mere 0.1 percent increase. As the authors show,
if we calculate not what the increase in income for each group is in terms of
where they started, but rather how the total increase in world production has
been divided between the different groups, the situation looks staggeringly
different. Then, we see that the absolute change in income for the 90
percent non-rich in the world is modest—the very poorest saw their income
grow by a mere $193. The vast majority of global economic growth has
been claimed by the super-rich, with the 1 percent seeing their annual
income boosted, on average, by $124,897, while the next 9 percent have
enjoyed an average increase of $4,785.10
So while it is true, strictly speaking, that at the macro level all income
groups have gained something from our increasingly globalized economy
since the 1980s—and that is the point that defenders of global capitalism
will stress—it’s not much of a victory for the poor. It’s also important to
note that there was nothing “natural” or inevitable about this outcome: it is
the result of specific choices made by powerful people. Alternative, much
more equitable scenarios were within reach. This has been confirmed by a
2021 study by Jason Hickel, Dylan Sullivan, and Huzaifa Zoomkawala, in
which they quantified the drain of wealth from the Global South through
“unequal exchange” since the 1960s. Unequal exchange occurs when the
prices for work and resources differ systematically between countries or
continents. Wages paid to workers in the Global South are on average onefifth of the level in the Global North. It therefore constitutes “a hidden
transfer of value from South to North.”11
The authors argue that countries in the Global North have put in place a
range of measures that have kept wages and the prices for natural resources
in the Global South artificially low. They have closed borders for labor
migration and often also for agricultural goods, whereas capital was
allowed to flow freely. They have implemented policies that rolled back
labor rights and suppressed the potential power of labor unions. And, as
Noam Chomsky has shown, they have used geopolitical tactics, from the
assassination of leaders in the Global South who tried to improve wages
and set fair prices for resources to the staging of entire coups.12 At the same
time, corporations in the Global North have become so large that they can
set prices for certain goods worldwide—and they have set them very high.

These unequal terms of global trade exchange have led to a loss for the
Global South of $62 trillion in the period 1960–2017. That is equivalent to
97 percent of the Global South’s GDP, or a loss of around $9,951 per
person. In the same period, the economies of the Global North gained $68
trillion, or on average $65,517 per person.13
Here, too, a defender of today’s economy might respond by saying that,
in the end, everyone has gained something from increased global trade.

Sure, but that’s beside the point if we want to know whether, overall, the
outcome has been positive. We should be comparing our situation with an
alternative world of fairer trade—a world where countries could run their
economies according to their preferred model. And if we ask those
questions, we see that the loss for the Global South is huge. The exorbitant
profits that have lined the pockets of the billionaires on the Forbes list
could also have gone to pay workers in the Global South properly for their
sweat and toil. The economic power enjoyed by corporations and
governments of the Global North could have remained in the hands of the
governments of the Global South. Unfortunately, these facts do not register
as relevant among most economists.

The upshot is captured in a striking set of figures from the 2022 Global
Wealth Report released by Credit Suisse, in which the average wealth per
adult is given for different continents or regions, based on figures for 2021.

In that year, average wealth per adult was about $560,000 in North
America, $180,000 in Europe, $77,000 in China, $65,000 in Asia-Pacific,
$28,000 in Latin America, $16,000 in India, and $8,000 in Africa. However,
given the great inequalities between countries, these numbers tell us little
about what most households have, especially in North America, where the
concentration of wealth is particularly pronounced. These numbers only tell
us how vast the inequalities between countries are. From both a moral and a
political standpoint, it is essential to recognize that those numbers could
have been much less unequal, if the gains from trade had been divided
fairly—if those who held the most wealth and power had not used
globalization to grow their own fortunes. And grow they did.14
What about the distribution of the richest people worldwide? Let’s look
at their fortunes in US dollars. In 2021, there were 62.5 million US-dollar
millionaires. The USA is home to by far the largest share of US-dollar
millionaires (39.2 percent), followed by China (9.9 percent) and Japan (5.4
percent). The UK, France, Germany, Canada, and Australia follow (all
between 3 percent and 5 percent). About 264,200 of those millionaires have
more than $50 million—what the financial world calls “ultra-high-networth individuals”—and this group grew by 50 percent in the two years
preceding the 2022 Global Wealth Report. When it comes to these ultra-rich
individuals, the concentration in the USA is even greater (53 percent or
141,140 people), followed by China (32,710 people) and, at some distance,
Germany (9,720 people). Next are Canada, India, Japan, France, Australia,
the UK, and Italy, where the numbers range roughly from 10,000 to 4,000.

The other countries in the top twenty are South Korea, Russia, Switzerland,
Hong Kong, Sweden, Taiwan, Spain, Brazil, Singapore, and the
Netherlands. This list gives us a pretty good sense where in the world we
can find the largest groups of people to whom the political limit (of ten
million dollars, euros, or pounds) would most urgently apply.


While there are millionaires on all continents, then, the global spread of
the super-rich is wildly unequal. Extreme wealth concentration is a
particular issue in the USA, which has about 4.25 percent of the world
population, but 53 percent of the number of people with wealth of over $50
million. Looking at the bigger picture, we can clearly see that extreme
wealth is concentrated in the Global North (USA, Germany, France, UK,
etc.), as well as a limited number of Asian countries (China being foremost
among them).

These numbers are revealing in other ways, too. In absolute terms, there
is a sizable group of super-rich people. Over 62 million of them. While they
may be only a fraction of the world population, this group is more than big
enough to acquire considerable power should they wish to. And, as recent
data has shown, the number of super-rich people is rising fast. If extreme
wealth concentration is a problem, then it is also a growing one.

Clearly, inequality and poverty represent a problem on a global scale. Even
so, public discussions about them—and the measures we should take to
tackle them—tend to focus on developments within individual countries,
since levels of inequality also differ from country to country. As we turn to
look at these inequalities in more detail, we must be careful to distinguish
between income and wealth. An heir to a fortune, an entrepreneur, or an
investor, may have a very modest income, but hundreds of millions in
stocks and shares. By contrast, the lower-middle class includes people who
may have a decent income, but do not own a house or have many savings,
and hence their wealth is trivial.

Income and wealth are experienced differently. The poor generally only
have money in the form of income, while the rich have both income and
wealth. Yet income alone does not allow you to plan for the future; it leads
to a short-term mindset (what will happen if you run out of cash to feed
your family before you receive your next paycheck?). Wealth, on the other
hand, facilitates long-term thinking, helping its owner to plan for and
reduce risks in the future.16 From country to country, we see that the biggest
inequality is in wealth, rather than in income. And from the avalanche of
data on wealth distribution, there are three main conclusions we can draw—
what scientists call “stylized facts,” which hold true in general, though not
necessarily in every particular case.

The first is that wealth inequalities within countries are huge. In affluent
societies, the bottom half of the population receives mere crumbs: a small
percentage of all the wealth gets divvied up among half of the people. If the
distribution of wealth were perfectly equal, this group would hold on to 50
percent of total wealth. In contrast, their wealth ranges between 2 percent
and 10 percent. The next 40 percent of the population—those who are
moderately or fairly well-off—have a share that is roughly in proportion to
their group. The biggest slice goes to the top 10 percent, who tend to hold
50–70 percent of all wealth. In this wealthy group, the top 1 percent stand
out, as they tend to have 20–30 percent of all wealth on their own. But even
within the 1 percent there is a huge difference in wealth between the 0.1
percent (one in every thousand people) and the next 0.9 percent (nine in
every thousand people). In many countries, the 0.1 percent have taken the
largest gains from globalization.

Let’s take the distribution of wealth in the USA. In 2022, the bottom half
of the American population had a 2.8 percent share of national wealth. Their
economic vulnerability is high: one in three families would not be able to
cover an unexpected expense of $400. One in four adults has skipped some
form of dental care because they can’t afford it. Depending on the poverty
measure used, 8–12 percent of Americans live in poverty. With a population
of about 335 million people, we can estimate that there are between 27
million and 40 million Americans officially living in poverty. The next 40
percent had a 28.4 percent share, and the top 10 percent richest households
held 68.9 percent of all wealth. Within those households, there is further
massive inequality, with the top 1 percent on their own holding 32 percent
of total wealth in the USA.17
In most other affluent societies, wealth inequality is less stark, but the
same pattern emerges everywhere: a bottom half that has very little, a
middle percentile that has “a fair share,” and then the top 10 percent, which
owns 50–70 percent of all wealth, with almost half of that again going to
the top 1 percent. The most unequal country in the world is Russia, where
the 1 percent richest citizens own 58.6 percent of all wealth.18
The second important point is that, within many countries, wealth
inequality is not only huge but also increasing. In recent decades, the
bottom 90 percent have lost out while the top 10 percent have gained in
wealth. As Piketty has shown, the general trend for Europe and North
America is that the bottom 50 percent had virtually no wealth until the
Second World War, after which they accumulated up to 10 percent until the
1980s, but have since then seen their wealth decline again. Meanwhile,
wealth at the top has soared. This is even the case in France, which is
generally thought of as one of the more egalitarian countries: the top 1
percent had a 55 percent share of all wealth until the Second World War.

This dropped to less than 20 percent at the beginning of the 1980s, only to
rise again to about 25 percent in 2020. In the US, which has one of the
largest wealth inequalities, nine out of ten inhabitants have seen their share
of wealth contract since 1990. Only the top 10 percent have increased their
share of wealth, from almost 60 percent in 1990 to almost 69 percent now.


I suspect that the enormous impact of these changes cannot be conveyed
by merely looking at the percentages. So let’s look at them in absolute,
monetary terms. In the thirty years between 1990 and 2020, total wealth in
the USA grew from $23.58 trillion to $135.76 trillion—a phenomenal
increase of $112.18 trillion. If those gains had been distributed equally, the
bottom 50 percent of the population would have seen their wealth increase
from $1.72 trillion to $57.81 trillion—but instead they currently hold $4.41
trillion. The top 10 percent, however, saw their wealth increase from $12.86
trillion in 1990 to $92.62 trillion in 2020. Of the $112 trillion wealth
increase over the last thirty years, more than two-thirds—$80 trillion—went
to the American super-rich.

Moreover, these figures look at dollar values without accounting for
inflation, and use a definition of wealth that includes consumer durables,
such as cars and fridges. Adjusting for inflation and taking consumer
durables out of the equation would show us a wealth increase for the top 1
percent from $8.4 trillion in 1989 to $29.5 trillion in 2018, yet a net loss of
$900 billion for the bottom 50 percent.20
Whatever way we look at it, whether in percentages or in absolute
monetary terms, the already very unequal American wealth distribution has
become even more unequal. In other affluent countries, wealth inequality is
less pronounced, but it is nonetheless on the rise.21
The third key point is that this vast and growing wealth inequality has a
gender and race dimension: if you are a man, and if you are white, you are
more likely to be found on the wealthy side of the distribution, while
women and people of color tend to fall below it. The racial aspect to
economic inequality is perhaps most pronounced in countries with a history
of slavery or other forms of racial domination. In the US, Latino and
Hispanic people make up a fifth of the population but have less than 3
percent of all wealth. African-Americans make up almost 14 percent of the
population and have less than 5 percent of all wealth. White people,
unsurprisingly, benefit most from the current division of wealth. Moreover,
the tax system makes this racial inequality worse, since the tax deductions
on wealth are much less relevant for Black and Hispanic families, as, for
example, in the case of the favorable tax treatment of capital gains, or in
subsidies for home-owners.22
Looking to the future, the picture is bleak. In most countries, both wealth
and income inequalities have been rising and are expected to rise even
further, unless citizens and their governments decide to make radically
different choices to those of the last forty years. Whether or not this will be
possible is a hotly debated topic among academics, many of whom
highlight that inequality has grown unacceptably large, and that the power
of the 1 percent has become so great and their influence so outsized that
they can no longer be held to account by governments. We are already
witnessing tensions between those who feel that the unjust economic
settlement should be urgently addressed and those who want to keep things
as they are.

What all these statistics point to, in the end, is an increasing conflict of
interest among different socio-economic groups. We can’t see these
conflicts of interest merely by focusing on successful individuals, or by
obsessing over the latest big story about some tech billionaire. The statistics
reveal what we should really be talking about, something that remains
largely absent from public debate: the relationship between money and
power, and between different socio-economic groups, and the forces that
are driving the ongoing shift in the distribution of wealth. In other words,
we need to talk about class. There are different ways to use the terminology
of class, but we can borrow from quantitative studies of inequality, which,
for rich nations, often divide the population into four groups. There is the
working or disadvantaged class (the poorest 50 percent); the middle class
(the next 40 percent); the rich (the top 10 percent); and the super-rich or
dominant class (the richest 1 percent). Beyond this there is that pocket of
ultra-rich people, the top 0.1 percent. Within the working class, we could
further distinguish the group of the poor or impoverished (who make up 5–
17 percent of the population in rich countries). These categories are also
used for emerging economies, but the relative size of the different groups
will vary. Developing countries have much higher poverty rates (from an
average of about 30 percent in Latin America and East Asia to more than 80
percent in Sub-Saharan Africa), and a much smaller middle class and class
of the rich and super-rich.23
We can’t begin to consider the case against extreme wealth without
talking about class. But this is difficult, since in many societies it is taboo.

Here’s a joke that can be adapted to pretty much anywhere:
Person 1: Do you know how America’s class system works?
Person 2: America has a class system?
Person 1: Yes, that’s how it works.

Most of us don’t notice the workings of class in our societies and in our
lives. That’s not surprising. Such was the success of the civil rights and
emancipation movements of the late 1960s and 1970s, many were led to
believe that everyone had gained equal opportunities. And if we all have
equal opportunities, then surely class no longer matters—right?
Alongside this, the steady decline of unions almost everywhere, and
indeed union-busting in some places, has weakened an important institution
that raises awareness about class differences. More insidious still is the fact
that societies have increasingly developed in such a way that people from
different social classes do not really mingle anymore. Housing, education,
and healthcare are all broadly segregated along class lines, and in Europe,
widespread secularization has meant that one place where people from all
social classes met—the church—is now a place most people no longer visit.

The abolishment of universal draft (although in most countries this was
only for men) has likewise taken away one of the last institutions which
brought together people from across the class divide. Many people have no
proper understanding of the lives and constraints of those in classes other
than their own.

Perhaps as a result of this we tend to underestimate how large
inequalities are. Those who are poor tend to overestimate their position;
those who are rich tend to downplay how much more they have.

Across society at large, there is a widespread lack of opportunity for
discussing economic differences in terms of class. Yes, it’s a taboo, but I
suspect it goes deeper—it’s not just that we have learned not to talk about
class; rather, we seem to have forgotten to think in terms of class. We like to
envision our success in life as being the result of our individual choices, and
tend to overlook external factors such as the development of new
technologies, or conflicts of interest and power differences between
different groups, or relationships between the people who own the
companies we work for and those who run the country.

Not to mention the fact that the terminology of class clashes with one of
the most sacred political principles in many societies—namely, that all
people are equal. No country has made this more explicit than France, with
its national motto—Liberté, Egalité, Fraternité (Liberty, Equality,
Fraternity)—which originated in the French Revolution. Ending the feudal
social and political structures that had dominated since the Middle Ages, the
French, soon followed by other Europeans, decreed that all citizens had to
be equal in their political rights (although this meant, in practice, all French
men). This idea of equality lies at the heart of democracies around the
world: every vote counts equally, and our legal systems protect our equal
standing before the law. But this widespread constitutional and formal
notion that we are all equal has made some of us believe that we are in fact
equal. Unfortunately, the data says something different. We may have
constitutions that declare our equality, but the reality is that we have vastly
unequal opportunities and outcomes in life. And as we will see, this is not
just down to an unequal distribution of talents, nor the different choices we
each make, but because our social contract—the moral and political
principles according to which we organize our societies—does not really
put equality and social justice first. We live by the principles of economic
efficiency, and of “to each according to what they can extract from
others.”24
Of course, there are groups active in society today who do not need to be
convinced that they aren’t treated as equals. Activists in the feminist
movement, the anti-racist movement, the disability movement, the
LGBTQ+ movement, and, in some countries, the movements of Dalits or
indigenous groups, have been fighting to be treated as equals for centuries.

But in the case of class, some like to believe that this is at least one form of
inequality that we have overcome.

There is one group in particular that has a very strong interest in
promoting the belief that class doesn’t exist—the very rich and the superrich. Because if you can make the vast majority of the population believe
that class no longer plays a significant role in their social and political lives,
then there is no need for class struggle, redistribution of wealth, and a
fundamental revision of the social contract.

This helps explain why the rich and super-rich who want to end current
levels of inequality—like Abigail Disney and the members of Resource
Generation—have had to “come out” as class traitors. As Yahya Alazrak,
Resource Generation’s executive director, explained to me,
Society is built around maintaining the class system that we have. In exchange for material
prosperity there is a certain amount of loyalty and allegiance that is asked of us. What we are
asking our members to do is to choose to be in solidarity with poor and working-class people,
which is an act of traitorship to wealthy classes.

When I asked Alazrak whether talking about class in America is difficult,
they confirmed without hesitation: “It’s a taboo! That’s a big part of why we
exist—to change that taboo. One of our strategic goals is to change the
culture to talk more openly about class. And about money, period.”25
So how did we end up here? One remarkable thing the data reveals is that,
in Europe and North America, inequality was significantly lower in the
post-war period—between 1945 and, roughly, 1975. How did we manage to
reverse that trend?
Mainstream economists would typically point to factors that are a part of
economic development: technological advances, the spread of globalization.

These changes reduced the demand for manual labor in high-income
countries, since the work could be done more cheaply in low-wage
countries, or by computer-controlled automated machines. This drop in the
demand for manual labor depressed those workers’ wages and increased the
wage gap with university-educated workers. This would then explain
growing economic inequality. But as Rob Reich, a professor of economics
who served as labor minister under Bill Clinton in the 1990s, points out,
this is only part of the story—and he regrets that he himself believed this
explanation for a long time.26
What this version of the story misses is the takeover, from the 1970s
onward, of our economic and political systems by a fundamentalist market
ideology that posits selfishness as the driving force in economic behavior;
an ideology that has been able to move key actors to make changes that
have hugely benefited the dominant class. Conceived as a deliberate attempt
by certain right-wing ideologues to dominate governance and policymaking, this ideological revolution began gradually and was ultimately
successful. It was most visible in the US under President Ronald Reagan
and the UK under Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher. When Reagan came
to power, he introduced the largest tax cuts in American history. The highest
rate of income tax had dropped from 70 percent to 28 percent by the time he
left office. Reagan and Thatcher both had strong anti-union policies, and
had no qualms about firing workers on strike. In 1981, Reagan fired 11,000
striking air traffic controllers and barred them from ever working again for
the federal government. Similarly, Margaret Thatcher reacted much more
aggressively than her predecessor when miners went on strike in Britain in
1984, eventually breaking the strike and weakening the unions; overall, the
number of British workers covered by collective agreements dropped from
82 percent when Thatcher first came into power to a mere 26 percent in
2018.27 While other European countries did not witness the same tax cuts or
the same attacks on strikers, the economic ideology that is generally
associated with Reagan and Thatcher eventually took hold there and in most
places around the world.28
Prior to this, in the decades that followed the Second World War, there
had been widespread support for the view that most social progress could
be made with a “mixed economy”—an economic system that combines
capitalist markets with government regulation. Guided by the thinking of
the influential English economist John Maynard Keynes, governments
aimed to lift people out of poverty, reduce inequality, and enhance social
mobility through substantial investment in public goods that would benefit
all, such as healthcare and education. Taxation was much higher, and much
more progressive, but people in Europe and North America saw this as a
means of creating a society that was civilized, safe, and fair. And farreaching government intervention, including protection of some industrial
sectors, was considered a proven recipe for developing the economy.

The story that most economics professors will tell is that, in the early
1970s, Keynesian economics lost ground when the world’s developed
economies experienced stagflation—a combination of high unemployment,
slow economic growth (stagnation), and rising prices (inflation). Since
Keynesianism was judged not to have adequate answers for addressing this
problem, the ground was fertile for the sowing of new economic ideas, in
particular a governance paradigm that had been quietly germinating for a
long time: neoliberalism.29
As historians have shown, advocates of neoliberalism started to
influence politics in a significant way from the 1970s onward, but they had
been developing their ideas in transnational networks since the 1930s.

Neoliberalism, like any political and economic ideology, consists of an
ideal, a set of underlying moral assumptions, and a set of practical policy
measures. It starts from the belief that, outside their families, humans are
motivated by selfishness, and that we would all be better off if we arranged
our societies accordingly. It asks us to believe that human beings are not
intrinsically motivated to work hard, and so we should be extensively
monitored and held accountable, even if that leads to huge bureaucracy. It
asks us to believe that, in order to arrange an economy efficiently, we need
to put people in competition with each other. The market readily creates
competition between people seeking profits, but, neoliberalism tells us,
public goods such as education or healthcare should also be based on
models of competition—because the private sector can deliver services and
solve problems much more effectively than the government. And it asks us
to believe that, within this system, individuals should be held fully
responsible for their failures and given sole credit for their success.30
The neoliberal era has had a staggering effect upon our societies and on
the distribution of wealth within them. Perhaps most visibly, neoliberal
politicians have privatized many of the public services that were previously
provided by the state, such as electricity, healthcare, and public transport. In
many European countries, services that were once (partly) funded by the
state but delivered by other parties, such as care and education, have
become subject to severe modes of compliance and accountability. This is
the logical consequence of the neoliberal view that public servants are not
intrinsically motivated, because they are not in competition, not seeking
profit.

But the changes go deeper than this. Neoliberalism has provided the
perfect environment for the super-rich to advance their own interests. As
Noam Chomsky has rightly stressed, the real-life version of neoliberalism
that we have witnessed, especially in the US, can often be better described
as neoliberalism for the poor and working classes, while large corporations
and the rich receive generous state subsidies. Neoliberals have lobbied for
the deregulation of markets, tax cuts for entrepreneurs and the wealthy, and
aggressive geo-politics—all of which benefit those who have the most,
while harming the most vulnerable.

The essential point is this: on both a domestic and a global scale, the
neoliberal mechanisms that have made extreme wealth concentration
possible have also made poverty an enduring trap. This is why inequality
keeps growing, and in some countries is effectively spiralling out of
control.31
There will be two major objections to this conclusion. The first is that our
focus should be on poverty, not inequality—or wealth. Take this statement
by Willem Buiter, an influential economist who held professorships at
various Ivy League universities before becoming Global Chief Economist
with Citibank: “Poverty bothers me. Inequality does not. I just don’t care.”32
Buiter is not the only economist who thinks that questions about equity and
distribution are annoying distractions. Even outside the economics
profession, it is the stance typically taken by many wealthy philanthropists
as well as entrepreneurs and politicians who proclaim that they are striving
for a better world. Let’s try to eliminate poverty, is their rallying cry. That’s
what really matters. Inequality is simply not on their agenda.

Why do we care about poverty? The answer to this question depends on
how we understand the concept. If we understand poverty as a state of
suffering induced by a person’s material living conditions, then poverty
matters intrinsically. It is a state of ill-being that is to be avoided. If we
understand poverty simply as the state of having not enough money (or
consumer goods, in subsistence economies), poverty matters instrumentally,
since the lack of money leads to hunger, stress, social exclusion, and other
negative consequences. If poverty matters instrumentally and not
intrinsically, that doesn’t make it morally irrelevant—there are plenty of
examples of hugely important phenomena that matter instrumentally, such
as having too high a concentration of greenhouse gases in the atmosphere,
or Covid vaccines not being available in all countries.

We can also understand poverty using a so-called “relative poverty”
measure, whereby it is related to what others have in society. This is a
widespread measure used in affluent societies, defined by the Organization
of Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD) as living on less than
half of the median disposable income in a country. The underlying idea here
is that what poverty means relates to what “an average person” living in the
same society can do. This notion of relative poverty builds a dimension of
inequality into the concept of poverty. If the kind of poverty we care about
is a relative notion of poverty, then it follows logically that we also care
about at least some aspects of inequality (though admittedly we’d only care,
in this case, about the income distribution from the poorest up until those on
a median income, and hence what happens to the wealthy and very richest
doesn’t come into the equation).33
Inequality, by contrast, is only ever instrumentally important. In other
words, inequality is bad because it has bad consequences. It produces
differences in social status and thereby creates stigma and undermines
social cohesion. It leads to the abuse of power and domination of the
political process by the elite, which then results in unfair policies that help
the rich more than the poor. It undermines equality of opportunity. It
generates stress and has negative effects on people’s mental health. Anyone
who says that inequality doesn’t matter is thus making a grave mistake.

They might want to make the point that inequality matters instrumentally
rather than intrinsically, but it does not follow that it is not important.34
The question is whether it’s possible to address poverty without tackling
inequality. Perhaps this is the case in some utopian country where
inequality is very limited and policies are not biased in favor of the betteroff. But in most places, tackling poverty will mean tackling inequality. In
Poverty, by America, sociologist Matthew Desmond shows how, in the US,
poverty is consolidated by government policies that give various subsidies
and tax breaks to the rich and super-rich, while policies aimed at the poor
are much less generous. Subsidizing mortgages or savings accounts for
college, offering tax breaks to those who give large donations to colleges—
all these policies are irrelevant for the overwhelming majority of the poor,
but hugely beneficial to those who are better off. And there are further
policy choices that governments make which worsen inequality while
making it harder to alleviate poverty, such as not taxing increases in a
person’s wealth assets (their “capital gains”); or lowering the top rate on
income tax; or tolerating massive tax evasion. All these decisions deprive
governments of money that they could spend on policies to help the poor,
such as universal healthcare, better public education, or improved social
housing. As Desmond rightly points out, “help from the government is a
zero-sum affair”—money given via subsidies to the rich, or no longer
collected from them via tax breaks, cannot be given to those who are worse
off. Obviously, the degree to which the government is “giving to the rich
rather than to the poor” will differ between countries, and the US is a
particularly troubling case. But even in more egalitarian countries,
governments repeatedly make policy choices that help the rich much more
than the poor.


We can thus safely set aside the objection that poverty matters but
inequality does not. Given that refuting this objection is so easy, you might
wonder why those who raise it do so. My hunch is that some people who
hold this view are unable to see its flaws because of their (possibly
subconscious) ideological commitment to neoliberal values. Others might
just have a more pragmatic approach, believing that inequality is a divisive
issue, unlike the more urgent task of lifting the poor out of poverty. Of
course, they are right about the urgency of tackling poverty, but the point
still stands: this can’t be done without also addressing inequality. And then
there are the super-rich philanthropists who care deeply about poverty, but
don’t want to speak about economic injustices, since they might have to
question their own privileged position. Talking about poverty is politically
safe, since it can be done without asking why some have so much and others
so little.

The second objection we need to consider is the so-called trickle-down
effect. This is the idea that, if we allow the rich to become richer through
policies like cutting tax, they will invest their extra capital productively, and
thereby create jobs and improve welfare for all. Their increased wealth will
ultimately trickle down to the poor and the middle classes. It would be in
everyone’s interest, then, to pursue a set of economic policies that favor the
owners of capital (that is, the rich). And so, the argument goes, a short-term
increase in inequality can actually be a good thing, as it will lead to the
creation of a bigger pie and everyone will get a piece. As the former UK
Labour prime minister Tony Blair said in 2001, “If you end up going after
those people who are the most wealthy in society, what you actually end up
doing is in fact not even helping those at the bottom end.”36
As we’ve already seen, this is not how it works out in practice. Empirical
studies have repeatedly confirmed that trickle-down economics is a false
theory. It does not work. Or, as US senator Elizabeth Warren put it: “Wealth
does not trickle down. It trickles up.”37
Trickle-down economics has been discredited among academics for
some time. In a study analyzing all major reductions in taxes on the rich
across eighteen affluent countries in the period 1965–2015, David Hope and
Julian Limberg found that tax cuts for the rich led to higher income
inequality, and did not have a signficant effect on economic growth or
reducing unemployment. Even the International Monetary Fund (IMF)—
which is generally seen to be ideologically aligned with neoliberal
economic theory, given its concern with macro-economic parameters such
as economic growth rather than equity—has come to the conclusion that
wealth from the top does not trickle down.38
But it’s not just that trickle-down economics has been empirically proven
not to be true: there is increasing empirical support for the opposite view,
namely that inequality hurts the economy. As has been shown by Heather
Boushey, former president and CEO of the Washington Center for Equitable
Growth, economic inequality hinders productivity and growth through
various mechanisms. It means that children and teenagers grow up without
the support and opportunities to realize their full economic potential. It
harms social mobility, which in turn hinders innovation. And the stagnation
of wages for all except the rich and super-rich goes hand in hand with
decreasing consumer demand that could otherwise help grow the
economy.


You might think that, given all this evidence, the idea of trickle-down
economics would have disappeared by now. Sadly, this is not the case.

Australian economist John Quiggin was right to classify trickle-down
economics as a “zombie idea”: an idea that has been proven wrong, and
should be dead, but which nevertheless keeps rearing its head from time to
time. Despite all the proof that cutting taxes for the richest does not lead to
universally beneficial economic growth, we keep seeing the idea
reappearing in politics. Most strikingly, Liz Truss, who served as British
prime minister for forty-four days in 2022, proposed trickle-down
economics as a way of responding to the escalating cost of living crisis
caused by the Covid pandemic and the Russian war in Ukraine. She
announced a package of measures aiming to lower the tax rates that apply to
the rich, including a reduction in the highest income tax rate from 45
percent to 40 percent and a reversal of the planned increase in corporation
tax from 19 percent to 25 percent. The financial markets reacted in alarm to
this announcement, prompting the IMF to call upon the UK government to
reconsider. Only a few weeks later, Liz Truss had to resign, and her budget
was seen as the culprit.40
Despite all this, these two objections still have their defenders; you can
find them in the media, politics, and in public discussions even today. Many
of them are employed by think tanks funded by the super-rich. In fact, the
think tank that advised Liz Truss, the Institute of Economic Affairs, has had
a major influence on her successor, the multimillionaire Rishi Sunak, who
has appointed several of this pressure group’s biggest supporters to his
cabinet. Again, I fear that John Quiggin was right when he concluded,
“History shows that, no matter how favorably the well-off are treated, there
will always be arguments to suggest that they should receive even better
treatment.”41

It’s Dirty Money
The data is clear: wealth inequality is increasing, the super-rich harbor
dazzling amounts of money, and they are accumulating it at a faster pace
than anyone else can increase their meager savings—leaving the poor in a
trap. But there are still other weighty reasons why excessive wealth is a
problem.

Let’s start with the most obvious one: the deeply immoral and often also
illegal nature of this wealth. The Londoners who took part in the study of
the riches line all felt that, when it came to the question of whether there
was anything problematic about a person’s wealth, the answer depended on
how that person behaved. Some super-rich people deserved it, they said,
because they were making the world a better place—they were creating
decent jobs, providing goods and services that met people’s needs and
improved their quality of life, inventing various types of useful technologies
or new drugs that helped cure different diseases.1
But is this true? Do the super-rich, on balance, make the world a better
place?
Here’s the thing: almost all of the time, in the process of doing what they
do (and this includes activities that make the world a better place), the
super-rich are also making the world worse. Whether or not they are doing
good, they are also doing something bad—something really bad. They are
causing harm.

Academic discussions about the problem of extreme wealth inequality tend
to ignore wealth that was generated in ways that are harmful. Or wealth that
grew in ways that have adversely affected others. This isn’t surprising, since
it is abundantly clear to almost everyone that any wealth generated by
immoral or illegal processes lacks legitimacy. Political philosophers have
written enough tomes on inequality to fill entire libraries and still think it
quite logical to pass over dirty money, since there is no moral reasoning
needed for us to make up our minds about it: this money is bad. People who
become very rich as a result of amassing dirty money have acted
unethically at best. Some are simply criminals.2
Yet the world of dirty money-making is not hermetically sealed; it
permeates our societies, and harms (and sometimes kills) ordinary citizens.

Dirty fortunes create a lot of collateral damage. They greatly interfere with
our ability to achieve a fairer world. We cannot afford to ignore them any
longer: identifying, containing, and eliminating dirty money might well
have to be our first task if we want to protect ourselves from the damage
caused by wealth concentration. Politicians around the world ought to put
this at the top of their agenda when they meet in the highest democratic
forums—the United Nations, the European Parliament, and so on. We
urgently need international cooperation so that we can close tax havens and
halt other practices that permit the accumulation of dirty money. If the
World Economic Forum is serious about its mission to make the world a
better place, its members should discuss it, too. But they won’t, of course:
they prefer to listen to entrepreneurs talk about how they can solve all our
problems while at the same time making a profit. Or, they might talk about
it once or twice, in order to disprove their critics, but then do nothing about
it. There is little evidence that the super-rich are willing to look at
themselves in the mirror and ask hard questions about whether their money
is tainted. They, along with most politicians, prefer to focus on positive
stories, on public–private partnerships, on addressing issues that don’t
affect them.3
We should remember that there are many different forms that dirty
money can take—and that what counts as “dirty,” in the sense of illegal or
illegitimate, is not a black-and-white issue. While there is some really dark
money that cannot see the light of day because otherwise its owners would
end up in prison, there are many shades of grey here. Dirty money is not
just about violent dictators selling their countries’ valuable resources to
firms who bribe them with millions of dollars. Dirty money also takes
forms that many regard as harmless—that is, money tarnished by everyday
practices that somehow seem, if not innocent, then inevitable, difficult to
weed out. Sometimes these practices are not even considered immoral at all,
at least as long as they have not led to court convictions. As we should have
learned from The Godfather, criminals are very good at legitimizing their
ill-gotten fortunes, and justifying them to themselves.

So let’s start sifting and sorting, and find out which categories of wealthy
people really ought not have become wealthy the way they did, because
their fortunes violate basic moral principles that are endorsed across the
political and ideological spectrum. My aim here is not to give a complete
overview of the illegal or immoral ways in which the rich might have
amassed money. It is rather to show that, for a significant proportion of
super-rich individuals, we do not even have to ask about the negative
consequences of their having so much money—a question reserved for the
next two chapters. They simply should not have had that money in the first
place, full stop.

The first—and perhaps most obvious—group of rich people who have been
sitting on money that cannot morally be said to be theirs are those who have
profited from systematic crimes against humanity. Such bloodstained riches
can be found all over the world, but let us focus on two canonical examples:
the German industrial fortunes that are linked to Nazi atrocities; and the
wealth derived from transatlantic slavery.

It’s widely known that several German business families contributed to
the success of the Nazi regime and profited from the atrocities the Nazis
committed—including the previous owners of BMW, Porsche, and Dr.

Oetker. Not only did industrial tycoons put together the funding for the
Nazis’ election campaign for the fatal elections of March 1933, knowing
that Hitler was planning to end democracy, but they also benefited
materially from Hitler’s regime, including through the use of tens of
thousands of forced or slave laborers in their factories. As part of the Nazis’
goal to “purify” the German population—which would lead them to murder
11 million people, 6 million of them Jewish—they imprisoned Jews,
political dissidents, gays, and Roma and Sinti from all over Europe in
bestial conditions in concentration camps. Men, women, and children were
put to work until, in most cases, they died or were sent to the gas chamber.

This inhumanity did not deter business owners. Close to Auschwitz, in
German-occupied Poland, IG Farben acquired—for little money—land
whose Polish inhabitants had been forcibly evicted by Nazi occupiers. IG
then built a factory where it put to work thousands of prisoners from the
nearby Auschwitz concentration camp.4
German citizens have protested about many of those fortunes that Nazi
collaborators simply held on to after the war, arguing that reparations were
too meager or took too long. The German historian Andreas Wirsching
notes that now, seventy years after the end of the war, there are more and
more German banks and companies commissioning historical research into
their Nazi legacies. He attributes this increased willingness to investigate
the past to a generational shift among company leaders and historians and
archivists, as well as new opportunities for conducting such research thanks
to the unification of Germany. Yet at the same time, Wirsching also detects
a strong note of commercial self-interest, since such research is effectively a
seal of approval, or certificate, that states: “National Socialism and its
consequences have been evaluated and dealt with.” He adds: “What the
actual results are is almost secondary (to exaggerate slightly).” And yet,
some present-day German billionaires still prefer not to give too much
attention to the roles played in the war by their forefathers. In his recent
book Nazi Billionaires: The Dark History of Germany’s Wealthiest
Dynasties, journalist David de Jong stresses the need for the contemporary
heirs of rich Nazi supporters to be transparent about the fact that the wealth
they inherited is tainted by their ancestors’ collaboration in genocide and
war crimes.5
If the historic owners of those businesses had done the right thing, it is
highly unlikely that their companies would have become so wealthy—or
even exist at all today. The super-rich in Germany and neighboring
countries—and anyone who has inherited money from businesspeople and
companies that flourished during the Third Reich—should all ask
themselves to what extent the money they have today is the fruit of
collaboration with the Nazi regime. This should be more than just some PR
operation. It is a moral imperative if you want to have a clean conscience.

Much the same goes for the second case, which has produced the wealth
of many people alive today: slavery. This is especially important in the US,
though fortunes generated by the transatlantic slave trade proliferate across
the UK, Portugal, Spain, France, and the Netherlands. In America today,
racial inequality in the possession of wealth is directly related to the
systematic exploitation of Black people for the profit of white slave-owners.

Just before abolition, in around 1860, about four million enslaved men,
women, and children were living and working on American soil. It has been
calculated that those people lost out on an estimated $20.3 trillion in wages
for their work. That means, quite simply, that all American families and
institutions who have slave-owners among their ancestors, and have
inherited anything of value from them, would have had less, had the
enslaved not been robbed of their liberty and proper compensation for their
work. And, conversely, present-day African Americans would have
significantly more wealth, in contrast to the meager 4.5 percent of total
private wealth currently shared among Black Americans, while they make
up 13.6 percent of the US population.6
It is hard to object to the claim that wealth holders are not morally
entitled (and, in a just world, would not be legally entitled) to the portion of
their wealth that is based on historical crimes against humanity. They
should not have that money, regardless of whether they were directly
involved in those wrongs, or whether it was their ancestors’ doing. You
might rightly point out that this principle applies as much to the middle
classes as it does to the rich and super-rich. That’s true, and to the extent
that wealth is based on wrongdoing, it should be returned to those from
whom it was taken, or otherwise given over to restore the harm done—
independently of whether its owner is extremely rich or merely well-off. No
one is entitled to keep the profits of historic crimes.

There are, increasingly, examples of such reparations being attempted. In
2016, the University of Glasgow recognized that, in the eighteenth and
nineteenth centuries, it had accepted gifts and bequests from people who
profited from slavery. In September 2018, upon the publication of a study
that documented these findings, the university announced that it would
develop a set of initiatives to acknowledge this part of the university’s past,
as well as to fund a range of intellectual activities advancing the study of
slavery and its history. In 2019, it signed an agreement with the University
of the West Indies in Jamaica to collaborate on these matters, and pledged
£20 million to fund activities relating to restorative justice. One of the
results of this collaboration is a Masters Programme in Reparatory Justice,
in partnership with UWI.7
But, as has been stressed by Olivette Otele, Distinguished Research
Professor of the Legacies and Memory of Slavery at SOAS in London,
restorative justice for slavery is not merely a matter of financial
compensation. It is crucially important that the relationship between the
injustices of slavery and present-day inequalities are understood, and that
the descendants of the enslaved determine the agenda of reparations. Otele
points out that restorative justice ultimately needs to take place at the
national level, which is what the Netherlands did when, in December 2022,
the government apologized for the country’s role in slavery and established
a fund to raise awareness and address its present-day effects. In other
countries, too, there are calls for the state to engage in reparations. For
example, in 1825, as the price for gaining independence from France, Haiti
was forced to take on a large debt with the French state, who wanted to
indemnify the former slave-owners. For decades, the Haitian government
has been asking France for a reimbursement of those debt payments, which
would indeed restore a historical injustice.8
The range of examples that Otele gives of institutions that have
successfully undertaken restorative-justice projects—such as the American
universities of Brown and Harvard, and the British company Greene King
—show that any organization can take important steps toward making
reparations. Even families can do this, as the British Trevelyan family
showed when in 2023 they made a public apology for the 1,000 people that
their ancestors had enslaved on the island of Grenada, and set up a
community fund for economic development of the island. Think what
would happen if all the descendants of those who profited from slavery,
including the British and Dutch royal families and many American
inherited-wealth dynasties, were to do something similar. Can you imagine
what a huge shift of money and power that would represent?9
A second major group of super-rich people who become wealthy immorally
—and who clearly should not be allowed to keep that money—are
kleptocrats and officials engaging in corruption. Kleptocracy literally means
“rule by thieves” (from the Greek kleptes, “thief,” and kratia, “power” or
“rule”)—we’re talking here about heads of state and political leaders who
loot their own countries. Take, for example, Teodoro Nguema Obiang
Mangue, vice president of Equatorial Guinea and son of Theodore Obiang,
its president. Despite the fact that in the 1990s the country started to sell oil,
the majority of its population has not seen any improvement in living
standards; most are still living in dire poverty. This hasn’t prevented the
vice president from indulging in a jet-setting lifestyle, though. In the period
from 2004 to 2011, he reportedly bought an $80-million mansion in Paris,
another one for $30 million in California, and another for $15 million in
São Paulo, a $38.5-million Gulfstream jet, two yachts, fourteen luxury cars,
$44 million in fine art, and much more besides. At auction, he spent
$275,000 on the crystal-covered glove that Michael Jackson wore on his
1987–8 tour. Recent changes in international rules have led to the
confiscation of some of his properties in Europe. But there is no sign of the
president and his family losing their iron grip on the country, or their
enjoyment of vast, unearned riches. In November 2022, President Obiang
was re-elected in what everyone except his own clan recognizes as
fraudulent elections.10
Most kleptocrats operating today are the authoritarian rulers of countries
where the majority of people are living in extreme poverty, such as Gabon
and Congo-Brazzaville. Citizens of those countries do not enjoy the fruits
of the oil, diamonds, or other raw resources that could make them all
prosper. Instead, these revenues line the pockets of politicians and their
friends, as well as the multinationals with whom they collaborate. But it’s
not just the multinationals of the Global North who are implicated here: as
the philosopher Leif Wenar has argued in his book Blood Oil, consumers of
that oil are also complicit. We all choose to accept that oil gets sold by those
able to gain control over it, rather than supporting the principle of resource
sovereignty (whereby resources belong to all the people in a given territory,
and thus the oil is the property of all, a common resource). Once we start
looking at global trade in more detail, there are so many ways in which
citizens worldwide, but especially those with the money to consume, are
complicit in rights-violating practices.11
Things become even worse when kleptocratic regimes turn to state
violence, torture, and other human-rights abuses as a method for
maintaining power. Kleptocrats seek political power in order to enrich
themselves, and then use that wealth to stay in power, which creates a
vicious circle. They commit fraud in elections, jail opponents or let them be
murdered, crush independent media, and terrorize voters. Corruption is a
standard part of their modus operandi—corruption that is much more
vicious, violent, and endemic than the corruption common in modern
democracies. Kleptocrats are not rulers that try to advance the interests of
the people, but instead they advance their own interests, that of their family
members, and a few other people that are instrumentally important to them.

Once they have control of their country’s wealth and political power, they
do their utmost to keep it.12
Many of us will think that it is a total no-brainer that these dictators
should not have the money that they do. Mobutu Sese Seko, longtime
dictator of Zaïre, should not have seized a personal budget larger than his
government’s combined spending on healthcare, education, and welfare.13 It
was equally outrageous that Imelda Marcos, former First Lady of the
Philippines, owned more than a thousand pairs of shoes, when so many
Filipinos were living in poverty under her husband’s regime.

Yet while there are an increasing number of people and organizations
now outraged at such abuses, this was not always a widespread reaction. As
we know from the research of Jason Sharman, professor of international
relations at Cambridge University, only since the beginning of this century
has there been a change in the global norm around extreme corruption and
corresponding rules. While previously kleptocracy was taken as a given,
and was often even facilitated by other countries, including those engaging
in handing out development aid, there are now international legal
agreements making it a crime for countries to “host” money stolen by the
officials of another state. However, in Sharman’s assessment, many
governments are failing to abide by those rules. Some are merely paying lip
service to this new consensus. But even those who are genuinely committed
to halting kleptocracy are restricted in their ability to do so.

Those of us living in rich democratic countries should be careful not to
understand kleptocracy as a problem that only plagues poor, developing
nations. Grand corruption by state officials is a problem from which no
country is immune. It also occurs among high-level officials in North
America and Europe and in advanced Asian economies such as South Korea
and Japan. An important difference, of course, is that the impact on the
welfare of a country’s citizens is less devastating. While widespread
corruption in a developed economy leads primarily to a larger budget
deficit, in poorer nations it means that citizens must continue to live without
running water or adequate food supplies. Even so, state corruption
anywhere is a dangerous and corrosive force—as two European examples
show.

Let’s look first at the case of Vladimir Putin and his cronies. The account
given by scholars of Russian politics is grim. Since Putin rose to power in
1999, he has been using kleptocratic techniques to build power, as well as
to enrich himself and a close circle of confidants. Corruption is rampant:
stealing from the state budget, extorting funding from private companies,
even seizing companies outright. Russians who want to belong to the
political elite will become embroiled in corruption, and this makes them
loyal to Putin. If a collaborator of the regime does not follow the Kremlin
line, they will be tried for corruption and jailed. Corruption is thus not only
used to acquire vast fortunes for Putin and his friends, but also to ensure
that all those involved remain pliable. Once they have profited from Putin’s
regime, his super-rich cronies often move abroad. Many have invested their
vast wealth in real estate in Europe’s capitals, where they enjoy the
advantages of living in a genuine democracy, with all the protections that
the rule of law brings for its inhabitants. They are no longer invested in
developing Russia for the benefit of all Russians. Nor will they even speak
up on their fellow Russians’ behalf, given how unsafe it is for them to do
so: there are an astonishing number of collaborators-turned-critics who die
extremely suspicious deaths, from unexplained falls from windows to
radioactive poisonings. Independent journalists are not safe either; many
who engage in critical reporting have been killed. In 2004, the editor of the
Russian edition of Forbes was shot dead a few weeks after the magazine
published a list of the hundred richest Russians. On October 7, 2006,
Vladimir Putin’s birthday, the journalist Anna Politkovskaya, a fierce critic
of the regime, was murdered in the stairwell of her apartment.14
The damage caused by Putin’s kleptocratic regime is not limited to
Russian citizens. Putin has also been putting his vast financial fortune to
geopolitical ends, in particular through buying the support of international
allies. His political party, United Russia, has made large donations to rightwing political parties in many other countries. Since this is in most cases
illegal, such transactions often have to take place via loopholes in the law.

For example, in 2018 the Italian right-wing party the Lega (League)
reportedly received €65 million from Moscow, which was channeled via an
intermediary organization so as to stay within Italian rules on political
donations. A higher campaign budget tends to positively influence election
results, and, while a causal relation is impossible to prove, in the first
elections after they received the donations (which were elections for the
European Parliament), the Lega became the biggest party in Italy. That must
have suited Putin nicely, as the Lega has been a vocal defender of Russian
interests at the European level ever since. This pro-Russian advocacy has
included arguing for an end to the EU sanctions that were imposed on
Russia after its annexation of Ukraine’s Crimean Peninsula in 2014.

Clearly, one problem with such corrupt funding is a lack of
accountability, because the parties involved will do all they can to make
sure that the money cannot be traced. Even if all the evidence points toward
Russian financial support for far-right and conservative parties, there is
rarely hard evidence. Such is the case with the Dutch extreme-right party
Forum voor Democratie (Forum for Democracy), whose leader has
staunchly defended Putin in all circumstances, including when he went to
war in Ukraine in 2022. No solid proof has been uncovered to show that the
party has received money from the Kremlin—but that’s hardly surprising.

We don’t always know how kleptocrats buy the allegiance of collaborators
abroad.15
But corruption isn’t just a Russian problem. Elsewhere in Europe, state
corruption causes problems, as the Italian example clearly shows. In Italy,
kleptocratic practices are undeniably of a different scale to those in Russia,
given that it is a democracy with multiple parties for whom citizens can
freely vote. Yet corruption has been endemic in Italian politics and society
for a very long time. The infamous case of Silvio Berlusconi shows how
problematic this set of widely shared societal habits can become if a superrich person who already has great influence in other sectors (in his case, the
economy and the media) assumes political power. Berlusconi served as
prime minister in four governments between 1994 and 2011. He was
already a billionaire businessman when he first took office. Italian political
scientists have argued that during his tenure the government took many
corruption-enhancing measures; while Berlusconi himself was directly
accused of bribery, false accounting, collusion, tax evasion, corruption, and
fraud, as well as paying for sex with a seventeen-year-old girl. Given his
ownership of a media empire, he was also accused of having major conflicts
of interest. Some of the cases against Berlusconi were dropped because of
statutes of limitations, and only in one was he convicted of tax fraud. He
received a four-year prison sentence in 2013, reduced to one year, and,
because of his age (seventy-six at the time), did a year of unpaid
community service instead. He was also banned from political office, but
after that ban ended was elected for the European Parliament and, in 2022,
for the Italian senate.16
Putin’s Russia and Berlusconi’s Italy are two particularly memorable
examples, but we would be prudent not to assume that widespread state
corruption only happens somewhere else—just think of the UK’s
“chumocracy” scandal in 2020 or of Donald Trump’s attempt to rig the
2020 presidential election in the US. All these cases are instructive,
revealing what is needed to fight against kleptocracy: a clear separation of
powers within a government, with a truly independent judiciary;
autonomous, impartial and independent mass media who do not have to fear
speaking out; financial transparency so that we know who owns what; and
careful oversight of other democratic institutions, such as electoral systems.

We must protect these instruments against the encroachment of billionaires
and multimillionaires, who have—again and again—tried to take the
kleptocratic route for accumulating wealth and power, doing what they can
to weaken our democratic institutions. Unfortunately, much of the time they
succeed.

Of course, war crime and state corruption aren’t the only ways that the
super-rich amass fortunes while damaging the lives of fellow citizens.

Another form of dirty money is gained by business practices that
deliberately cause customers harm.

Take the Sackler family. The Sacklers own Purdue Pharma, a company
that sells OxyContin, an opioid painkiller. In the late 1990s, the company
started an aggressive and misleading marketing campaign for OxyContin
among primary-care physicians, or general practitioners. In the six years
following its approval by the Food and Drug Administration, Purdue
Pharma deliberately misled doctors by promoting OxyContin as a drug that
was less addictive than other pain medications, knowing this to be untrue.

Another element of its deceitful marketing strategy was to intentionally
target general practitioners rather than medical specialists, aware that GPs
have less training on medical issues around addiction and opioids. Purdue
Pharma’s marketers also distributed fake scientific charts to these doctors to
support their bogus claims.17
When GPs started to prescribe OxyContin on a larger scale, sales
exploded, reaching a level far above what would have been possible if they
had been limited to prescriptions issued by specialists. By 2015, the annual
sales of OxyContin came close to $3 billion, while Forbes estimated the
Sackler family’s wealth to be at $14 billion.18 The Sacklers became active in
philanthropy, in particular giving to major art museums in the UK and
USA.

Yet with the unfolding of the opioid crisis, which involved several
pharmaceutical companies and saw an estimated 500,000 deaths in the US,
the Sackler family and Purdue Pharma increasingly came under fire. By
2020, all fifty states had filed lawsuits against Purdue and Sackler family
members for their role in the opioid crisis, and Purdue Pharma filed for
bankruptcy. In October 2020, Purdue Pharma pleaded guilty to criminal
charges concerning the misleading marketing of OxyContin. By March
2022, the Sackler family members reached an agreement to pay as much as
$6 billion in return for liability protection against all current and future civil
claims in this case, and $750 million of the $6 billion has been set aside to
compensate the more than 100,000 victims and their relatives. Yet that is a
very little comfort for families who, in a matter of months, saw their loved
ones become addicted and die—including young adults in their twenties
and thirties, who started to take OxyContin following routine medical
procedures like root canal treatment. Since the settlement plan does not
exclude investigation of criminal charges, some of the victims and their
relatives hope that the Justice Department will take that step in the near
future.19
It is unclear what the Sackler family’s current wealth holding is. But
whatever it is, it should not be more than the profits they would have made
by selling OxyContin as the dangerous drug it really is and which they
knew it to be—a highly addictive form of medication that should only be
administered by specialists. The Sacklers and Purdue Pharma should have
accepted that OxyContin was a drug with a small market. They should have
understood that trying to increase profits by dangerously increasing demand
for the drug, including by misleading doctors and patients, was deeply
wrong. They should not have more money than they could have made had
they engaged in their business in a morally sound way.

When it comes to dirty money generated by businesspeople, it doesn’t stop
there. There’s also the unscrupulous habit of maintaining your wealth by
letting others pay for your mistakes. Of course, businesses fail sometimes.

Being in business always comes with a measure of risk. Yet there are some
people who are happy to take the money that comes with doing business,
but, if things go badly, will make others bear the brunt of their failures. In
some cases, the amounts needed to deal with the problems are very large,
yet often these costs are spread among all citizens, including all taxpayers,
diffusing the harm to the owner’s reputation.

Perhaps the most memorable recent example of this occurred during the
2008 financial crisis, when hundreds of banks worldwide had to be bailed
out. To survive, they fell back on government support—in other words, on
the financial support of all citizens. And without getting into the
complicated and technical details of predatory financial products and
deceptive credit ratings, we can safely say that the crash was the result of
the bankers’ imprudent and extreme risk-taking in the preceding years. This
had become possible due to deregulation, which the super-rich had lobbied
for as part of their neoliberal belief that a weaker government was better for
wealth creation all round. Ironically, once they had become victims of their
own irresponsible behavior, those very wealthy bankers and businesspeople
had to knock on the door of the same government in order not to go
bankrupt. Shored up by taxpayers, they could survive (as the saying goes,
“socialism for the rich and capitalism for the poor”). Scholars have strongly
condemned this socializing of the risks of the finance industry, and,
remarkably, even scholars with libertarian inclinations have come to the
conclusion that a strongly deregulated financial system can no longer be
justified—that it needs limits. Some have been implemented since the
financial crisis. But whether enough has been changed to protect us, the
common people who pay our taxes and have negligible economic power, is
a question that will only be answered when the next financial crisis hits.20
Beyond this, there are also frightening cases of corporate irresponsibility
that have led not only to the public shouldering a considerable financial
burden, but also to a large number of fatalities. All too often in such cases,
businesses will try to wash their hands of a situation as quickly as possible,
so that they and their shareholders can avoid paying compensation for the
harm done. Perhaps nowhere is this clearer than with the Bhopal disaster.

Bhopal is the capital of the Indian state Madhya Pradesh, where on
December 3, 1984, the worst chemical disaster in human history took place.

It occurred in the pesticide plant of an Indian subsidiary of Union Carbide,
an American corporation. The plant had serious safety problems that were
known both to the company and to the local government. When a faulty
valve in combination with a non-functioning safety system led to a huge gas
leakage, the toxic waste immediately killed more than 3,800 people, in
addition to several thousand more victims who lost their lives in the days
that followed. Over the next two decades, another 15,000 premature deaths
as well as several hundred thousand cases of adverse health effects,
impairments, and congenital defects in newborn babies would be attributed
to the disaster.

Union Carbide denied responsibility. The Indian government demanded
$4 billion to compensate the victims. Eventually, they settled out of court
for $470 million. The judge deemed that this would once and for all remove
liability from Union Carbide and protect it against any further claims.

Union Carbide had found a way to make legal amends for their failures.

According to some sources, this involved American diplomatic and political
lobbying at the highest level. Yet any moral or political analysis worth its
salt should look beyond what happened in the courts. The out-of-court
settlement was peanuts: $470 million, which was based on the estimate that
3,300 people died and 102,000 suffered from permanent disabilities—
figures that have been contested.

21 It has been estimated that this is less than
5 percent of what a similar claim settled in the US would have generated—
in which case the total compensation would have been more than $9 billion.

This is money that remained in the company and the pocket of the
shareholders, and was not used to compensate residents of Bhopal.

Not surprisingly, news of the out-of-court settlement was gladly received
by the stock market, where Union Carbide stock prices rose by about 7
percent. The personal wealth of those with a stake in the company actually
rose because they did not have to pay adequate compensation for fatal
corporate negligence. Anyone who has, or has ever had, Union Carbide
stocks is therefore sitting on dirty money. If they want to redeem
themselves, they should donate a significant proportion of the value of
those stocks to organizations that care for the victims. Unfortunately, the
chances are that people who currently own stock in Union Carbide, or in its
successor, Dow Chemical Company, have never heard of the Bhopal
disaster. In 2022 I mentioned this case during a lecture in New York, and I
asked who had heard of the Bhopal case—no one in the room raised their
hand. Yet in India, in Bhopal, there are still many people who suffer on a
daily basis because of this grave injustice: because the site is still not
cleaned up, because compensation has been insufficient, or because some
survivors later became parents to severely disabled children, who now need
full-time care, which their parents need to provide without any meaningful
public support. All of this could have been avoided if safety had been
placed above profit, and adequate compensation above protecting
shareholders. Up until today, in companies such as Union Carbide and Dow
Chemical Company, millionaires and billionaires are sitting on money that
is not rightly theirs.22
The Union Carbide philosophy of “profits before people” is endemic today,
and an even more widespread way in which money becomes dirty is
through the daily violation of workers’ labor rights: entrepreneurs around
the world are, as you read this, making huge profits while subjecting their
employees to inhumane working conditions. Most of the clothes that people
in affluent societies wear are sold by companies that have annual profits
ranging into the billions, turning their owners and major shareholders into
decamillionaires or billionaires. Yet the labor conditions faced by workers
in the garment industry are often appalling—and dangerous. In the fastfashion industry, a limited number of global brands have considerable
power over the supply chain, and they effectively dictate prices to suppliers,
who are then left with little margin to pay decent wages and create safe
working environments. The men and women at the top of these fashion
retail companies have sold their souls to predatory capitalism—if they
hadn’t, they would choose to establish decent conditions for the workers
who make their products, thereby accepting that this might come at the cost
of lower profits. But does it really matter if the billionaires who own the
companies end up with a few million less?
Things are frequently made worse by local corruption, leading to poor
enforcement of safety regulations. This was a major contributing factor to
the Rana Plaza disaster that occurred on April 24, 2013, when an eightstorey commercial building in Dhaka, Bangladesh, collapsed. The building
housed a bank, several shops, and five garment factories. The day before
the collapse, large cracks had been discovered in the building. The shops
and the bank immediately closed, but the garment workers were ordered to
return to work the next day. A few hours after they resumed working, the
entire building collapsed. A total of 1,134 workers were killed, and nearly
2,600 were injured, many for life; in some cases, they could only be rescued
by amputating limbs. The International Labour Organization set up the
Rana Plaza Donors Trust Fund, to compensate victims and their families
and cover medical costs and lost income. Many of the well-known brands
that sell their clothes across the Global North had their garments produced
in Rana Plaza, including Benetton, the Children’s Place, and Primark.23
According to the Clean Clothes Campaign, only Primark and Loblaw
stepped up in any meaningful way; other companies, like Walmart,
contributed the minimum amount to the relief fund; while Benetton paid
much less than what was requested ($1.1 million instead of $5 million), and
then only after a worldwide campaign by activists and unions. The fashion
industry also promised improvements in the working conditions of the
garment workers. But, as the business website Bloomberg put it: “A decade
after the Rana Plaza collapse, garment workers are still exploited. Building
safety has improved, but the economics of the clothing industry remains
stacked against the people who make most of what the world wears.” And
that economic structure is one of the great power inequalities, in which the
big fashion brands whose owners are listed in the Forbes billionaires list
keep pushing the wages down.24
As we well know, this structure—of putting profits before workers—
isn’t unique to the fashion industry. Perhaps the most famous example of
worker exploitation is offered by Amazon, which, in 2019, became the
world’s most valuable public company. Jeff Bezos, the founder and, for a
long time, chairman of Amazon, holds more than $100 billion in wealth.

Amazon made more than $21 billion in profit in 2021. Yet at the same time,
there have been regular reports on the grueling and exploitative labor
conditions experienced by Amazon employees. Over the years, exposés
have repeatedly been published in the British and American media,
revealing horrifying details about conditions in Amazon warehouses:
employees are made to work without proper breaks; every step they take
and how many tasks they fulfill are constantly monitored; they work up to
ten-hour shifts with only one break (which is then in part spent on getting
through the metal detectors that are installed to prevent petty theft); they
suffer injuries due to exhaustion; they are not paid the salaries they are
entitled to; and if they complain about any of this—or, worse, try to
unionize—they risk getting fired.25
At the same time, there is a lot of window dressing going on. Amazon
workers are not called workers but “associates,” just as Jeff Bezos is an
“associate”—albeit one who earns rather more than the associates who are
picking up the orders and driving packages around the country, with no time
for sanitary breaks. Amazon has more nice words to redescribe reality
—“fulfillment center” is the term used for “warehouse,” and “being
released” for “being sacked” (although in the latter case the connotations
are weird, since prisons also “release” their former inmates). But nice words
do not change material facts.26
Given its immense resources, Amazon could easily have improved
working conditions and decreased health and safety risks, such as by
affording workers more breaks and giving them salaries that would allow
for a decent living on full-time pay. Perhaps their leadership team thinks
that by hounding workers and treating them like robots, they are
maximizing their productivity and hence profits. Even if this were true, the
Amazon leadership could choose to have slightly lower profits and instead
have better working conditions for its more than a million “associates.”
Amazon’s corporate leadership appears to follow a strategy of making
sure workers remain powerless, so that its management and owners decide
unilaterally on wages and labor conditions. It’s become widely known that
Amazon does not recognize labor unions, and will not negotiate with them.

It doesn’t seem to bother Amazon that forming a workers’ union is an
internationally recognized human right. Still, perhaps change is in the air. In
2020, the former Amazon worker Christian Smalls started to organize
workers at a warehouse in Staten Island. In April 2022, the workers voted to
form a union, which is the first time Amazon workers in the US have
become unionized.27
At its heart, this is about the fair division of profits. Profits are made by
everyone who works for a company, but Bezos keeps the lion’s share for
himself and his shareholders, while his employees receive barely anything
at all. It’s not as if he’s unaware of this: when Bezos flew to space in a
rocket in July 2021, he thanked those who made it possible: “I also want to
thank every Amazon employee and every Amazon customer, because you
guys paid for all of this.” Given the ongoing critique of labor conditions at
Amazon, as well as the fact that its ruthless pursuit of a monopoly position
has massively restricted customers’ free choice, that was a pretty cynical
remark. But it’s more than that. Amazon also has a track record of engaging
in international fiscal engineering, ensuring that the company pays very
little in taxes. For example, in 2020 Amazon registered €44 billion in
revenue in Europe—a huge increase in sales due to the pandemic. Even so,
in its accounts, Amazon registered a net loss of €1.2 billion in its
Luxembourg headquarters, meaning it had to pay zero corporate tax.28 It’s
not just depriving its employees of fair working conditions, but depriving
society of its fair contribution to government funds, too.

Tax dodging is, of course, the most common form of dirty money. And it is
also the murkiest, in legal terms. So far, the millionaires and billionaires
(and their companies) that we’ve encountered in this chapter have been
roundly condemned in the public domain (by ordinary people, or by
journalists, or both) for the immoral practices that made them rich.

Unfortunately, it is not always so easy to see from the outside who among
the super-rich is sitting on money tainted by tax dodging. Some of them are
revered as entrepreneurial heroes; others stay out of the limelight and
instead bask in the respect and company of their peers. And there are many
more tax dodgers who have profited from activities that are often illegal or
borderline illegal. The distinction between dirty money acquired by patently
unacceptable means and money that one can be proud to have earned, but
did not pay taxes on, is not always so clear.

Tax dodging comes in two main forms: tax avoidance and tax evasion.

Tax avoidance is the (often creative) use of legal rules—including
loopholes—in order to minimize the tax one pays. Tax evasion means
dodging tax through illegal practices. Tax avoidance can come in forms that
are widely used, and widely accepted. It is legitimate in the strict sense that
it is legally permissible. But it is only morally legitimate if, in addition, it
does not exploit the rules in a way that violates the original intent of the
law. For example, in countries where the fiscal rules include tax breaks for
home owners who have a mortgage, people might obtain advice on which
type of mortgage to get in order to make optimal use of such tax breaks.

This practice is widely regarded as both legally and morally legitimate;
after all, the original reason for introducing such tax breaks has been to
support home ownership among people. Whether such tax breaks are a good
thing for society is another question, since they often increase inequality as
they are of no use to the poor.

These benign types of tax avoidance are largely irrelevant when it comes
to thinking about the rich and super-rich dodging taxes. In most countries,
income tax rates are progressive—that is, they are intended to ensure that
you pay a higher tax rate if you earn a higher level of income. But what
research on taxation shows is that the very rich are skilled at finding ways
to avoid paying such taxes. They engage in tax avoidance that is legitimate,
in the strict legal sense, but that is dubious where morality is concerned.

As for the illegal route—tax evasion—there are several options that
those wishing to evade taxes can, and do, pursue. One is, simply, not to
report the income they receive. They can do this if there is no third party
that directly reports their income to the tax authorities, as is the case for the
self-employed, business-owners, and, in many countries, those receiving
returns on investments, dividends, savings, and so forth. If banks and other
financial institutions were compelled to report all income to the authorities,
then this route to tax evasion would be closed off. While there might be
strong opposition from those who make use of this means of tax evasion
right now, there is nothing difficult about making this happen. You need
only to stipulate by law that any income, whether from labor, capital, or
entrepreneurial activities, must be reported, and duly taxed.

Illegal tax dodging is also made easier by lack of enforcement. In many
countries there is a serious understaffing problem: the fiscal authorities who
are charged with investigating tax evasion don’t have enough people or
resources to do their jobs properly. The understaffing of tax-compliance
offices turns tax evasion into a calculated risk for those who have a lot to
gain.

For some countries, there is data on how this works. In the US, the
Internal Revenue Service (IRS) periodically estimates the amount of taxes
that are not paid. Its most recent estimates are that, after collecting the taxes
that are late, there remains a net tax gap of about $470 billion per year.

Analysts agree that increasing the budget for enforcement would bring in
much more money in additional tax revenue than what it would cost—about
three times as much, and much more if one takes into account the indirect
deterrent effect. So even if you don’t care about fairness at all, this is in
principle the smartest, most efficient thing to do. So why doesn’t it happen
in practice? Because those who would lose out from tax enforcement have a
pivotal say in political decision-making.29
Imagine if everyone paid the taxes they were due to pay. There would be
full compliance. What difference would that make? Well, to go with the US
example, it would mean that the government’s budget would increase by
$470 billion. Or, with just above 74 million children currently under the age
of eighteen, it would mean that the US government could open a savings
account for each American child, and deposit $6,350 in it every year. Each
American child would find about $115,000, plus interest, in their account
on the day they turned eighteen.30
But instead, tax avoidance is growing, particularly through the use of tax
havens, which play a key role in the fiscal affairs of the super-rich. In a
fascinating study, the French economist Gabriel Zucman pieced together all
the available data for estimating the size of tax havens globally, in order to
find out who benefits from them, and what their cost is to foreign nations.

His shocking conclusion was that there has never been so much wealth in
tax havens as there is today. Globally, about 8 percent of household wealth
is held in tax havens—the equivalent of 10 percent of the world’s GDP. For
a long time, Switzerland has been the largest tax haven, but in the 2020s,
Asian tax havens (especially Hong Kong and Singapore) have become
increasingly significant, too. Zucman’s study shows that, from country to
country, there are great differences in citizens’ use of offshore accounts. In
places such as South Korea, Japan, and the Scandinavian countries, people
make relatively little use of them. On the other end of the spectrum are
countries such as the United Arab Emirates, Saudi Arabia, Russia,
Argentina, Venezuela, and Greece, where rich citizens make vast use of tax
havens.31
Who are the people who avoid paying taxes? Not surprisingly, it is the
super-rich around the world who primarily make use of the possibilities that
tax havens offer. They have an entire industry that helps them conceal
wealth abroad and, as we’ve seen, they derive most of their money from
wealth or capital, rather than from working. It is in fact the truly ultra-rich
who benefit most from tax havens: an estimate based on data for Norway,
Sweden, and Denmark suggests that the 0.01 percent richest in those
countries own about 50 percent of the wealth that citizens from those
countries have stashed in tax havens, and in that way are able to evade
paying about 25 percent of the taxes that they owe.32
In April 2016, with the publication of the Panama Papers, the
International Consortium of Investigative Journalists (ICIJ) put names and
faces to a large group of individuals making use of tax havens and their
shell companies to store and shift money anonymously. Vladimir Putin, the
prime minister of Iceland, the king of Saudi Arabia, and the families of
many prime ministers and presidents from across the globe, were revealed
to have been channeling their cash into shell companies in Panama. Set up
by the law firm Mossack Fonseca, these shell companies appeared on paper
to have other directors, so that without going through Mossack Fonseca no
outsider could trace them back to their real owners. An anonymous
whistleblower, “John Doe,” leaked this information to journalist Bastian
Obermayer from the German newspaper Süddeutsche Zeitung. “John Doe”
insisted on never meeting Obermayer and only chatting over encrypted
channels; he judged that his life would be in danger if his identity were
revealed.

A member of the ICIJ, Obermayer shared the information with other
journalists in the consortium, and they worked hard to connect the real
owners to the shell companies. While there can occasionally be legitimate
and legal reasons to register a company’s accounts in a tax haven, it is
infinitely more likely that the money is stored there either because it is the
product of illegal activities (including straightforward theft), or because the
super-rich are trying to skirt paying taxes. The Argentinian footballer Lionel
Messi (long celebrated as the world’s best soccer player) and his father
were among those exposed by the Panama leak. They have since been
convicted of defrauding Spain of €4.1 million, but settled with the Spanish
tax authorities so that they did not have to serve any jail time.33
But not all countries hold tax dodgers to account in this way. In places
where “tax morale” is low and corruption endemic, people might just shrug
their shoulders. What should one expect, if it’s so easy to get away with it?
The Canadian political scientist Tom Malleson has argued that this is a
deeply misguided way of responding to tax evasion. We should all condemn
it for the criminal act that it is. In reality, most tax fraud goes undetected,
and even when detected it often only results in a warning. Malleson points
out that the median loss for tax fraud in the US recently was $309,000,
compared to $2,100 for robbery, yet the punishments do not reflect this. In
the case of tax fraud, only 68 percent of convictions have led to time in
prison, with an average sentence of seventeen months, whereas in low-level
robberies 99 percent of offenders are jailed, with an average sentence of
107 months. Among those who are convicted of selling marijuana (which,
moreover, is legal in several other countries, unlike theft, which is illegal
everywhere), 91 percent are sentenced to prison, with an average sentence
of twenty-nine months—40 percent longer than the average sentence if you
steal from the public by committing tax fraud. A rich person’s crime is thus
not punished with the same degree of severity as a poor person’s. There is a
word for this: class injustice. Given that white people are over-represented
in tax fraud, there is also a racial dimension to this disparity in sentencing.34
When I interviewed Marlene Engelhorn, the Austrian-German heiress
and co-founder of taxmenow, she likewise stressed that we should question
which groups a state’s bureaucracy devotes its attention to. “We should look
very carefully at all the bureaucratic energy that currently is focused on
people that in a welfare state rightfully get their transfers, like
unemployment benefits.” She stressed that we often refer to these as
donations from the state, overlooking the fact that they are part of social
security systems to which we all contribute. Yet what questions do we ask
about the rich? “All this bureaucratic energy of finding out everything about
poor people should be re-concentrated on wealthy people, because they are
the ones who are the actual beneficiaries of societies, but they don’t want to
share. And it makes absolutely no sense,” Engelhorn observed. What is
worse, in countries across the world, we find that welfare fraud is just a tiny
fraction of total tax fraud. For example, in Austria welfare fraud was
estimated in 2022 to amount to €14 million, compared with €12–15 billion
for tax fraud, and yet, as Engelhorn points out, we focus much more on the
former than the latter.


Corporations, too, make ample use of tax havens, Amazon being the—
admittedly huge—tip of the iceberg. To avoid paying taxes, they “shift
profits,” along with other complicated feats of fiscal engineering. Big
corporations tend to be multinational firms, and the international legal
system treats each of the firm’s subsidiaries as separate entities. A
multinational firm will thus have profits (or losses) in several countries.

And it will pay the corporate tax rate that is applicable in those different
countries. Globally, corporate tax rates differ a great deal. That is especially
the case if you look beyond the law at the effective tax rates (that take
deductions, exemptions, and loopholes into account). Subsidiaries of a
multinational firm will make internal transactions, from financial loans to
the use of logos and trademarks, and there is quite a bit of leeway in
determining what prices to charge for those transactions. By cleverly
manipulating these prices, the profits of a multinational company may end
up being recorded (on paper!) as having come from the subsidiary that is
based in the country where tax rates are lowest. For consumers of the final
products this doesn’t make any difference to what they buy, but profitshifting of this kind is hugely advantageous to a company as it allows it,
perfectly legally, to minimize the taxes that it has to pay. Companies try,
ideally, to pay no taxes at all, even if their profits soar into the billions.36
As an example, the economists Emmanuel Saez and Gabriel Zucman
have detailed how Google has made use of profit shifting. In 2017, Google
Holdings in Bermuda made $22.7 billion in revenue. This entity is the legal
owner of some of Google’s technologies, which it licenses to Google’s
affiliates in Europe. Thanks to this organizational setup and intragroup
transaction, Google pays little or no taxes in Europe. Instead, it pays
corporate taxes in Bermuda … where the corporate tax rate is zero. Saez
and Zucman estimate that close to 60 percent of the profits of American
multinationals abroad are registered in low-tax countries.37
The executives running the multinational companies who make use of
profit shifting are generally the same people who make the top twenty of
the Forbes billionaires list. We are talking here about individuals who have
assets worth at least $50 billion. Yet somehow they think they have a duty
as CEOs or CFOs to hire an army of legal and financial advisers to make
sure they pay as little in tax as possible. In the meantime, the infrastructure
of many of the countries they operate in is in dire need of investment. In
those countries, investment in infrastructure either doesn’t get made, or tax
rates on workers are raised in order to fund it. There are thus ordinary
people in communities all over the world who lose out because of this
corporate tax dodging. It may be technically legal under the current rules of
the game, but that doesn’t make it any less morally indefensible. All the
money that rich tax avoiders refuse to pay is money that could have been
used to fund policies for improving the lives of the poor. It is money that
could have been used to pay workers good wages, so that they could
provide for their families. The prevalence of tax avoidance—especially
through the use of tax havens—is an important factor in why wealth keeps
trickling upward.

There is one further—chastening—implication of all this hidden money:
wealth inequality is likely to be even greater than current estimates show,
since the very richest have wealth that cannot be detected.

How do all these super-rich individuals—from heiresses to CEOs—find out
how to dodge taxes? That’s easy. There is an entire sector of financial and
legal advisers that help them to minimize the taxes they have to pay, while
staying just within the law—a sector that has been dubbed the wealthdefense industry. These advisers, from tax accountants and financial
planners to lawyers, exploit every possible tax loophole and are as creative
as possible with the law, in order to make sure their clients pay as little tax
as possible. They themselves are typically not in the ultra-rich 0.1 percent,
but tend to belong to the next 9.9 percent of rich and super-rich people.

There’s a clear financial win-win for members of the wealth-defense
industry and their clients. Clients evade millions and even billions in taxes,
while their advisers earn a very good salary indeed, and make use of these
tax-dodging techniques themselves. Most ultra- and super-rich people need
do nothing themselves to defend their wealth; there are others who will do it
on their behalf, for a small slice of the financial gain they make in paying
fewer taxes.38
The precise details differ between countries, since each country has its
own rules regarding taxation, but here’s a neat example, provided by Chuck
Collins, to show how it works. Donald Trump’s father, Fred Trump, made
extensive use of all the legal loopholes and other fiscal engineering allowed
by US law, in order to pass on his fortune to his children without them
having to pay tax. One such strategy was to make gifts that were disguised
as loans. In 1987, Fred invested $15.5 million in one of Donald’s real estate
projects. In 1991, Fred sold his stake back to Donald for $10,000. The tax
authorities lost out on gift tax on what was effectively a gift from father to
son of $15.49 million.39
While the potential gains from tax evasion are clearly the greatest for
those who have most, the wealthy-but-not-ultra-rich also make use of these
strategies. Take the following tactic to avoid inheritance tax in the
Netherlands. Under Dutch law, heirs have to pay inheritance tax ranging
from 10 percent to 40 percent, depending on the relationship between the
heir and the deceased, as well as the amount of the inheritance. There are
some exemptions, and by far the most generous of these relates to the
bequest of a company. If an heir inherits a company, they do not need to pay
inheritance tax on the first €1.13 million of the company’s value. On the
remaining amount, 83 percent is also exempt from tax. So not surprisingly,
wealthy people frequently turn their personal assets into company assets, so
that their heirs can (largely) avoid paying inheritance tax. Solicitors know
the ropes and will be happy to help—for a fee, obviously.

This is not a private issue. It is not even merely an issue between the
individual who is evading taxes and the tax authorities. This is an issue that
goes straight to the heart of the social contract. When the authorities lose
money through tax avoidance and evasion, everyone else loses too. Tax
dodging lowers the total tax revenue, with cascading effects. There is less
funding available for the provision of public goods and social security.

Ordinary people lose out; society’s institutions begin to break down. The
NHS crumbles. State schools become understaffed and under-resourced.

Those who are not rich enough to call upon the help of the wealth-defense
industry—that is, most of the population—have to fork out more in taxes to
try and make up the shortfall. Either way, tax avoidance is not, as Donald
Trump said, “smart.” It is egoistic. It is unpatriotic. And it is tightly coupled
with extreme wealth.

The fiscal engineering performed by the wealth-defense industry treads a
fine line between legality and illegality. Tax avoidance is legal; tax evasion
is illegal. In practice, it is not entirely clear to what extent that distinction
matters, since the likelihood that the tax files of the super-rich will be
checked by the authorities is minuscule. Most governments simply haven’t
put enough resources into monitoring tax returns and the financial
transactions of companies, despite the fact that bolstering the relevant
bureaucracy would pay for itself many times over.

Still, it’s clear that rich and super-rich people prefer, all things
considered, to stay within the boundaries of the law. It’s always comforting
to know that, if the tax authorities did decide to check your tax returns, you
wouldn’t end up in court and perhaps even in jail. It should therefore come
as no surprise that, over the last few decades, the super-rich have tried to
change fiscal law in many countries, so that they can pay less tax while
staying within the bounds of legality. In other words, they have lobbied and
exerted their influence to make laws more plutocratic. Shifting the burden
of taxation away from taxing capital to taxing labor is one way in which
this has been done; lowering the highest tax rates that individuals have to
pay is another; introducing more loopholes a third.

A striking example comes from the US, and has been laid out in detail by
Morris Pearl and Erica Payne, the current and former president of the
Patriotic Millionaires. In their book Tax the Rich! How Lies, Loopholes, and
Lobbyists Make the Rich Even Richer, published in 2021, they document
how wealthy Americans lobbied for changes in the tax codes that, step by
step, little by little, have meant they have paid less and less in tax. This has
produced a situation whereby the US now has the same effective tax rate for
both rich and poor—except for the very richest, who pay the least, because
they have no income from labor at all and make maximum use of the
wealth-defense industry. After putting all the different types of taxes
together (consumption taxes, payroll taxes, state-level taxes, federal taxes,
and so on), Saez and Zucman estimate that the average effective tax rate in
the US is 28 percent. The bottom 70 percent of the population pay slightly
less—mostly around 25 percent—and the wealthy pay slightly more, but it
is the top four hundred richest families who pay least of all: only 23
percent. They mainly pay the relatively low corporate and property taxes,
rather than the higher payroll and consumption taxes.40
In most countries, income from labor is taxed at a higher rate than
income from capital. In other words, the income you generate by working is
taxed more than the income you generate by having stocks, bonds, savings,
property, or the profits from entrepreneurship. This is a problem in almost
all countries, except in those that have no income tax at all, such as
Bermuda. Pearl and Payne offer the following example to show what a
difference this makes. Take two families who each make $400,000 a year.

The “Working Family” generates this income from labor. After having
taken the standard deduction of $24,800, they pay about $104,970 in taxes
(federal tax rates range from 10 percent to 32 percent). The “Rich Family,”
meanwhile, also makes $400,000, but they do so entirely from investments.

They take the same standard deduction, after which they don’t have to pay
any taxes on the first $80,000 of taxable investment income, and they pay
only 15 percent tax on the remainder. The Rich Family therefore ends up
paying $44,280 in taxes, $60,690 less than the Working Family.


The upshot is that it is much more fiscally advantageous to live on
capital than it is to live on sweat and toil. And only those who are super-rich
can do the former. Even if they don’t actively seek to dodge taxes, all
extremely wealthy people have money that is tainted by the work of the
wealth-defense industry, and by the efforts of the capital-owners and superrich people who have spent decades lobbying to make unfair changes to our
fiscal systems and labor legislation—changes that, in the end, punish
workers and the middle classes, whose assets are generally confined to the
home they live in and some modest savings. The rich are now profiting
from wealth accrued in ways that would previously not have been legal but
now are, thanks to new plutocratic rules. Such changes are morally
indefensible. To the extent that the rich and super-rich have money that is
traceable to these illegitimate changes in the fiscal law—and they almost all
do—it is money that they should not have had in the first place. It is yet
another type of dirty money.

It’s easy for most wealth holders to agree wholeheartedly that kleptocracy
and criminal activities should be strongly condemned. And then they would
add that, of course, they are staying within the boundaries of the law, and
hence are doing nothing wrong, and can continue to sleep well at night.

Not just easy; far too easy.

This attitude fails to recognize that, for all the reasons discussed in this
chapter, it is almost impossible to amass and maintain extreme wealth
without some portion of it being dirty. Theoretically, yes, it could be done;
in practice, though, even the most morally pure case of a rags-to-riches hero
or heroine who is treating workers well, will be at severe risk of crossing
over to the dark side as soon as they appoint a financial adviser. Clearly,
only some cases of extreme wealth raise questions about direct violation of
the law. But all extreme wealth raises questions about the harm that has
been done as it has accumulated, the operation of accountants in the twilight
zone of legality, and indeed, the unfair shifting of the boundaries between
what is legal and what is illegal.

This last point brings us to the next major problem with extreme wealth:
it not only provides greatly improved maneuverability within existing
legislation but also allows for greater influence on future norms and rules.

In other words, extreme wealth corrodes democracy.


It’s Undermining Democracy
The Universal Declaration of Human Rights has set the standard for the
rights of oppressed and disadvantaged groups ever since it was proclaimed
by the United Nations in 1948. Article 1 of the declaration begins with its
essence: “All human beings are born free and equal in dignity and rights.

They are endowed with reason and conscience and should act toward one
another in a spirit of brotherhood.” The declaration then spells out what this
core notion of equal human dignity means in various areas of life. Article
21 concerns politics. It states:
Everyone has the right to take part in the government of his country, directly or through freely
chosen representatives. Everyone has the right to equal access to public service in his country.

The will of the people shall be the basis of the authority of government; this will shall be
expressed in periodic and genuine elections which shall be by universal and equal suffrage and
shall be held by secret vote or by equivalent free voting procedures.1
Democracy has long been recognized to be intimately connected with the
foundational moral principle that all human beings are equal in dignity.

Throughout history, people have made huge sacrifices to be treated as
equals in the eyes of the world, and to secure their right to participate in the
political process. This struggle endured long into the twentieth century—
think of the fight for universal suffrage in Europe, or for equal rights for
Black South Africans under the Apartheid regime—and it continues to this
day. Recent uprisings in countries as diverse as Hong Kong and Iran prove
that people are willing to risk everything to live as equals in freedom. Their
sacrifices are a stark reminder of the value of democracy.

Today, many democracies are also liberal democracies. In its most basic
contemporary form, liberal democracy simply requires that each adult
citizen be given one vote, regardless of race, class, gender, religious beliefs,
or political views; all citizens should be afforded an equal opportunity to
take part in political decision-making, either directly or indirectly.

Liberal democracy is, of course, not the only possible political model.

Regimes can be authoritarian, as with a dictatorship or a theocracy. And,
like any other political system, liberal democracy can weaken and fail. This
can happen in two ways: either it becomes less democratic—that is, while
its citizens may have democratic voting rights, the preferences of the elites
dominate political decision-making. This is currently a particularly urgent
concern for the US, which political scientists have begun to classify as an
oligarchy. Or it becomes less liberal. In this second case, the rights of
minorities are no longer protected, and popularly elected leaders can enact
the will of “the people” as they interpret it. In illiberal democracies, those in
power curtail the ability of the free press, independent thinkers, and
political opponents to criticize the government; they also weaken the legal
system. Hungary under Victor Orbán is an example of this kind of
democracy.


If we genuinely care about protecting human rights, we need to care
about protecting democracy in general and its liberal nature in particular.

And we might even have to go beyond that, since liberalism as an ideal
stands very far from the oppression that many groups have experienced in
the name of liberalism. Settler societies, such as Australia, Canada, New
Zealand, and the US, have seen a great divide between the idealized
discourse of fundamental human rights, and the reality of genocide and
oppression that colonialism has wrought on indigenous populations.

Similarly, there is not a single liberal democratic society that has so far
succeeded in protecting the rights of racial and ethnic minorities, or queer
and trans people. Some scholars are therefore very critical of the use of the
word “liberal,” as they point out the many historical abuses that have been
committed in its name, and argue for much more democratic forms of
governance that include citizens’ assemblies and also democratize the
economy.


My sense of the current political situation, however, is that those rightly
wanting more democracy and greater protection of everyone’s rights should
join forces with the more “moderate” defenders of liberal democracy as we
know it. Because they are both subject to increasing reactionary threats
from those who are antagonistic to liberal democracies, not to mention its
radical progressive alternatives.

Many of us today can sense this erosion of our democracies taking place.

Many have also intuited that it is connected with wealth inequality. For
years, politicians, scholars, and activists alike have been warning of the
pernicious influence that wealth has on our democratic system. But how,
exactly, does the concentration of wealth undermine democracy? If we take
a step back, we can see that wealth inequality threatens democracy at the
deepest level, warping several of its defining features.

The first of these is collective decision-making. We are not just
individuals who happen to live side by side with other individuals who are
unaffected by our actions and behavior. We are people living together in a
shared physical space, who all have different needs and desires about what
to do with that space and its resources, and for this reason we all need to
agree on a set of rules to manage our lives. Any group of individuals living
in proximity to one another will inevitably interact, exchange things, and
have to agree on who owns what. The alternative is chaos, extreme
insecurity, and rule by the strongest. If we want to get a sense of what that
would be like, we need look no further than the scenarios presented by
dystopian science fiction, where anyone can kill anyone else at any given
moment—and get away with it. It might be entertaining to read these stories
in books or see them dramatized on screen, but I’m pretty sure most us
would rather live in a society where our lives and the lives of our dear ones,
our projects and our personal possessions, are secure.

In small-scale communities, radically non-hierarchical forms of
collective decision-making can suffice to make decisions about how to
divide up limited shared resources (like shelter, food, and water). In this
setup, people sit together and talk, and, since the community is small,
everyone can be heard and have a say. This mode of decision-making—
where everyone gathers to discuss the issues of the day—can also work in
collective housing or in small communes, where it can be a particularly
useful way of dividing up the burdens of protecting the common interest
(whether that be against an outside threat from other people, or against
natural disasters such as flooding). Larger communities might have
established rules of decision-making over time, as is the case among
indigenous tribes where the elderly decide on collective matters. In presentday societies, however, given their considerable size, we have to rely on
more delegated and structured ways of collective decision-making. In most
countries, this is done by voting for officials who should, on behalf of the
entire population, make decisions that are reasonable and can be justified to
those whom their decisions affect.4
As we shall see, our ability to make genuinely collective decisions
evaporates when extreme wealth enters the picture. This isn’t merely a
logistical problem, but a moral one. It undermines the core democratic
principle of political equality, most pithily enshrined in the slogan “One
person, one vote.” The guiding idea is that no single individual’s view
should weigh more heavily than another’s—at least, not on the basis that
they have accumulated power through luck or coercion. Of course, when
developing policies and weighing the interests of many different groups that
will be affected, the interest of some groups will often outweigh the
interests of others. That can be for sound reasons: when developing
disability policies, it makes sense to give much greater weight to the views
of the disabled themselves than to those of other people. But the interests of
any given group should never count for more simply because that group has
more power and is willing to use (or abuse) that power to get things to go
its way.


Both the principle and the practice of democratic decision-making
require a set of formal and informal institutions that allow citizens to make
well-informed decisions—and these, too, are threatened by wealth
inequality. In a healthy democratic society, policy and law must be based on
fact and argument, rather than on lies, deception, and rhetoric, or on
intimidation and other forms of (physical or non-physical) violence. This
means we need a properly functioning, independent judiciary that can settle
disputes. We need an independent free press that has the intellectual and
material resources to do proper reporting and investigating. Journalists
should be able to do their work with integrity and public support, and
should not fear for their professional or personal future if they report on
findings that some powerful individuals might not like (including the
owners of the media). We need independent and accessible universities
whose mission is to seek the truth and advance proper reasoning, always
playing by the rules of the scientific method that opens up one’s findings
and arguments to evaluation by others. And so on. These are the institutions
which, as historian Timothy Snyder says, we should defend, if we want to
avoid sliding into tyranny.


So what, exactly, does money have to do with all of this?
Several of the forms of dirty money that we’ve just encountered are, of
course, blatantly undermining democracy. In the case of kleptocracy or state
capture, it couldn’t be more obvious: the citizens of Equatorial Guinea can
vote but have none of the democratic rights listed above, and the
tremendous power of Vladimir Putin and his circle of allies makes it
extremely difficult for Russian people to enjoy them either. But as we’ve
seen, there are many shades of grey when it comes to dirty money, and
much of the money that undermines democracy is only somewhat dirty, or
even apparently clean.

To get a more detailed picture, let’s zoom in close and look at the various
mechanisms by which money can be turned into political influence, thereby
giving some citizens more political power than others. We can begin with
the mechanism that shows the relation between money and democracy in its
purest form: the commodification of citizenship. In other words, the ability
to buy a desirable passport, provided that you’re able and willing to pay for
it. This is, simply, the sale of political rights in exchange for money.

It’s easy to see why someone might want to buy a new passport: it is the
formal proof of legal citizenship of a country, and citizenship comes with
the rights to live, work, and vote in that country, and to be protected by its
legal institutions. If one lives in a dictatorship, or an illiberal country in
which the rights of some minorities are not protected, then being able to
join a different political community is a very attractive—possibly even lifesaving—prospect. But often, the reason for wanting to acquire another
passport has less to do with human rights than the lucrative opportunities
citizenship of another country offers.

For the super-rich, there are two easy options: get a golden visa or a
golden passport. A golden visa refers either to residency for a limited period
or permanent residency obtained by investing in (or sometimes donating to)
a country. A golden passport turns that investment or donation into full
citizenship. People apply for golden visas and golden passports for different
reasons. For some, it is a route to a higher quality of life in a more stable
society. For others, it is a way to cover up criminal activity. Or it could
allow you to do business in a much more favorable context—allowing you
to pay less corporation or income tax, for example.

For the American right-wing libertarian billionaire Peter Thiel, buying
himself a New Zealand passport was the first step toward purchasing a large
plot of unspoiled land. He plans to fly there in the case of severe social
unrest or climate catastrophe. Thiel has no family or other connection to
New Zealand. The number of days he spent there before his citizenship
application was granted? Twelve.7
For the less rich or well connected, there are stricter residency
requirements. Often, however, you only need money, and the willingness to
spend the minimum number of days in the country where you seek
citizenship. There are companies who will—for a fee, of course—provide
advice and deal with all the paperwork. These companies are clear about the
reasons for such a second passport—to have a “plan B” in an unstable
world, and to gain visa-free access to many countries. In the Caribbean
island of Antigua, you only need to donate $100,000 to the Antigua
National Development Fund to get a passport, which is attractive because it
gives you visa-free access to more than 150 countries around the world.

There are other ways of doing this, though: you could, alternatively, invest
$400,000 in a government-approved real estate project. Passports from
Malta or Cyprus are of particular interest to very wealthy people, since they
allow you to live and work anywhere in the European Union. In Malta, you
just need twelve months of residency and a €750,000 donation to the
national investment fund. Other countries—like Portugal, Ireland, the UK,
and the USA—also offer permanent residence permits in exchange for
investment.8
This practice is both morally and politically problematic. Why? For
starters, because selling passports for vast amounts of money undermines
the principle of political equality. A country that sells its citizenship has two
sets of political rules: one for wealth holders who can buy their way into the
country, and another for the ordinary folk who cannot. It commodifies
political rights, but with a price tag that only the super-rich can afford. To
make matters worse, it rewards crime, inviting wealth holders who are
sitting on dirty money to become members of a political community. In
Malta, a quarter of the people who acquire citizenship via the golden route
are Russians, many of them oligarchs. In the UK, there has been outrage
that the golden visa scheme has allowed criminal money to enter the
country, as well as less savory individuals like oligarchs and the family
members of dictators. Not surprisingly, there are calls on the government to
review the regulations around golden visas.9
This scheme also undermines politics in another way. If a government
decides to impose sanctions on citizens of a particular country (for example,
by freezing their assets), then by changing passports, individuals can try to
avoid those sanctions. Golden passports are thus rendering useless an
essential instrument of foreign policy. In 2015 and 2016, in the wake of the
US and European sanctions on Russia, there was a surge in Russian
oligarchs acquiring Maltese passports. In March 2022, the problem reared
its head again. Against the backdrop of sanctions on Russians and
Belarusians who were supporting the Russian war against Ukraine, the
European Commission called upon all its member states to dismantle this
golden route to citizenship of a country in the European Union.10
Yet while the Russian case shows how politically damaging these golden
visas can turn out to be, the moral objection to the super-rich purchasing
passports also holds outside periods of war and sanctions. One reason for
objecting on moral grounds is the sharp contrast in how refugees are
treated. In southern Europe, more than 25,000 refugees died between 2014
and 2022 while they tried to reach Europe by boat. Malta has been
condemned for the continued neglect of its legal duty to rescue and support
those in danger at sea. When these refugees arrive in Europe, they are often
forced to live in very difficult circumstances, generally without permission
to work, while waiting for years to hear about their asylum applications. In
London, refugees are housed in hotel rooms without windows, sometimes
smaller than prison cells, and without access to decent food or spare clothes
—yet the minister for immigration described these hotels as “luxurious.” In
the US, under President Trump and continuing under President Biden, the
process for people to seek and receive asylum is intentionally restrictive.11
In short, refugees who seek residency in a country in the Global North,
either because their basic human rights have been severely violated, or
because their lives are in danger in their home countries, or because they
are forced to flee due to the extreme poverty or the devastating effects of
climate change, face a wall of resistance. In the meantime, multimillionaires
and billionaires can just buy their way in, purely because they happen
(whether legitimately or otherwise) to sit on a heap of money.

It doesn’t stop there. The morally objectionable practice of selling
golden visas and passports not only stands in sharp contrast to the treatment
of refugees, it is also profoundly ironic: governments have spent decades
reducing the tax rates for the richest, only to then decide to try to attract
more funds by selling the highest political good—citizenship. Wouldn’t it
have been more democratic—not to mention more efficient—to take the
appropriate measures to tax the rich properly, as they were in the period
between 1945 and 1975, and then to invest those taxes back into the
economy? Even if this approach led to exactly the same amount of tax
revenue for the countries that currently sell citizenship, it would have done
so in a way that respected the principle of political equality, as well as fiscal
fairness—it would have ensured that wealthier residents contributed more
to the collective budget. But we are where we are, and golden visas are now
worsening global inequality, since many of the buyers of these passports are
the super-rich citizens from corrupt or undemocratic countries, often in the
Global South. Their relocation to European countries such as the UK or
Malta represents a large shift of resources from the economic periphery to
richer countries. Why are we encouraging this?
There is another, perhaps more familiar mechanism by which money
translates into political power: when wealth holders fund political
candidates and parties. Rich people are much more likely to do this, and
with large amounts of money—and it would be extremely naïve to think
that large donors don’t get special treatment, whatever official statements
from politicians may say to the contrary. Donations generally come with the
expectation that if the funder one day needs some help from the politician,
he or she will get it. This common-sense wisdom is reflected in the saying
“He who pays the piper calls the tune.” Receiving money makes a politician
indebted to their donor, making them more likely to try to please them, do
them a favor, spread their views or, at the very least, self-censor their own
views to avoid upsetting them.12
Admittedly, this mechanism is very difficult to prove. To the extent that
such cash for favors is openly discussed, it will never be mentioned in an
email or make it to the minutes of a meeting. So what evidence do we have?
Once in a while there will be someone who does just come out and admit it,
even though what they’re saying and doing is widely regarded as morally
unacceptable. Transparency about such practices is rare and surprising. Yet
choosing to reveal what is, in essence, a soft form of bribery, perhaps even
corruption, could have several possible explanations. It might be because
the person in question wishes to signal that they have deliberately chosen to
be amoral, or because they want to normalize corruption, or because they
are too stupid to understand that such behavior is societally damaging, or
because they are suffering from a form of psychopathy that leaves them
without shame. Whatever the underlying reason, there is a high-profile case
of a donor who went on the record saying that his donations to political
parties should be understood as financial favors and that he expected
political favors in return. That person is Donald Trump. In 2015, a journalist
asked him why he had been making donations to both Republicans and
Democrats. The journalist asked: “You explained away those donations [to
the Democrats] saying you did that to get business-related favors. And you
said recently [that] when you give, they do whatever the hell you want them
to do.” To this, Trump responded: “You better believe it … I will tell you
that our system is broken. I gave to many people. Before this, before two
months ago, I was a businessman. I give to everybody. When they call, I
give. And you know what? When I need something from them, two years
later, three years later, I call them. They are there for me. And that’s a
broken system.”13
We might perhaps think that this problem is unique to the US, since the
country has fewer restrictions on donations to political parties than many
other countries, and money plays a much bigger role in political campaigns.

Alas, we should assume that this is happening everywhere, given the not
unreasonable suspicion that large donations to political parties are never
really for free. In 2021, a very large donation by a businessman to the Dutch
Christian Democratic party, CDA, was made at around the same time that
the party submitted a legal proposal to parliament that would give favorable
treatment to companies as part of Dutch inheritance law. This special
treatment would allow children and other family members to inherit a
family business without paying much by way of inheritance tax, while the
inheritance of a family home or savings would continue to be taxed without
such an exemption. Well before this donation was made, there had already
been building opposition to such special treatment of companies, since it
has upward-flowing redistributive effects: it strongly favors those with large
inheritances, partly because they are much more likely to inherit a business,
but also because it’s easier for rich families to incorporate their money into
a business (with the help of the wealth-defense industry). Luckily, in the
Netherlands donations to political parties that are larger than €4,500 have to
be publicly registered. The list of such donations can be consulted by all
people. That some donations have been exceptionally large has worried
many politicians, and in 2022 all political parties—except those on the
extreme right—accepted a legal change that limits each person’s total
political donations to a party and its subsidiary organizations to €100,000
annually.


Large donations that can be used to trigger favors clearly undermine
political equality. But as the American political philosopher Thomas
Christiano points out, there are also other democratic values at stake. When
money can be used to buy votes, those who funded the elected politician
will see their interests protected in the policies that are implemented—but a
large part of the costs of those policies will be borne by everyone else. Votebuyers are, in a certain sense, free-riding on the spending of society as a
whole. We are all paying for legislation that favors the interests of just a few
private donors.15
As all this suggests, the role of money in politics extends far beyond
individual favors: it sets the political agenda. In countries where an ability
to raise funds is a crucial determinant in who will be the next leaders,
political candidates who favor the interests of the rich and super-rich are
much more likely to be on the ballot. Rich and super-rich people are more
likely to be donors, and they typically prefer candidates of their own social
class. Those who cannot donate to campaigns are much less likely to have
their interests and views represented in the election debates or, later,
reflected in policy. This is hardly meeting the democratic ideal of treating
citizens as equals by giving them an equal say in the process of collective
decision-making.

Worryingly, research by political scientists suggests that, in fact, the
agenda is not just set to meet the interests of those who can make the largest
donations—the super-rich 1 percent—but also to support the rich more
generally. In an influential study, the political scientists Martin Gilens and
Benjamin Page showed that, in the US, Congress is most likely to make
policy decisions that align with the interests of businesses and citizens in
the ninetieth percentile of the income distribution (that is, the rich and
super-rich). There is not much scholarship on how this works elsewhere,
but a handful of studies in other countries have found a similar bias toward
the policy preferences of the rich. Still, there are also interesting differences
between countries. Take Norway, a social democratic country with limited
inequality, strong unions, a general ban on political advertising on
television, a political class made up of individuals who are not particularly
rich themselves, and political parties that receive two-thirds of their
financing from public subsidies. The political scientist Ruben Mathisen
found that, in Norway, the preferences of the rich were likewise better
accommodated by government policies, but much less so than in the USA;
in fact, education carried more weight than wealth in determining whether
your needs would be met. Notably, though, the policy preferences of
different social classes didn’t differ much, which might be explained by the
universal character of the Norwegian welfare state and the broadly
homogenous demographic makeup of Norwegian society as a whole (unlike
in other European countries, members of the working class are not
predominantly from an ethnic minority). Still, Norway is unusually well
equipped to keep all its citizens happy, since its substantial oil revenues
mean it can fund a solid welfare state without having to raise taxes on the
rich.16
Almost wherever you are in the world, the better-off—and people with
university degrees—are vastly over-represented in the political sphere.

Meanwhile, those from the working class are massively under-represented,
and have very little political influence. In many countries they rightly feel
excluded and alienated from politics, leading some not to bother to vote at
all. It is hardly surprising, then, that we see a pervasive political bias toward
the interests of the rich and the super-rich.

The situation is concerning, to say the least. But it’s made worse still by
another, more direct strategy that the rich and powerful deploy when
politicians are in office: they pay lobbyists to promote their interests. Hiring
a lobbyist is expensive, and so this practice means that the interests of
wealthy individuals are—yet again—much better accommodated by policymakers and politicians.

In Europe, it is often said that lobbyists have a major impact on political
decision-making at the level of the European Union. In Brussels, where the
European Commission and Parliament are situated, there are about 25,000
registered lobbyists. The EU requires all organizations, their lobbyists, and
the budget they devote to lobbying to be listed in a transparency register,
which the EU calls “a tool to allow European citizens to see what interests
are being represented at Union level and on whose behalf, as well as the
financial and human resources dedicated to these activities.” That is a
laudable aim, but what does it do to prevent the massive power-throughlobbying imbalance between groups that have loads of money and those
that do not? In the EU, only 28 percent of registered lobbyists are working
for non-commercial organizations; the rest are lobbying for private business
interests. While views differ on which groups have most influence, it seems
very unlikely that the funds available to lobbyists would not translate into
political influence. And those funds are very unequally distributed. In fact,
it is quite possible that some interests are not represented at all.17
The problem is not so much the mechanism of lobbying in itself, but the
hugely unequal ability of different groups to do so, given the vast disparity
in their finances. An equitable form of lobbying, in which all sides have
roughly equal power to be heard, could be useful—it could even enhance
democracy, since it would provide a lot of information to politicians and
policy-makers, and help them make better-informed decisions. The problem
lies in the vastly unequal playing field.

There is another, more insidious variation on lobbying, whereby major
companies try to influence political decisions by threatening certain actions
if things don’t go their way—a form of corporate blackmail. And we are not
concerned here about small firms—there is no need to worry that the bakery
on the corner has much more influence on policy-making than any of its
neighbors. But large companies do. They can undermine democratically
chosen aims by wielding corporate power. For example, if citizens have
collectively decided that they want their country to reduce its greenhousegas emissions, and their democratically elected government has sought to
impose stricter regulation on emissions, major polluting firms might
threaten to withhold campaign donations, or shift their production lines to
other countries (and thereby sacrifice many local jobs) rather than cleaning
up their act.

Many a corporate threat will, in the first instance, be made via a direct
phone call, and as such can be hard to document. Once in a while, though,
an example leaks to the press, often because some smart journalist asked the
right question at the right time. In the Netherlands, this happened to the
third Mark Rutte cabinet, in office from 2017 until 2021. This government
consisted of a coalition of four center-right, conservative, and Christian
parties. At the suggestion of the economically conservative party VVD, the
coalition decided to abolish the tax on dividends. None of the parties had
included this as a proposal in their electoral manifestos, so there was public
outrage when it was announced. It was well known that this policy would
especially benefit the shareholders of Dutch multinational companies. It
would also be very expensive—it was estimated to cost the government
$1.9 billion in foregone tax revenue. Dutch civil servants from the Treasury
advised against abolishing the tax, since if the government’s goal was to
attract foreign companies to the Netherlands, other fiscal instruments would
be much more effective. In short, almost everyone was against it. From
government memos that were eventually leaked to the press and then shared
with parliament, it became clear that major Dutch multinational companies,
in particular Shell and Unilever, had lobbied for the abolition of the tax.

When the then CEO of Unilever, Paul Polman, informed the Dutch prime
minister via phone that Unilever had already decided to move the company
completely to the UK, the plan to abolish the dividend tax was scrapped.

What was most striking about this drama was how large, and how invisible,
the influence of two big multinational companies with Dutch roots—Shell
and Unilever—was on the democratic process. Citizens never even had a
chance in the run-up to the election to discuss the proposal. Parliament was
not fully informed. Only because of the independence of the Dutch media,
and the shrewdness of certain journalists, did this drama see the light of day.

Which makes you wonder: how often are citizens and their political
representatives not informed about how and why decisions are made, and
who the real decision-makers are?
And it doesn’t stop there, of course: the influence of money in politics
extends even further, traveling beyond government institutions and into the
public sphere. There is a worrying trend of super-rich people buying up
media outlets and using them to control both the spread of information and
the arguments that get aired publicly. A free and independent press is vital
to the functioning of our democracies. Yet the media—and particularly the
news—is becoming a commodity that can be bought and sold to the highest
bidder, providing yet another mechanism for the wealthy to turn financial
power into political power.

There is probably no more significant example of a media billionaire
whose extensive power threatens democracy than Rupert Murdoch. He
started his career in the conservative tabloid press in Australia, initially
taking over two Adelaide newspapers his father had run, before gradually
building his empire in newspapers, magazines, publishing houses, online
media, and cable television in a wide range of countries, though his
presence is especially felt in Australia, the UK, and the US. Since launching
his earliest newspapers in Australia, Murdoch has relied on provocation and
sensationalism as a business model. In the UK, he is notorious for allowing
the widespread use of unethical and deeply illegal tactics at his paper News
of the World, in particular hacking the voicemails of a wide range of
individuals, from celebrities, civil servants, and politicians to murder
victims and British soldiers killed in Afghanistan. Murdoch allegedly tried
to persuade Labour MPs to stop pushing for further investigation of the
scandal, and when a cross-party parliamentary committee issued a report
condemning how News of the World operated, he dismissed it as party
politics. Only after further damning revelations of phone hacking did he
close the newspaper down. British journalist Henry Porter commented in
2010 that Murdoch’s attempts to conceal the truth and spread conspiracy
theories during the investigation showed his total disdain for the democratic
process. Moreover, when the former News of the World editor was
subsequently hired as communications director by David Cameron, then
leader of the Conservatives, Porter observed how, as a result, “media power
and political power achieve[d] an ever greater degree of merger.”18
In hindsight, this was only the beginning of a much stronger merger
between Murdoch’s media empire and the political sphere. In the UK,
Murdoch’s newspapers played an active role in spreading the
disinformation and false promises that made the British population vote to
leave the European Union—with all the economic and social harm that this
has caused its citizens and trade and industry. Other British newspapers
immediately wrote about the damage Brexit had caused as soon as those
effects became clear—from not being able to hire Eastern European
workers for the processing of turkeys for Christmas, to airport chaos for
British passport holders wanting to travel to EU countries. It took a very
long time for the newspapers owned by Murdoch to begin reporting on the
problems caused by Brexit.19
On the other side of the Atlantic, the political takeover by Murdoch’s
media empire, in particular Fox News, was almost total under Trump’s
leadership of the Republican Party. Fox, which has been described as
tabloid television, unapologetically bases its reporting on fear and anger—
so much so that the grandson of an eighty-four-year-old man who shot a
Black teenager simply for ringing his doorbell, attributes his grandfather’s
reaction to a racist paranoia caused by watching Fox News nonstop. Former
president Barack Obama has blamed media like Fox News for the
increasing polarization of American society, and neatly summarized how
this followed from a profit-maximizing business model: “The economics of
the media, the clicks, are now based on: how do I attract your attention?
Well, the easiest way to attract attention without having to have a lot of
imagination, thought, or interesting things to say, is just to make people
angry and resentful and to make them feel as if somebody’s trying to mess
with them and take what’s rightfully theirs.”20
Fox’s pro-Trump reporting got Trump elected; some senior Fox staff
then took on key functions in Trump’s White House; and a synergy emerged
between what Trump did, thought, and wanted, and what Fox reported. For
Murdoch, it was about the bottom line—how to keep those large numbers
of viewers loyal to Fox. Needless to say, there is a huge democratic cost to
this complete commodification of news, where facts do not matter as long
as what you’re saying is selling. This became painfully obvious when it was
leaked that the claims aired on Fox News about the 2020 presidential
election—that it had been stolen, and that electronic ballot boxes changed
votes cast for Trump into votes for Biden—were completely fabricated. And
while everyone at Fox knew this to be the case, they nevertheless continued
to air baseless claims that the election had been stolen. In April 2023,
Dominion, one of the companies that provided the electronic ballot boxes,
took Fox to court for its lies. Murdoch didn’t admit to any wrongdoing by
Fox and the Fox anchors didn’t apologize to the American people for
knowingly lying to them. Instead, Fox settled out of court with Dominion
for $787.5 million. The lawyer for Dominion commented afterward that
“lies have consequences,” but, as veteran investigative journalist Jane
Mayer has observed in a conversation with her colleagues Susan Glasser
and Evan Osnos, the power this billionaire holds over American politics is
still huge. American democracy is still “at the mercy of a billionaire
dynasty.”21
What Murdoch and his staff at Fox fail to recognize is that it is
extremely important for democracy that the information we receive is true,
and not misleadingly presented; that it is based on solid reporting, and
sufficiently nuanced. This requires news media to be strongly regulated so
that control by just a few people becomes impossible. Journalism is a public
service that has to live up to democratic principles of the highest order.

Deregulation of the media market in combination with wealth concentration
is a very dangerous cocktail, as Murdoch’s case proves.

Beyond this most visible strategy, there are also more subtle ways that
the rich and super-rich have shaped the public debate. Rich people give
significant sums of money to research bodies and think tanks that reflect
their views and provide arguments supporting their funders on various
social, economic, and political issues. As research on propaganda has
shown, you don’t need to tell the truth to convince people to support a
particular ideological position or political leader. Making use of a range of
rhetorical strategies that draw more on emotions or on psychological
mechanisms to deceive can be even more effective, and this strategy doesn’t
require your claims to be supported by well-reasoned arguments or solid
empirical facts. Over time, the result has been a change in the ideological
climate and what is perceived as “sound evidence.”22
There is one particularly salient case of this back-door propagandism
which epitomizes the way that extreme wealth damages democracy. It is
almost in a league of its own: the case of the Koch network, led by the
ultra-conservative American billionaire brothers Charles and David Koch. It
is likely that some of their activities remain secret, and hence that we do not
know absolutely all the ways in which they have been shaping American
politics. But we do now know quite a bit about how the Koch network
operates, thanks to the work of investigative journalists like Jane Mayer,
and political scientists like Theda Skocpol from Harvard University and
Alexander Hertel-Fernandez from Columbia University.


Charles and David Koch inherited Koch Industries from their father in
1967, and built it into a vast multinational active in a range of industries,
including chemicals, fossil fuels, and raw materials. David Koch died in
2019; today, his brother and his heirs are estimated to have combined
personal wealth in the range of $120 billion.

The family’s interference in politics started back in 1977, when Charles
and David began funding organizations promoting ultra-free-market ideas
and policies. But it was about twenty-five years ago that they massively
stepped up their game, setting up a range of new organizations, including
the Koch seminars, where wealthy people could network and where
fundraising for ultra-free-market and libertarian political goals took place.

The Koch network didn’t just fund political candidates, but also ideas,
research, and higher education. It financed universities and think tanks and
supported lobbyists who advocated for a range of policies that would make
the rich richer, such as deregulation, tax cuts for corporations, and
elimination of the estate tax. It also successfully advocated for a number of
policies that have made workers and vulnerable people worse off, such as
the privatization of social security; and, in 2010, it campaigned against
President Obama’s healthcare reform. In general, the Koch network has
succeeded in making the Republican Party shift to the extreme right, with
all the disastrous consequences that this has had for Americans today,
including increasing attacks on basic democratic rules, and steep opposition
to changes in gun regulation that would stop the killing of thousands of
innocent people in the US each year—there were more than 44,000 gun
deaths in 2022. And the reactionary influence of the Koch brothers is not
just killing Americans: the entire planet is having to deal with the deeply
harmful effects of climate denialism by the Republican Party, which has
wasted many crucial years failing to do anything to curb rising greenhouse
gas emissions.24
The Koch brothers’ empire of influence shows that it is not enough to
look at discrete actions by individuals or even individual organizations:
wealth is built into our politics in a much more fundamental way. Wealth
shapes policy and opinion systemically, while the electorate appear to be
nominally in control. This doesn’t just happen within a single country but
on a global level, too. To see this, we must turn to the international
networks of super-rich individuals that hover over today’s decidedly unjust
global economic system. Who are the people helping determine global
fiscal rules? Who are those who shape the world’s political and economic
ideas, influencing what individual states and governments believe they can
achieve?
The New York Times reporter Peter Goodman calls them the Davos Men.

And those men (and, here and there, the odd woman) have built up a very
powerful network that aims to advance a pro-business agenda in a global
setting. They are named after the picturesque town in the Swiss Alps where
the World Economic Forum (WEF) holds its yearly meetings, bringing
together elite business leaders and politicians to address the world’s most
pressing problems. Several journalists, including Peter Goodman and
Anand Giridharadas, have followed the attendees of these meetings and
documented how they think. In a nutshell: theirs is the neoliberal way.


The Davos Men seek to influence the rules of the global economy in a
way that, ultimately, allows capital to accumulate, and shifts decisionmaking power to their own class (or keeps it there, once they have acquired
it). At the root of their discussions in Davos lies the neoliberal credo: it’s in
everyone’s best interest to let the private sector address the big challenges
of our time. The private sector, after all, has problem-solving powers that
governments do not, since it does everything so much more effectively and
efficiently than the state. Yes, perhaps giving power to the private sector
will make certain businesspeople very rich, but, more importantly, it will
also make all of us better off.

Where have we heard that trope before? That everyone’s lives are
improved when entrepreneurs are in control?
We saw it when we looked at global poverty statistics, which showed us
that, in reality, living standards for the most vulnerable have only improved
a little, while for the very richest they have improved a lot. The people at
Davos, and at the WEF, are the same people who keep insisting that we
consider the question of whether everyone is better off than they were
before, instead of asking: why were the gains from globalization distributed
so unequally, and who got to decide? This is a question they conspicuously
avoid. The WEF website allows interested readers to consult essays on a
range of topics that the work of the organization seeks to address, but
economic inequality is not one of them. Inequality is simply not an
important issue in the minds of members of the WEF.

From the case studies provided by Goodman, we know that the activities
of the Davos Men are far-reaching. These have included ghost-writing the
new pension legislation in France, which will allow private equity to gain
control over billions of pensions funds, thereby increasing their own profits;
supporting—in the order of tens of millions of dollars—Donald Trump in
his campaign for re-election; and helping the British Conservative Party to
gain power, and, once in power, to implement an austerity package that has
hugely increased poverty and deprivation, while making rich Brits much
richer. The Davos Men do everything for their own benefit, while their
efforts to help the poor are superficial at best: as Anand Giridharadas has
documented, rich philanthropists always seek out strategies for fixing
poverty that rely on markets, and never ask any questions about the
structural causes of those problems and inequalities, or consider more
effective ways of addressing them.26
These vital journalistic accounts of elite philanthropy and policymaking, each based on more than a decade of reporting on billionaires, are
backed up by the academic research into what sociologists call the
transnational capitalist class. This broad group consists of the very rich and
powerful: the board members of the biggest global hedge funds and
investment companies; the CEOs of the biggest companies; the directors of
organizations such as the WEF that facilitate the work of these investors
and CEOs; and the heads of some very large media conglomerates that
support the dissemination of narratives biased in favor of wealthy people.

Together, they have successfully re-engineered the economy for their own
benefit—slashing the tax rates for the wealthiest, and multiplying the
loopholes in the fiscal system.27
I suspect that many reading about this for the first time will find it quite
shocking. That was my reaction when I first encountered this body of work
by scholars and investigative journalists. How are we supposed to feel when
we discover that there exists a very powerful fraction of the super-rich that
is not only extremely wealthy but also actively seeking to do whatever it
can to bend the rules in its own favor and at the disadvantage of others?
We had better be clear about the nature of the challenge that we’re
facing. The challenge is not just that we’re seeing large and increasing
inequalities across the world. The challenge is also that there is a wellconnected group of people who are actively rigging the political rules in
order to grow the capital they already have.

And this is precisely what unites the rich with the super-rich: their
capital, or wealth, just keeps getting bigger. Not every individual might be
actively and deliberately involved in making this capital accumulation
possible, but as long as they feel entitled to let their money “grow,” or as
long as they demand annual pay that is multiple times what the average
worker receives, they are supporting an unfair system that produces
unacceptable levels of inequality. Not all members of the dominant class are
actively involved in seizing political power as the Davos Men do, but they
all feel that it is “only logical” that they follow suit and make use of the
rules that see their total wealth grow. Anyone who has “more than enough”
money—who crosses the ethical limitarian threshold of €1 million—is
profiting from the endless efforts of the Davos class to shape the world’s
politics in the way that suits them best.28
By now, it should be abundantly clear that the economic elite have too
much political power, and that they are making things worse for ordinary
people. The working and middle classes in the Global North are seeing their
jobs disappear, their relative pay decline, the economic insecurity worsen.

The world could have been much fairer, but this elite have also significantly
worsened global inequalities in comparison with how things might have
been under equitable trade regimes. And, since their drive for capital
accumulation is focused on the short term, they have allowed global
warming to crescendo into climate disaster, which has already had
devastating effects across vulnerable communities in the Global South.

These catastrophes are leading to increased migration streams away from
the Global South, which is in turn leading to increasing xenophobia in
countries of the Global North. We are thus witnessing a polycrisis, much of
which can be traced back to the way the global economic elite are pushing
their own agenda. All of this social and economic upheaval suits fascist
politicians nicely, as they can twist these developments to their own ends,
further undermining democracy from within. It should be no surprise that
once these fascists seize power, they start dismantling the “liberal” elements
of our liberal democracies, including fundamental human rights. They begin
to weaken the power of the judiciary so that their power can be
consolidated. Historians of totalitarian regimes can tell us what happens
next.

When democratically elected parties that have willingly collaborated
with the global economic elite discover just how big a threat fascists now
pose to liberal democracy, they start to push back, normally by stressing the
fascists’ undemocratic, illiberal nature. And rightly so. But they should also
ask themselves what, if any, responsibility they have for the rise of these
factions. In the meantime, those of us who have not fallen for the lures of
the proto-fascist sirens, should recognize danger from two sides. On one
side there are the fascists; on the other, the established neoliberal forces that
are willing to “help” us tackle poverty and climate change, but only with
weak, market-based solutions—in other words, policies that favor the
interests of large businesses and wealth holders. They either do not care or
else are unable to see what they are doing: they fail to understand that they
are part of the problem.

So here we are, with this long list of ways that wealth undermines
democracy. Do the disastrous effects that concentrated wealth has on
democratic values really require a limitarian response? Can’t we think of
strategies to prevent financial power from turning into political power, other
than forcing rich people to get rid of their surplus money? For example, we
could try to reform the legislation on campaign funding, or the state could
finance impartial public radio and television in order to restore the balance
of views and arguments in public debate. Dean Machin, a former British
philosophy professor who is now a policy adviser, has argued that we
should present the super-rich with the choice between incurring a 100
percent tax on their wealth above the level that makes them super-rich, or
forfeiting some political rights. The idea is that this would prevent the rich
from buying political influence and power. Similarly, you could argue that
if we implemented proper anti-corruption and campaign legislation, the
money donated by the rich could no longer affect politics in such a
significant way, and there would be no democratic reason to impose a cap
on wealth. We would in effect be building a protective barrier between the
sphere of money and the sphere of politics.29
While some of these institutional measures are necessary for a healthy
democracy, none of them will restore political equality between wealth
holders and ordinary citizens. The reason for this is that, as we’ve seen,
much of the political influence of rich people escapes the workings of
formal institutions, such as legislation and regulation. Rich people could
give up their right to vote, but if they are still able to set up and fund think
tanks that produce ideologically driven research, or if they still have direct
private access to government officials, then they will still have
disproportionate levels of political power.

Imposing formal institutional mechanisms to decrease the impact of
money on politics is thus feasible only to a limited extent. Large
inequalities in wealth will always be a threat to political equality and other
democratic values. And there is another, even greater threat posed by wealth
concentration, which such measures can do very little to tackle: climate
breakdown.


It’s Setting the World on Fire
In 2022, ExxonMobil made a profit of almost $56 billion—the highest in its
history, and more than double its profit in 2021. Shell posted profits of $40
billion, again double the previous year, and, again, the highest in its history.

Taken together, BP, Shell, Chevron, Exxon, and Total Energies amassed
profits of $199.3 billion in 2022. President Biden called these figures “so
high it’s hard to believe.” They truly are staggering. As Greenpeace pointed
out, if you earned £40,000 a day from when Jesus was born to the present
day, you still wouldn’t have made as much as Shell did in profits that year.


That same year, energy prices in many parts of the world rose so high
that many working- and middle-class families could no longer afford to
warm their homes. Everywhere, more and more households were suffering
from energy poverty.

In short, what was happening was this: the big oil companies were
profiting from economic unrest in the market due to the Russian war in
Ukraine, and doing so at the expense of ordinary people.

What were the options available to those companies? They could have
lowered prices for hard-hit households. They chose not to. They could have
invested their profits in greatly upscaling renewable energies. They chose
not to. Admittedly, there was no reason to expect that they would do this,
given that they have repeatedly rejected proposals by their own
shareholders to invest more in renewable energy production and step up
their game in climate action. Instead, they channeled profits to their
shareholders in the usual way. And the concentration of greenhouse gases in
the atmosphere rose again, hitting record highs.2 As Mark van Baal, founder
of the shareholder activist group Follow This put it, 2022 was the year in
which “the empire struck back.”3
Can we live within the boundaries of environmental sustainability while
these and other companies seek record profits? Can we avert the climate
crisis from within a system that creates such extreme wealth inequality?
Can environmental safety and stability go hand in hand with the lifestyles
of the super-rich?
Many think not. The British writer and environmental activist George
Monbiot has endorsed limitarianism on the grounds that it will be
impossible to save life on Earth without putting a cap on how much wealth
an individual can have. The French economist Thomas Piketty has
commented in no uncertain terms on the relationship between extreme
wealth and climate safety: “It is impossible to seriously fight climate
change without a profound redistribution of wealth, both within countries
and internationally.”4 Piketty and Monbiot are not the only ones who see a
strong link between environmental breakdown and extreme wealth. When I
talk to people about my research, they often raise the question of how
inequality is connected to the state of the planet and our duty to take care of
nature.

What, exactly, is the link? What’s the relationship between the super-rich
and the climate and ecological crises? Is it really the case that extreme
wealth is detrimental for the planet? If so, why?
Let’s begin with the basics. In 1990, with the publication of the first report
of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC), climate
scientists told anyone willing to listen that global warming was occurring
due to changes in human activity. Since the Industrial Revolution, they
revealed, humans have been emitting way more greenhouse gases than the
Earth can absorb (in its so-called “carbon sinks”), causing the concentration
of greenhouse gases in the atmosphere and ocean to rise. The major
greenhouse gases are methane, which gets released by cows and sheep or by
thawing permafrost, among other sources; nitrogen, which largely comes
from agriculture, industry, and combustion-based vehicles; and carbon
dioxide, the most well known, which is released when we use fossil fuels or
burn biofuels like wood. Scientists warned that if we didn’t halt emissions
of these three gases, we would face a cataclysm.5
We can use 1990 as the year when no government, organization, or
company could claim any longer that they did not know climate change was
happening, and what caused it. But even by using 1990, we are giving
governments and oil corporations the benefit of the doubt. In 2015,
journalists from the Pulitzer Prize–winning news organization Inside
Climate News uncovered documents which revealed that Exxon’s executive
management was warned by its own scientists back in 1977 that CO2
released by the use of fossil fuels would warm the world and could
potentially endanger humanity. In the US, the oil and gas industry’s largest
trade organization knew about the harm emissions could do since at least
the 1950s, and other fossil companies (such as the coal industry, General
Motors, and Ford) since the 1960s or 1970s.6
In the decades since 1990, politicians and the public have started taking
steps to reduce emissions. Some of the most common strategies that have
been advocated to stop further global warming are: for individuals to
consume less, particularly by not flying and by switching from animalbased to plant-based diets; for companies and households to switch to
electricity for fueling energy-intensive activities (transportation, cooking,
heating, and so on); and for governments to change land use (encouraging
rewilding, reforestation, and so on).

Despite these efforts, our emissions just keep getting worse. We have
emitted more carbon dioxide since 1991 than throughout the rest of human
history. In 2022, scientists warned that we had just six and a half years left
at current rates of emissions before we surpass our “carbon budget”—that
is, the maximum amount of CO2 that we can emit while still having a
chance of keeping global warming at 1.5°C.7
At 1.2°C of warming, we are already beginning to experience the
disastrous effects of climate change. It is no longer a dystopia for some time
in the future: climate change has arrived, and is already taking its toll.

Droughts have become more frequent and harmful, leading to stressed
irrigation systems, crop failures, an increased risk of wildfires, and water
insecurity. In 2018, the Western Cape province of South Africa suffered a
terrible water crisis, as a result of three consecutive years of limited rainfall.

It led to the entire city of Cape Town no longer having enough water for its
residents. Warming has made this kind of drought three times more likely to
occur.


Violent flooding, too, is on the rise. In recent years we have seen images
of severe floods in southern China, eastern Australia, Bangladesh and
elsewhere. In all these cases, the severity of the floods was described as
historic or exceptional, and experts linked them all to climate change. The
likelihood of violent flooding is increasing significantly even in areas where
it used to be rare. Scientists estimated that, before climate change, the
chance that such an event would happen was once every 400 years, whereas
now, because of climate change, those figures have risen to once every 44
to 210 years.9
Meanwhile, wildfires have become more frequent, last longer, and cover
greater areas—and hence have been more devastating in their effects. They
kill millions of animals, destroy swaths of land and plant life, lead to a huge
loss of property, and, importantly, generate a sense of increased insecurity
and danger for an ever-larger group of people. For people living in other
areas, the threat doesn’t come from wildfires but from rising sea levels.

Rising sea levels are often used for dystopian images of the effects of
climate change, with New York or Amsterdam under water, but they are
already affecting people today. The small islands in the Pacific have already
lost significant areas of land to the sea, and some islands are predicted to
disappear below sea level and become uninhabitable within the next twenty
years.10
In poor countries, the rise in droughts, flooding, and extreme weather is
leading to an increased risk of widespread hunger and famine. The UN
World Food Program warns that if global warming reaches 2°C, 189 million
more people will suffer from hunger, and that number would rise to 1.8
billion in a world that is four degrees warmer. There are multiple causes of
famine, including wars and government mismanagement, but lower crop
yields in the Global South due to climate change will only make the
situation worse.

To alleviate this suffering and stand a chance of preventing things from
becoming unimaginably bad, we need, as a matter of urgency, to reduce our
emission of greenhouse gases. The actions we’ve taken so far clearly
haven’t been sufficient. Asking people to stop flying or stop eating meat
won’t be enough: we need much more far-reaching and structural measures.

We need, in short, a genuine transition to an ecologically sustainable
economy. And this is where the question of wealth concentration comes into
the picture.

Wealth concentration exacerbates climate change in a number of ways.

First among them is simply that the rich have much higher carbon
emissions than the middle classes or the poor. This holds for all countries,
and all regions of the world. Recent data shows that, with the exception of
sub-Saharan Africa, belonging to the top 1 or top 10 percent of the income
distribution in a country is a better predictor of high emissions per person
than geography.

In 2019, the global average CO2 emissions reached 6 tons per person. As
Lucas Chancel reports, the global bottom 50 percent of the income and
wealth distribution emit on average 1.4 tons per person, and contribute only
11.5 percent of the total emissions. The middle 40 percent of people emit
around 6 tons each, and are responsible for 40.5 percent of total global
emissions. The top 10 percent emit almost 29 tons per person, which makes
up 48 percent of total global emissions. Yet within that last group, the 1
percent stand out: they emit a staggering 101 tons per person per year.


In addition, these averages differ significantly between regions. In North
America, the richest 10 percent emit 69 tons of CO2 per person each year,
compared with almost 22 tons for the middle 40 percent and 10 tons for the
bottom 50 percent. In Europe, emission figures are respectively 29 tons, 11
tons, and 5 tons; in East Asia 40 tons, 8 tons, and 3 tons; in Latin America
18 tons, 5 tons, and 2 tons; and in Sub-Saharan Africa 7.5 tons, 2 tons, and
0.5 tons. Carbon inequality is thus a significant factor in global inequality.


The contribution of the 1 percent highest emitters to total emissions is
not only extremely large, but has also been growing over time. Globally, the
emissions of those who emit a lot but not the most (technically, those
between the seventy-fifth and ninety-fifth percentile of the distribution of
greenhouse-gas emissions) have decreased by about 10 percent between
1990 and 2019, while the emissions of those responsible for the 1 percent
highest emissions have increased by 23 percent in the same period.13
Thus, generally speaking, a person’s affluence is the best predictor of
how polluting their lifestyle will be. Rich people have larger homes, travel
more, use less public transportation, and have investments in polluting
industries. In the case of the super-rich, we are looking at huge mansions
and second homes, multiple cars, private jets, and capital accumulation
from profits in industries that contribute to climate change. Yes, there are
always exceptions, and some rich or super-rich people have devoted their
fortunes to nature conservation; but for each of those green heroes, there are
exceptions in the other direction—for example, those involved in
developing space tourism or relentlessly pursuing fossil-fuel extraction.

Just look at who flies. Most people in the world have never taken a plane
and will never fly anywhere. The rich and the super-rich, meanwhile, fly all
the time, and are responsible for most of the emissions generated by air
travel. These emissions especially impact the poor, who have no way of
defending themselves against increased climate harms and risks. An
Amsterdam–New York round trip, for example, creates on average 906 kg
of carbon dioxide emissions, plus another 1,728 kg of other greenhouse
gases (that are generally ignored in debates about carbon offsetting). It’s
easy to find a ticket for this journey with a major airline for less than $800.

For most people, that price is an awful lot of money. But given how costly
that flight’s emissions are for the future of all living beings on the planet,
such a trip is startlingly cheap. In order to pay the “true” price for a trip
from Amsterdam to New York and back again, I would also have to pay the
monetary value of compensation of the damage caused by those emissions.

Forget about the $5 that the airline company offers to offset your flight by
planting a tree somewhere (that may well burn down in the next wildfire).

Even the $125 of offsetting suggested by organizations selling high-quality
carbon offset credits is too low. How could that possibly compensate the
lost livelihoods of people in Kiribati, Barbados, or Bangladesh? Or the cost
of overshooting the remaining carbon budget? Some scientists and scholars
working on climate governance and ethics think we should pay much higher
compensation, up to $400 per ton of carbon. So rather than flying to New
York for $800, if I were to pay the true price for this highly polluting
activity, I should probably pay double that—but even $1,600 seems a
trifling amount, both to the wealthy people flying, and to the people already
suffering the ill effects of climate disaster.

14 Would it be enough to curb
their jet-setting?
Corporations that sell consumer products go to great lengths to convince
us that, if we make a tiny contribution, they can “go green.” In the summer
of 2022, Shell told its European customers that, if they paid a single cent
extra on every liter of fuel for their cars, their mileage would be carbon
neutral, since Shell would use the money to plant trees. Nine law students
of the Free University of Amsterdam’s Climate and Sustainability Law
Clinic filed a complaint at the Stichting Reclame Rood, a self-regulatory
complaints board for the advertising industry in the Netherlands. The board
upheld the complaint by the students: the claim that planting one tree for
every liter of fuel consumed would make a driver’s mileage carbon neutral
was untrue and misleading.15
In the case of the aviation industry, though, we aren’t just talking about
the rich indirectly harming the poor through their excessive, carbonemitting travel habits. In many countries, ordinary taxpayers are actually
paying for the rich to fly—since aviation is subsidized by public money.

Sometimes this is done directly, when the leaders of a country think that an
airline is so important that it deserves state funding. But all airlines benefit
from the fact that, for historical reasons, the kerosene used in the aviation
industry is exempted from fuel taxes. Not only is this a significant indirect
subsidy, it also gives airlines an unfair advantage over other, more
sustainable means of transportation, such as long-distance coaches or
express trains.16
And as we know, the truly super-rich don’t just fly a lot, they also fly in
luxury—that is, in private jets, which are the single worst form of
transportation when it comes to the climate (putting aside space tourism for
a second). Ironically, many of the delegates who attend Davos to discuss
what public–private partnerships can do to tackle climate change, travel
there by private jet. An estimated 500 jets flew into the airports around
Davos for the meeting in 2022, causing emissions roughly equivalent to
26,700 cars driving from Paris to Davos. Flying by private jet is between
four and fourteen times more polluting than traveling on a commercial
flight, and fifty times more polluting than traveling by train. Not
surprisingly, several climate activist groups have started to target airports
that cater to private jets. They are demanding a ban on all private jets for
personal use.17
It’s quite simple: because they are so immensely wealthy, rich and superrich individuals can—and do—cause disproportionate damage to the
climate in all areas of their lives, thereby harming those who are too
vulnerable to defend themselves. In this way, the rich dramatically violate a
principle that all moral philosophical traditions would agree on: the
“polluter pays” principle. This principle doesn’t just apply to the polluting
consumers, however; it also applies—even more so—to investors and
producers. Big oil companies have known for decades that we can’t
continue to emit gases and that fossil fuels should stay in the ground. But
instead, they kept on digging, selling, and making huge profits. I do not
expect that it will be possible to make them liable for the damage they have
done. No doubt they have an army of legal advisers who will make victims’
access to justice impossible. But whatever their legal advisers say, morally
speaking the right thing for an energy company to do right now is to make a
plan that will phase out fossil fuels as soon as possible, redirect all their
profits into making that energy transition, and pay compensation for all the
damage they have caused. As we have seen with the extreme profits they
generated in 2022, they won’t. Their only aim is to generate more wealth.18
Without government intervention, there isn’t much reason to be hopeful
about what we can expect from the big polluting companies. They will not
just walk away from the vast wealth they can make and hoard by selling
fossil fuels, or by continuing the carbon-intensive production of steel,
plastic, and consumer goods, rather than developing “green” versions of
those products. Yet the people presiding over these industries are also
fathers, mothers, grandparents. What will they tell their grandchildren?
How do they want to be remembered after their deaths? The message to
people who have become rich or super-rich through working in the fossilfuel and other highly polluting industries is pretty clear: you don’t deserve
this money. It is filthy. Give it away, to improve the lives of the people you
have harmed through your work. If the rich (and everyone else) had
respected the “polluter pays” principle when they generated their money—
whether through production or through their financial investments—or
when they spent it, they would be much less rich. Presumably some entire
industries would have ceased to be profitable.19 But it gets worse. It’s not
just that, in a bid to boost profits (and thus to increase the wealth of their
millionaire executives and shareholders), polluting companies have lobbied
to avoid paying the costs of environmental damage. Some of them have also
deliberately spread misinformation about the real nature of climate change.

This “denial machine” has been well orchestrated, and for a very long time
has successfully sown doubt about the truth of our situation. The targets of
the 2015 Paris Climate Agreement could have been agreed upon much
earlier, and much precious time might not have been lost.

The climate-denial machine is particularly powerful in some countries,
like the US and Russia. In the US, conservative think tanks—such as those
sponsored by the Koch brothers—have long aimed to weaken and
undermine the scientific consensus on climate change, and they have
successfully obstructed the development of climate policy at the national
level. A 2014 study showed how a group of ninety-one climate-denial
organizations received annual donations of about $900 million, mainly from
conservative foundations. These foundations are funded not just by
billionaires but also by corporations like ExxonMobil.20
In other countries, including those within the European Union,
conservative multimillionaires and their companies have less money and
there is more robust legislation on anonymous or shady donations, which
make it harder to fund these efforts. Still, the polluting companies that make
big money, such as airline companies or companies that produce steel or
non-renewable energy, are equally engaged in trying to lull people into a
false sense of security. At the start of 2023, the estimated remaining carbon
budget to stay within the 1.5°C of warming was a mere 260 gigatons of CO2
emissions, which, if we continue business as usual, gives us until halfway
into 2029 to make our economies entirely fossil free. We cannot afford to
let these industries hoodwink us any longer as to the nature and
consequences of their activities.21
Keeping the planet safe for humanity will require deep decarbonization
and a fundamental economic transition—from production that is fossil-fuel
based to production that is climate neutral. Otherwise, it will be impossible
to stay within the remaining carbon budget. Yet this “green transition” will
come with winners and losers. Overall, we have reason to believe that the
green economy that should emerge from this transition will lead to much
better, healthier, and happier lives for almost everyone when compared with
the path we’re on right now. The super-rich might, perhaps, be able to buy
their way out of disaster by hiring private firefighters in case wildfires
threaten their homes, or by purchasing bunkers to retreat to when things get
really bad, but that’s not an option for 99.99 percent of humanity.


It will be a steep challenge to make a green economy a reality. Those
who have become rich from the products of carbon-intense industries, either
as CEOs or as investors, stand to lose not just money but the power and
political control that comes with it. For the CEOs of those dirty companies
often have close connections with prominent—usually conservative—
political parties. And when it comes to following what the scientists of the
IPCC have told us we need to do to reduce emissions and move to a
decarbonized world, the track record of those parties is poor—to put it
mildly. Here we can observe a worrying nexus between the profiteering of
the entrepreneurial super-rich, political inaction, and the financial support
of organizations that are part of the climate-denial machine. Just as with
protecting democratic values, trying to tighten regulation so that money
can’t buy political power or fund climate-denial machinery would certainly
be a very good thing. But, as with politics in general, the barrier between
climate action and the sphere of money will never be strong enough. Not
when we still have billionaires and decamillionaires to contend with.

There are clear, demonstrable links between climate disaster and extreme
wealth, but it is important to recognize that at heart this is a deeply moral
issue. There are certain moral imperatives that the rich and super-rich must
follow when it comes to climate change, simply because morality demands
it.23
This partly comes down to the aforementioned “polluter pays” principle.

Those wealthy individuals and companies who have been responsible
throughout history for the vast majority of greenhouse-gas emissions, have
not paid for that pollution, which has allowed them to amass their great
wealth. Meanwhile, those who will pay the price bear no responsibility.

Despite having very low per-capita carbon emissions, the inhabitants of the
small island states in the Pacific Ocean—such as the Marshall Islands,
Tuvalu, and Kiribati—are in the process of losing their land, livelihoods,
possessions, and even their capacity to live as members of a self-governing
political community.

But there is also a question of “distributive justice” here. When it comes
to emissions, the rich and super-rich have taken much more than their fair
share. The finite, emissions-absorbing capacity of the atmosphere is a
valuable common resource, owned by all humanity. If we look at our
current consumption patterns, we must draw the conclusion that we all want
more of this resource than remains available according to the carbon
budget. If the remaining carbon budget is very limited, then this raises the
question: how should we divide up the emissions that are left?
In one of their earliest studies on the topic, Lucas Chancel and Thomas
Piketty looked at what our personal carbon allowance ought to be. They
divided a carbon budget of 1,000 gigatons (that is available for the entire
planet) by the number of people that are alive or will be alive between 2015
and 2100, and estimated a “sustainable per capita emissions level” of about
1.3 tons per year. If we use the remaining budget to stay under 1.5°C of
global warming, then we each get a carbon budget of 1.9 tons of emissions
per person per year until 2050. Atmosfair, a German organization that offers
high-quality carbon offsetting, has suggested a fair emissions budget of 1.5
tons per person per year.


There is much one can say about these figures. You could argue that
citizens of developing countries need more emissions to develop, and
therefore their emissions share should be larger. You could, conversely,
argue that it would be very hard for people living in societies with a high-
emissions infrastructure to reduce their emissions, and that therefore their
share should be larger. Also, you could very plausibly object that between
2020 and 2050 or 2100 the individual emissions budget should not remain
exactly the same: rather, it would make more sense to give each of us, say, 5
tons to start with, and then over time decrease that amount so that we end
up with zero emissions later, while still keeping to the average of 1.3 tons or
1.5 tons overall.

We might quibble about what a fair individual emissions budget should
be, but it doesn’t matter what the exact figure is. What matters is that we
currently emit multiple times that amount, and a major reduction in the
amount we can emit is inevitable, regardless of whether our personal carbon
budget is set at 1.3, or 1.9 tons. Remember, the average American currently
emits 22 tons of CO2 per year. Whatever we agree is our fair personal
carbon allowance, it is going to be much, much lower than what rich people
—and middle-class individuals in affluent countries—are currently
emitting.

There’s no way around it: almost all of us will be forced to adapt our
current lifestyles. There is currently no technology that neutralizes the
harmful effects of greenhouse gases, or that makes it possible for longdistance aircraft to fly on renewable energy, and so we will have to change
the way we travel, drastically reducing the number of flights we take. The
same goes for the way we eat. Recall the earlier data on the emissions
generated by one transatlantic return flight. The data on the emissions
caused by current patterns of food consumption are equally sobering. Based
on emissions in the current food industry, a vegan diet equals 1.06 tons of
carbon per person per year, rising to 1.4 tons for vegetarians and 2.63 tons
for people who eat on average 100 grams of meat a day. For the time being,
we are unable to produce our food in a carbon-free way, especially the types
of food that we are currently consuming. But if the entire world were to
switch to a plant-based diet, the effect on global emissions would be huge.

This would in part be due to the lower emissions generated by producing
this food, but also because vast swaths of livestock pasture and land
currently used to grow the crops for feeding livestock (rather than for
feeding people) could be rewilded, allowing for carbon drawdown and
ecological renewal on a vast scale. However, as George Monbiot argues in
his book Regenesis, making such changes—which would also allow the
entire world population to be fed—would require a transformation in the
farming industry: we’re talking here about substituting the production of
animal proteins and fats with the production of proteins from plants, fungi,
and bacteria, with all the changes in practice, equipment, and supply chains
that this implies. In other words, while there are changes that people at all
income levels must make, we also need systemic reform. The way we
produce food is just one example of a system that needs to change; for a
green transition we need fundamental transformations in many other sectors
too. For example, in the case of transport and mobility, we need to not only
drastically reform the aviation industry, but also to move from private to
shared cars, and to public transport and much better cycling infrastructure
in most places. All such structural changes need major injections of money,
and fast.25
If, in addition to these decarbonizing efforts, we also see increased
investment in shared spaces—more parks, more public meeting places, and
so on—we will all be able to live very good lives within a fair emissions
budget. But the indulgences of the super-rich, such as living in a large villa
or owning several houses, flying regularly, or using private helicopters or
jets for transportation, will be out of the question. We must thus conclude
that we don’t just need to address our own lifestyles and our major
industries; we also need to do something about extreme wealth
concentration, because it is translating into lifestyles that are ecologically
unsustainable.26
You might object that while it’s true that on average the ecological
damage caused by the rich is much greater than the ecological damage
caused by the non-rich, it’s not the case that every single super-rich person
is generating higher-than-average emissions. In other words, it is perfectly
possible to lead a frugal lifestyle (and hence to emit very little) and also to
be very rich. What is damaging is the consumption of emissions-intensive
goods and services, not the possession of money per se. Therefore,
limitarianism is aiming at the wrong target. We should be focusing on
encouraging the rich to reduce their emissions caused by consumption, not
limiting their possession of income and wealth. What ecological
sustainability requires is frugality, but frugality and excess wealth can—in
theory—go hand in hand.27
On the face of it, this objection is correct, as frugality and wealth
concentration can coexist. But from a statistical point of view,
environmental sustainability and wealth concentration are very strongly
correlated. With few exceptions, the super-rich are massively
overconsuming, and make multiple times their fair share of emissions. And
since consumption is strongly correlated with household wealth, one could
argue that this provides an indirect argument for limitarianism. If we think
about policy-making and institutional design for the real world, we always
rely on empirical regularities—on what we observe at population level. A
fair government can’t choose its policies on an individual basis, and hence
there will always be some individual cases where the rule seems unfair. But
such a minor drawback will be vastly outweighed by the major moral gain
of securing ecological sustainability and a living planet for all future
generations. It’s also worth noting that, to the extent that the super-rich do
not consume all their personal wealth, most of the time they invest it in
companies that are not climate neutral, and so create additional emissions
this way. Merely taxing their consumption would still allow them to
drastically overshoot their fair emissions budget via their investment
choices. A focus on consumption alone will not encompass every aspect of
climate justice.

Another objection might go like this. Theoretically, there is another
proposal that would be more precise in its target than limitarianism:
implementing a personal carbon allowance that would allow individuals to
generate emissions of up to 1.5 tons per year, and that’s it. All types of
consumption that create a lot of emissions, like buying gasoline, flying,
eating meat and dairy products, would come not just with a monetary price,
but also with an emissions price. Each person could then choose what they
spend their carbon-emission allowance on: they could eat meat, fly, drive a
fossil-fueled car, buy stuff—but they could not do all of these things, and
certainly not as much as they pleased. This would be an extremely powerful
but also coercive way to make sure that the current population remained
within the emissions budget that intergenerational fairness and climate
justice demands. In this hypothetical situation, the rich (and, indeed, the
middle classes) would be forced to limit their spending to zero-emissions
goods and services, since not much of their personal allowance would be
left after securing food, clothing, housing, and a minimum of transportation.

This would be a way to build a boundary between the sphere of money and
the sphere of ecology: a privileged position in the economic sphere would
no longer enable you to gain a privileged position in the ecological sphere.28
There are some serious problems with this idea. First, the personal
carbon budget would apply to everyone, yet the problem was not created by
everyone—certainly not by people who are currently emitting 3 tons per
year or less. What’s more, the poor and lower-middle classes have much
less money to buy less carbon-intensive consumer goods, like expensive
electric vehicles. It’s also concerning that the idea of a personal carbon
budget individualizes a problem that has been created by systems—in other
words, by what various industries have offered us in terms of carbonintensive and carbon-neutral consumer goods; by the effects of our
governments’ housing and transportation policies; and so on. For the
transition to an ecologically sustainable economy we need to make
structural changes on a vast scale, and it is unclear how imposing an
individual carbon budget will help with that. We’d do better to look for
ways to advance that transition as quickly as possible, which means closing
some industries, expanding some others, slowing down the production of
material goods, and decarbonizing those processes as much as we can.

Little of this will happen without clear rules, regulation, and leadership.

Still, if there ends up being wide support for personal carbon budgets,
and if the limits they impose on individuals and families would help put
enough pressure on governments and companies to make them provide
carbon-free goods, then it would in principle be the most fair way to spend
the remaining emissions. It is unlikely to be feasible in the short term, and I
am very skeptical that it ever could be achieved; the best we can hope for is
that some powerful people design an app that allows us to track our own
emissions, which could lead to a movement of individuals voluntarily not
emitting more than their fair share. But this will very likely be only a tiny
proportion of the population. Under a voluntary system, the political
pressure that coercive personal carbon allowances would create would be
absent, and thus the overall effect on the green transition would be too
weak.

If you are an economist reading this, you might raise a slightly different
objection, and argue that we should tax the polluting activities (such as
traveling by plane, eating meat, driving a gas-guzzling car) rather than the
income and wealth of the super-rich. The idea here is that it’s more efficient
to increase the price of polluting activities or goods, rather than to use an
income-based measure to stop people from polluting. This objection
assumes that, at the societal level, everyone is better off when we tax
specific types of consumer goods, because each of us will only choose the
ones we really want, at their true price. In the model of neoclassical
economic theory, which assumes an equal distribution of financial
resources, this is true. But as we know, income and wealth inequalities are
currently very large. A very wealthy person would be willing and able to
pay more for goods that they value than a poorer person who valued the
goods just as much. It follows that the more unequal a society is, the more
important it is to have government rationing rather than relying on the price
mechanism.29
If we were to tax polluting activities, it wouldn’t spur multimillionaires
and billionaires to change their behavior; they would keep on massively
over-emitting. Increasing the price of flying, eating steak, or driving an
SUV might be a justified and effective way of changing the behavior of the
non-rich, but it will do nothing to rein in the excess emissions of the superrich. There are only three ways to make the super-rich halt their gross overpollution: criminalize that behavior; give them a low-emissions budget that
they cannot make larger by buying emissions rights from others; or make
sure they are no longer so rich that price increases don’t bother them—by
limiting their wealth.

We have a set of rules for normal times, when there is a balance to be struck
between different values and principles—even if we might disagree about
some of the details. We want the state to be reliable, and we believe that in
normal circumstances people can legitimately expect to be able to hold on
to the money they have, as long as the money is not dirty and they pay their
taxes.

But these are not normal times. While our inclination may be to avoid
alarming news and to tell ourselves that everything is going to be all right,
scientific evidence should make us strongly question such complacency.

Science tells us that we are turning the Earth into a place that will become
uninhabitable for most humans, and indeed for many other living species.

We are thus, whether we acknowledge it or not, in a state of climate
emergency. We have, at most, a decade to halve emissions, and two decades
to phase them out completely. We cannot simply tinker in the margins, but
must undertake a complete overhaul of how we produce, what we consume
and how we live together. We need to protect the people who are already
suffering the consequences of climate change, and compensate for the
harms and injustices done in environmental disasters where the poor and
powerless have lost out owing to the activities of the rich and powerful—as
in the exceptional heat waves and floods that India, Pakistan, and
Bangladesh have been experiencing over the past decade.

Many people have ideas about how to use our collective resources to
ensure an ecologically sustainable world. In his book How to Avoid a
Climate Disaster, published in 2021, Bill Gates lays out many new
technological solutions, and he encourages investors and governments to do
what it takes to make these technological developments happen. Climate
scientists have reacted to Gates’s book by pointing out that we know what
needs to be done, and that the technology is already available. The problem
is the lack of political will, obstruction by climate denialists, and the failure
of leaders to do what it takes. For example, Mark Jacobson, a professor of
civil and environmental engineering at Stanford University, has developed a
plan to transition to green energy based on 100 percent wind, water, and
solar power that doesn’t require any investment in emerging technologies.

Given his expertise, he is certainly better equipped than me (and
presumably also than Bill Gates) to judge what is possible. But even if, for
the sake of argument, we stay agnostic as to what the feasible and necessary
changes would be, it is obvious that we need vast investment in renewable
energy, in the large-scale transformation of energy systems in cities, in the
expansion of public transport networks, and so on. Bill Gates hopes that
business leaders, supported by governments, will save the day. Yet in
Gates’s book, there is not a single word about power imbalances, about the
harms done by the climate-denial machine, about excessive wealth and
excess emissions, or even simply about where all the money is going to
come from. Given that we are in a state of emergency (and on this Gates
and I agree), we might do better to adopt a strategy of taking the money
where it should be taken from—the super-rich—and letting governments
lead the way on the investments and the green transition. This will require
us to remember what a committed government is really capable of.

Although forty years of neoliberalism has left many of us feeling
disillusioned, and has also, in some countries, genuinely weakened the
government, surely we won’t succumb to the fantasy that the system that
got us into this dangerous situation in the first place—profit-obsessed,
poorly regulated capitalism—will now provide the solution?30
The solution is at hand, and it’s not that difficult: impose a confiscatory
tax on the fortunes of the super-rich, and use those funds to spearhead the
green transition, adequately protect those who will need protection from
climate change, and rectify the environmental injustices done in the past.

But what if increasing taxation isn’t likely to happen in the short run?
Here we must keep ethics in sight. Rich and super-rich people need not wait
until their governments get their act together and collect the funding for a
climate “moonshot” strategy. Super-rich people can easily find ways to
donate to effective environmental causes, rather than spending their wealth
on developing climate-damaging projects like space tourism. Nothing is
preventing them from taking the lead to save the planet. Given their
fortunes, they are in a unique position to make positive change.

Some of the multimillionaires I spoke with are doing this already. One of
them supported the climate activist group Extinction Rebellion financially
in its early days. This highlights a point that we must repeat over and over:
the super-rich have a choice. Every day, they choose whether to continue
holding on to great sums of money, or to put it where it’s actually needed.

Philanthropy doesn’t have to be luxurious—you don’t need to sponsor a
sports team or a rich university. The super-rich should use their money to
support climate litigation, or increase the production of renewable energies,
or invest in one of the many strategies to aid the green transition.31
This brings us to yet another connection between extreme wealth and the
ecological crisis. We all need to act to protect the living planet—but why
should middle-class families put their meager savings into buying a heat
pump or solar panels, or trade in their gasoline-fueled car for an expensive
electric one, or sign up for a car pool, if they see the super-rich living in
mansions, flying private jets, or collecting money from investments in
polluting industries? If the most affluent individuals don’t act first, they are
violating the “ability-to-pay” principle, which is one of the core ethical
principles used in taxation design, but also more recently in thinking about
how the burdens of climate action should be distributed. This principle
states that when there is a problem that a group of people need to solve,
those with the greatest capacity should shoulder the heaviest burdens, and
take most responsibility. The 90 percent will resent having to make
sacrifices if the 10 percent keep emitting so intensively; they will resent
even more that the 1 percent are emitting many times what the 90 percent
emit. We are in a planetary crisis, and this will require action from
everyone. We need leadership from those who have power. We need the
richest to set an example. Otherwise it’s going to be difficult to ask the nonrich to make sacrifices.

Although it might be stating the obvious, saving the planet requires more
than a cap on extreme wealth. There is a vast literature that can offer
analysis and guidance to us all. Everyone living above the poverty line and
whose emissions are higher than just a few tons per year must do what they
can to lower them. Everyone who can vote should vote for political parties
that understand the climate and biodiversity crises and have a smart plan of
action. At the very least, we need parties that don’t engage in greenwashing
or put up smoke screens to protect their corporate friends. We should exert
pressure on the establishment to act effectively and swiftly by joining (or
otherwise supporting) climate activist groups. And if the establishment
doesn’t get its act together very soon, then we should seriously contemplate
Andreas Malm’s claim that the sacredness of property rights is costing us a
habitable earth. Given the dismal track record of polluting companies, and
the almost-as-dismal track record of many political leaders, we shouldn’t be
surprised if we start to see climate activists growing so desperate that they
start to destroy property on a larger scale. Since property is not a living
thing, and their activism is protecting the lives of vulnerable people who
otherwise must live in an uninhabitable world, they may well have morality
on their side.32
Let’s take stock. What has our inquiry into the problems with extreme
wealth told us so far? Economic inequalities are huge. Wealth concentration
is phenomenal. But there are also clear differences between countries, as
government policies, the protection of workers, and the power of
corporations differ significantly. But even given these differences, we can
see some patterns in the harms caused by extreme wealth. As we saw in
Chapter 3, wealth accumulation is often tied to immoral and criminal
practices. In almost all cases, rich and super-rich people should not have
amassed so much money in the first place, and reparations for past harms—
including tax evasion—are long overdue. Further, we’ve seen that extreme
wealth concentration is a serious threat to democracy, in myriad ways. And
the ceaseless drive to accrue more and more money is halting the green
transition and driving climate disaster. But this wealth also has vast
potential as a force for good: taken out of the hands of self-serving
individuals, it could massively accelerate the green transition.

How does this relate to our proposed limits on wealth? The political limit
should be such that it cannot cause democratic harm. It is up to each
political community to decide where that limit lies; I hold that ten million,
in pounds, dollars, or euros, seems about right—low enough to make it too
expensive to buy political influence. The limit that the climate case would
suggest is more difficult to calculate, since the picture is, as we’ve seen,
much more complicated. What it does very clearly give us, though, is a
reason to take the lower ethical limit seriously: in a world on fire, how can
you justify buying luxurious, Earth-destroying consumer goods, when there
are so many Earth-protecting projects you could fund?
The ecological argument clearly shows the two sides of limitarianism.

We need limitarianism because there is a clear case to be made against
extreme wealth concentration. But we also need limitarianism because there
is so much good that money above the riches line could do, if only it were
used for addressing collective problems.

There is, however, one stubborn myth standing in the way: the myth that
we deserve all the money that we can acquire by legal means—that it is
ours, and therefore it is entirely up to us, within the boundaries of the law,
to decide what to do with that money. In the land of the rich, this myth is
the most insidious and damaging.


Nobody Deserves to Be a Multimillionaire
In any given debate on tax, you’ll hear the following argument. The money
that people earn on the market rightfully belongs to them, and as such the
government has no business taking it away. To the person making this point,
it will seem obvious that the very richest in society have achieved great
things that make them deserving of their huge fortunes (dirty money aside).

He or she might even add that the super-rich are usually geniuses or born
leaders; it is their talent, and their effort, that has got them where they are
today.

If this claim were true, then it would significantly weaken the case for
limitarianism. If we could truly say that we deserved our wealth, then yes,
although we should still try to manage the negative consequences of wealth
concentration, there wouldn’t be an intrinsic moral reason to put a limit on
how much a person can have.

So, is this claim correct? Can someone be said to deserve their riches if
they’ve genuinely earned them through hard work and skill? The answer to
this question takes us to the heart of the case for limitarianism—and back to
philosophical basics.

Limitarianism rests on the fundamental philosophical insight that markets
and property are social institutions. What does this mean? It means that, in
the world as it is, there is no property, and there are no markets, outside the
social context—these things cannot exist without a shared system of rules
and norms in which a coordinating party, typically the government, plays a
crucial role. We usually acquire property via market transactions; those
markets are shaped, protected, and enabled by our governments. Without
governments to protect our interests in the market, we would end up in what
the British philosopher Thomas Hobbes described in 1651 as the “state of
nature.” Life would be horrible, and no one would be safe—think of those
sci-fi dystopias. As Hobbes put it:
In such a condition, there is no place for industry, because the fruit thereof is uncertain: and
consequently no culture of the earth; no navigation, nor use of the commodities that may be
imported by sea; no commodious building; no instruments of moving, and removing such
things as require much force; no knowledge of the face of the earth; no account of time; no
arts; no letters; no society; and which is worst of all, continual fear, and danger of violent
death; and the life of man, solitary, poor, nasty, brutish, and short.1
Hobbes reasoned that anything would be better than this violent state and
that it would therefore be rational for everyone to submit to a governing
body, who would provide protection in return for obedience. Thus the idea
of “the social contract” was born—the idea that it is rational for human
beings to agree on a set of rules that govern our public life, in order to make
life better for all.2
It is the state’s responsibility to implement the social contract, providing
a set of rules that protect our basic rights and liberties, and preventing
people from taking power into their own hands or infringing on the rights of
others. Key to this is its protection of our property rights, which are central
to our freedoms, our security, and our well-being; as well as its provision of
public goods—from roads and railways to firefighters and nurses—that
enable us to safely pursue our own endeavors.

Yet for the government to exist and to exercise these functions, it must
have resources—it must collect tax. Without tax, the government couldn’t
protect our property, and enable transactions in the market (by defending us
against fraud and theft during those transactions, for example).

The fundamental philosophical point is that secure ownership of
property cannot exist without taxation. There is no property (as we know it)
without the state, and there is no state without tax. There is no preinstitutional property; it is all part of the same socio-economic system that
also generates a tax system and a government. The American philosophers
Liam Murphy and Thomas Nagel have explained this in their influential
work on ownership; as they argue, property rights are “conventional”—they
follow from agreements we make as a society. Since there are no markets
without governments, and there is no government without taxes, there is no
way to decide on what constitutes our property without first thinking about
societal rules. It is, you could say, a package deal that cannot be neatly
disentangled. The claim that we have an individual moral right to the
income and profits that we can earn on the market is a mistake. Property
rights, the role of government, and the rate of taxation must all be
adjudicated together, by the wider political community.


People who object to taxation, or denounce it as “theft,” fail to
understand that without tax—that is, without a social contract that binds
people together—there would be no income or assets, no secure
transactions and no smooth markets in the first place. There would just be
chaos and danger.

Importantly, then, there is no pre-taxation distribution of resources that
can serve as a benchmark to decide what the default position should be. In
contrast to what many libertarians, economic conservatives, and neoliberals
believe, the pre-tax distribution of income and wealth is not produced
without intervention by the government and continued societal cooperation.

It therefore cannot be construed as a “natural” distribution of property that
the government should keep its hands off. Some degree of tax on income
and wealth is always legitimate and just. The real debate should be about
how much should get collected and from whom, and how the money should
then be spent—how it can help shape the markets fairly, and support a fair,
inclusive social contract. Almost no one can say that they deserve to keep
all of their earnings. As we shall see, this is particularly true of the superrich—regardless of how they came by the cash.

Perhaps the most obvious case of undeserved wealth is that of inheritance.

Inheritances are a significant source of extreme wealth, sometimes making
individuals very rich indeed. Economists have engaged in vigorous disputes
over what proportion of total wealth comes from inheritance and what is
“self-made.” A recent study suggests that in Europe (including the UK) in
1970–80 the share of inherited wealth was less than 40 percent, and rose to
50–60 percent in 2010. In the US, the share was closer to 50 percent in
1970–80, increasing substantially in recent years.4
The share of inherited wealth looks set to continue rising in the future.

We are at the eve of a massive intergenerational wealth transfer: the capital
that the wealthy have accumulated over the last few decades will soon be
transferred upon their death to their descendants. Cerrulli Associates, an
American research and consultancy firm which provides advice for the
financial services industry, has estimated that, among high-net-worth
individuals (those with more than $5 million available for investments), a
staggering $84 trillion will be transferred to the next generation by 2045.5
That is between three and four times the total GDP of America.

If nothing changes, then the current generation of wealth holders will be
able to pass most of their fortunes on to their chosen heirs. The proliferation
of fiscal loopholes, the abolishment of inheritance and estate tax in several
countries, the use of tax havens and international fiscal engineering, and the
vast power of the wealth-defense industry will all help the elderly superrich to pass their money down without much going to the tax collector. In
the meantime, those older people who have only modest amounts to pass on
to their children—such as the value of their home after the mortgage has
been paid off, or some small amounts in savings—will see all of it being
taxed in line with the inheritance tax rules that apply in their country. They
don’t have access to the fiscal engineering strategies that would allow their
heirs to pay little or no inheritance tax.

This massive transfer of assets from one generation to the next will see
wealth inequality increase significantly in the decades to come. Lucky heirs
will not only profit from what their parents will have given them from birth,
they will also inherit a fortune. Meanwhile, the descendants of people in the
bottom 50 percent of the population will not receive an inheritance of any
significant amount.

Can any of us say that we deserve money that has been bequeathed to
us? In the case of inheritance, it is obvious that it is simply luck that
determines what we get: if you’re left millions of dollars, it’s because you
happened to have been born into a super-rich family; you cannot in any
plausible sense say that you morally deserved this fortune. After all, no one
can choose their parents or the time and place of their birth. Philosophers
tend to disagree about a lot of things, but there is a striking unanimity
among them that inherited wealth is undeserved. The heir has not made any
personal effort or life choices that have generated that wealth.6
Does it follow, then, that we should abolish inheritances completely,
through a strict confiscatory tax? This is a question we should be willing to
ask. As the philosopher D. W. Haslett has observed, we abolished the
inheritance of political power; why, then, should we not abolish the
inheritance of economic power, too?7
What complicates the answer to the question is this: inheritance is a
process with multiple stakeholders. We have to make a judgment that takes
into account the point of view of the person who bequeaths their wealth, as
well as the point of view of the person who receives it. And we also have to
ask how inheritance affects society at large. Different values and principles
are at stake for the giver of an inheritance, the heir, and the wider public.

When designing any rule or institution, we always have to consider the
values and principles of all relevant stakeholders. In the case of inheritance,
there is a clash between those values.8
The standard argument against inheritance tax (or bequest taxation) is
that donors should have the freedom to do what they like with their money.

Yet that cannot be true, since society has all sorts of restrictions on freedom
if exercising that freedom negatively affects others: you can’t stalk or
kidnap someone simply because you fancy doing so, as it would impinge on
that person’s basic liberties. And inheritances of a significant size do indeed
have negative effects on other people—on society at large. They undermine
equality of opportunity. They undermine social mobility. They provide
negative incentives: why would you bother to work for a living when
you’ve just been given a lifetime supply of cash? The latter was a worry
shared by those who built up large fortunes in the past: Scottish-American
industrialist Andrew Carnegie, for instance, argued that a (large) inheritance
“generally deadens the talents and energies of the son, and tempts him to
lead a less useful and less worthy life than he otherwise would.”9 Besides,
inheritance is not the best way to ensure an economy runs as efficiently as
possible: passing on a company to an heir doesn’t guarantee that they’re
going to be the best leader for that business.

Are there conceivably circumstances in which these negative effects
wouldn’t play out? The answer is that, yes, there are: if everyone inherited
more or less the same amount of money. All but one of these consequences
are caused by the fact that most people inherit almost nothing, whereas
some inherit millions, and even billions (the only snag that persists into this
hypothetical, egalitarian scenario is the fact that it is unlikely always to be a
smart idea to make one’s heirs run one’s business upon one’s death). The
essence of the problem is the vastly unequal nature of inheritances, rather
than the idea of them per se. And the problem is more specifically to do
with large inheritances, since receiving a small amount of money will not
undermine social mobility or equality of opportunity, or give you an
opportunity to waste your talents, sipping tequilas on the beach, rather than
contributing to the welfare and prosperity of all.10
There is one further complication. Clearly, a donor shouldn’t just be able
to shout “Freedom!” and do whatever they please. But they could
reasonably object that taxing their bequest is unfair if what they most desire
is to do as much good for their children as they can. To this end, the donor
might therefore have lived a life below their means, saving as much as they
could so as to bequeath it. Here, the donor has a point. After all, the
government should not punish those who choose to spend less so that they
can give more. For some people, leaving something to their children is a
very important, motivating aspiration, much more than spending their
money on trips to exotic places, buying lots of expensive stuff, or going out
for meals on a regular basis. It would be a cruel society that punished this
family-oriented idea of a good life in favor of the consumerist idea of one.

So, in principle, the lawmaker should not disregard this aspiration. But
there are other factors to take into account, such as whether the inheritance
is dirty money, or whether it is so large as to threaten the common good.

A different, more frequent objection to inheritance tax is that it is a kind
of “double” taxation. The donor has already paid tax on the money when
they earned it. When they later transfer that money to their heirs, more tax
will need to be paid. Isn’t it most unfair that the money should be taxed
twice?
Actually, it isn’t. There is a significant difference between inheritance
tax and bequest taxation. An inheritance is (unearned) income for the
recipient. In principle, everyone’s income gets taxed (although, as we have
seen, the wealth-defense industry is very good at eliminating some of those
taxes). A teacher earns a salary: they are taxed. A shopkeeper makes a
profit: they are taxed. A musician sells another record: they are taxed. The
only exception is for very low income, which is, most of the time, exempt.

The deeper philosophical response to the “double taxation” argument
comes from recognizing that all ownership is embedded in the social
contract. And the same is true for taxation and market transactions—that is,
how much money a person can accumulate in the first place. Government—
and taxation—is what makes inheritance possible at all. It is democratic
deliberation that determines whether and how your property can be
transferred to another person. This is visible not just through inheritance but
also in debt cancellations, which imply that one person’s claims to property
are annulled so that the debt of another can be canceled.

Let’s look at where this leaves us. A sizable proportion of the super-rich
are super-rich thanks to inheritances and gifts. These are not deserved in
any real sense. In moral terms, the conclusion is simple: to the extent that
someone’s wealth is based on inheritances or gifts, it is unearned and
therefore undeserved. Given the important role that inheritances play in
transmitting intergenerational inequality, there are increasing calls to
abolish the right to inherit, or to increase inheritance tax drastically. We are
in dire need of a new approach to inheritances—one that recognizes that
they lead to morally unjustifiable wealth concentration. At the end of this
book, I shall offer a concrete proposal of my own.11
Okay, so inheritances cannot justify extreme wealth. But what if you’re the
one who earned it, perhaps through a combination of hard work and a very
high salary? Surely wealth built up in this way should be seen as deserved
—surely the person who worked so hard should get to keep what they got
paid. Shouldn’t they?
It is not at all clear that our wages correspond to what we deserve,
morally speaking—recall the exploitative wages that we encountered in
Chapter 3, or the fact that women and ethnic minorities are systematically
given lower earnings for the same work. There have been many detailed
empirical studies proving the existence of discrimination in the labor
market and documenting particular discrimination against groups such as
women, the disabled, the elderly, and people of color. But even one’s
appearance can be a source of discrimination. All other things being equal,
good-looking people have been shown to earn 5 percent more, whereas
being regarded as among the least attractive leads to a wage penalty of
about 8 percent. Some forms of labor-market discrimination (in hiring,
earning, promotion, etc.) might be deliberate, but psychologists believe that
many causes of discrimination are not intentional or even conscious. That
alone should give us pause. But there’s also the question of the top end of
the scale.12
Pay inequalities today are huge, with genuine extremes if we look at the
salaries of corporate executives, or sports stars, media personalities, and
entertainment-industry execs. We are talking here about people who earn
millions a year, and also, to some extent, those who earn a bit less—say,
several hundred thousand a year (although one might quibble where one
draws the line between “well paid” and “extremely well paid”). Let’s just
say that we are looking at people whose riches are either beyond the “ten
million” political limit or will soon surpass it, given their earnings. Pay for
corporate executives has soared, especially in the US and the City of
London. Of the 350 US firms with the largest revenue, CEO compensation
was estimated at $27.8 million in 2021. Between 1978 and 2021, American
CEO compensation grew by 1,460 percent, whereas the compensation of
the typical worker increased by just 18 percent in the same period. CEOs
were compensated 399 times as much as the typical worker.


It’s not just CEOs who earn millions each year. The best-paid soccer
players earn £300,000 to £500,000 per week. Take the French soccer player
Kylian Mbappé, who at the time of writing was earning €6 million per
month, nearly €1.5 million per week—more than most people will earn in
their entire lives. In 2023, the press awarded the spot for the best-paid
player to Cristiano Ronaldo after he moved to Al Nassr in Saudi Arabia,
where he had signed a contract paying him $213 million per year. This
translates into $407 per minute or almost $7 per second. In the
entertainment industry, the ten highest earners, ranging from Bob Dylan and
Jay-Z to Lord of the Rings director Peter Jackson, collected earnings
ranging between $150 million and $580 million in 2022.14
Can these corporate, sports, and entertainment-industry giants claim that
they deserve their earnings? Or indeed, can anyone earning over, say,
$250,000 a year claim that they’ve really earned it?
Several arguments tend to be put forward to justify income at this level.

First, there is the argument about the difficulty of the work undertaken, or
the responsibility of the job. Since difficulty and responsibility are real
burdens, these certainly could be reasons to receive higher pay in
comparison with someone doing work that wasn’t difficult or carried no
responsibility. But in the current setup, there are plenty of jobs that aren’t
exceptionally difficult or that don’t entail much responsibility and
nevertheless are very well compensated. Morris Pearl, who retired from
high-end investment banking at the age of fifty-four and describes himself
as part of the 1 percent, put it like this:
Did I work especially hard? Maybe a little, sometimes. Most of my work involved sitting in an
office reading and writing emails and talking on the phone. Did I work harder than the guy who
had to connect the hoses to the fire hydrant in the snow or the woman who had to smile while
schlepping pitchers of beer around all night? Not really.


One would expect that if difficulty and responsibility were the main criteria
determining pay levels, many other types of work, such as childcare, would
be well paid. After all, it is difficult to do this job well—to keep multiple
children safe, have their needs met, and make sure they are properly
stimulated so that they can develop, all at the same time. Moreover, it is a
job with considerable responsibility, since the early years have a very large
impact on the rest of people’s lives. But despite the challenges of this work,
and the significant level of responsibility, the pay is pretty poor (the fact
that in many countries most childcare workers are women, often
immigrants, no doubt explains something too). Annual pay for childcare
workers employed full time is £14,000 to £24,000 in the UK, $18,500 to
$38,000 in the US, and €29,000 on average in the Netherlands. It would be
nice to see investment bankers or CEOs who earn 250 times that wage take
on childcare work for a few months and then see whether they still think
that their jobs are 250 times more difficult or entail levels of responsibility
250 times greater. Difficulty and responsibility clearly cannot be what the
extremely high levels of their pay reflect.16
A second argument that often gets wielded in defense of very high pay is
that it reflects exceptional talent, which translates into exceptional
performance. The idea is that people who command very high pay are a cut
above the rest—they are smart, wise, have excellent strategic insight, and
show great leadership. Or, in the case of athletes, they are the best and will
ensure their team wins. Such talent is so unique, and the performance that
one can expect from the individuals in question so extraordinary, that they
merit correspondingly remarkable pay.

There are several problems with this argument. First, it isn’t true. If it
were, top earners would lose out on their compensation when their
company or team did badly. Yet there have been several memorable cases
where a company performed badly, and despite this the CEO was given a
pay rise or a bonus for good performance even as hard-working employees
were laid off. Some top earners have, in essence, even said as much. A
striking statement came in 2009 from Peter van der Veer, in his final year as
CEO of Shell. Van der Veer, whose compensation in 2008 was €10.3
million, conceded in an interview to the Financial Times that varying pay
levels did not affect his performance. He said: “You have to realise: if I had
been paid 50 per cent more, I would not have done it better. If I had been
paid 50 per cent less, then I would not have done it worse.” While the
honesty of this statement may be surprising, the claim itself is not. Most
professionals are driven by a mixture of external and internal motivation. If
all companies worldwide were to agree on a maximum level of
compensation for CEOs, then they wouldn’t put in any less effort.17
If an exceptional salary does not reflect exceptional performance, then
what explains the fact that top executives earn hundreds of times more than
the average worker? The empirical literature suggests that much of their pay
is “rent”—that is, money above what one would earn in a genuinely
competitive market. “Rent-seeking” refers to how much more a person is
paid above the rate for which they would be willing to do the work. Most of
the highest salaries consist of such rent. These enormous rents are
facilitated by oligopolistic structures which influence the level and structure
of executive pay. Those who advise on or approve the top levels of
compensation in companies look at similar companies, and make sure that
what they offer reflects more or less what others in similar positions get
around the world. These people are themselves often extremely well
compensated, making it all the less likely that they will advocate restraint.

And CEOs will be rent-seeking too, since they know what top executives in
other companies earn and will generally strive for a higher salary as this
reflects higher status.

Another reason for the rise of rents is the fact that, in many cases,
including that of very well-paid soccer players, we are looking at a “winner
takes all” market in which one person or brand is able to dominate and
crowd out the competition. Thanks to the internet, some markets, like those
for professional sports, music, and TV streaming services, have turned into
high-stakes competitions: the winner goes home with a huge prize, and the
losers get much less, often even very little. This is also in part due to
network effects: since we want to consume (or read, or listen to or engage
with) what other people in our social networks consume, market dynamics
will lead to one big winner. This is particularly visible in the arts and music
industry, where some artists and performers earn very high incomes yet are,
objectively, not much better than many others who can hardly get by. Jon
Hamm, the American actor who played the lead role of Don Draper in the
TV series Mad Men, was a waiter for many years before he landed this lifechanging role. When it comes to deciding the winner that gets to take all—
which actor will land a major part in a film or TV series—luck is much
more important than tiny differences in talent among very talented people.

Unfortunately, this is not how we see things, since we tend to believe
that if we are successful, then it’s mainly thanks to our own individual
qualities. The explanation for this is the psychological mechanism called
“attribution bias,” which induces us to take credit for our successes, and
then put the blame on circumstance when we fail. This doesn’t mean that
everything in life is about luck, of course; it’s rather that luck very often
plays a decisive role in such instances, even when it is only a small factor.

This sounds counterintuitive. But say the talent of the candidate determines
90 percent of the decision as to who gets the job, and the differences in
ability between candidates are very small (as is often the case), then luck
will determine who is appointed CEO, or picked for the leading role in a
TV drama, or not. This is not to deny that talent matters, obviously. The
scientific evidence does confirm that skill is important—you do need to
have upper-tier abilities in order to access those top positions. Similarly,
putting in the effort is also very important. But there are many, many more
people who are talented and have put in the effort than there are spots at the
top. It is ultimately luck, as well as biases in the way humans judge each
other, that decides who triumphs in their industry and reaps the top earnings
that come with it.18
There is a second, much more fundamental problem with the argument
that high pay can be justified because it tracks talent and performance, and
that leads to a deeper philosophical question: why do we think that rewards
should track talent or performance? Why should these be the best criteria
for determining a fair financial reward?
In the case of talent, we again encounter the issue that our innate skills
are not something for which we can claim credit. Rather, as John Rawls, the
most influential political philosopher of the twentieth century, put it, they
are part of “the natural lottery”—what the chance encounter of one
spermatozoid with one oocyte/human egg cell has given you in terms of
genetic material. Sure, natural talents have to be nurtured and developed
after birth. For this, the first 1,000 days in a person’s life are the most
crucial period—and again, we are too young in those first 1,000 days to be
able to take credit for our choices.19
For Rawls, this was obvious:
Perhaps some will think that the person with greater natural endowments deserves those assets
and the superior character that made their development possible … This view, however, is
surely incorrect … No one deserves his place in the distribution of native endowments, any
more than one deserves one’s initial starting point in society.


Yes, we are entering dangerous terrain here. I am all too aware that if one
takes this argument further, we end up with what philosophers call “full
determinism”—the idea that everything we can do and be is fully reducible
to chance, and to circumstances beyond our control. Although some
philosophers subscribe to this view, I don’t want to go there myself.

Accepting full determinism runs the risk of erasing us as individual agents,
as beings who have some degree of control over our actions and our lives. It
would violate moral principles of recognition and respect. Some people
might regard the idea of full determinism as an insult, as it would make us
little more than automatons. It isn’t consistent with how we give meaning to
our time on Earth, with the way we experience the episodes of our life.

Even accepting the huge influence that luck and external factors have on
our lives, we have all still encountered situations where we didn’t react on a
whim, but felt that we were at a crossroads, and could make a genuine
decision about whether to take one path or another. We don’t have to erase
our agency completely in order to acknowledge the role that luck plays in
our lives. The point is, rather, that we should more fully appreciate the
extent of its influence.

In sum, we should take ownership of the talents and attributes that make
up who we are, while at the same time acknowledging that to a large extent
they were simply given to us, and hence we cannot take credit for them.

This also implies that we cannot say that we deserve all the financial reward
that these talents can generate in the market.

Does it follow that we should all be rewarded equally? No. What it does
mean, however, is that we cannot simply say that differences in pay reflect
how deserving we are. But there are several other principles that can justify
disparities in wages and other forms of financial reward and compensation.

One principle is that pay should reflect differences in the actual burdens of
the job. Think of top athletes who live under an iron regime of training,
making significant sacrifices with respect to their personal and social lives,
while their friends enjoy themselves. “Not having a life outside work” is a
burden that makes this work more onerous, and is a reason for higher pay.

But so is the exhausting nature of certain types of care work, the onerous
nature of working during the night, or the destabilizing nature of having to
be on call 24/7. Many jobs that are currently not well paid would have to be
much better remunerated if the principle that salary should reflect such
burdens was implemented for all workers.21
Another principle that justifies pay differentials is that they can provide
an incentive for people to do the kind of jobs we most rely on as a society.

My doctor does fantastic work and is committed to her patients, and I
would not want her to go off and do something that she might find more
relaxing than the demanding work of tending to her patients in a healthcare
system under pressure. If pay differences were completely erased, she might
not even have become a doctor in the first place, as this would have taken
away the incentive to devote the money and years gaining the knowledge
and technical skills that her job requires. If all talents, and all types of work,
were rewarded equally, the world would be flooded with artists. But we also
need doctors, teachers, engineers, and architects. So, up to a certain point,
pay differences are justifiable.

You might ask—if not talent, what about performance? Couldn’t that
justify pay differences, or even very high pay? Performance is a
combination of skill and effort. Working hard is surely a good thing, but it’s
important to note that being able to make an effort has an innate aspect.

Some people are born with much higher levels of energy, are much faster in
processing sensory and cognitive information, are physically strong and do
not tire quickly. Others experience physical, mental, cognitive, or sensory
challenges—some of which might be regarded as disabilities, but which
could also be challenges experienced by those who would not describe
themselves as “disabled.” No one chooses to be slow, easily tired, or
overwhelmed. The same argument applies here as for talent: we should
recognize that, to a large extent, we can’t take credit for the amount of
effort we are able to put in, though that doesn’t mean we should discount it
as a legitimate source of pride, worthy of recognition and material reward.

It’s not just that we don’t want to erase ourselves as individuals
completely (the specter of full determinism); it’s that, even if we take our
innate ability for making an effort as a given, we are still able to decide
whether to put the effort in—or not. And society has a stake in making sure
that we choose to apply ourselves. Suppose you work as a cashier, and there
are no factors, such as a disability, that restrict how many hours you’re able
to work. It would be counterintuitive to say that you should get the same
yearly wage as all other cashiers, regardless of how many hours you’ve
worked. To most people, across the ideological spectrum, it will be obvious
that if you work more hours, and hence put in more effort, you should be
paid more.

Where do these reflections leave us? They give us reason to accept some
pay differences, based on certain considerations—such as how much
society needs a particular job to get done, the scarcity of the talents required
for that work, how well those talents and corresponding skills have been
developed, how much effort you put into the job (including how many
hours you work), whether the labor is dangerous, onerous, or otherwise
burdensome. All of this can justify some level of pay inequality—perhaps a
pay differential up to a factor of ten. But it cannot justify the gulf we see
today between childcare workers—who earn £14,000 to £24,000 in the UK,
$18,500 to $38,000 in the US, and on average €29,000 in the Netherlands—
and the CEOs who earn multiple millions a year.

Some reading this will object that many super-rich individuals are wealth
creators—people who have made their millions through their own
ingenuity, and who have generated many jobs for others along the way.

Certainly, along with inheritances and earnings from labor, money
generated by entrepreneurship—either as profits from one’s own business
or as a return on stock-market investments—is a significant source of
extreme wealth. As a quick look at the Forbes billionaires list or any of the
national “rich lists” will confirm, many of the world’s wealthiest men and
women have earned their money this way. Can they claim that they rightly
deserve their billions?
There are surely reasons to say that they deserve some of it. But there are
also many reasons why it is an illusion to think that a company’s owners are
morally entitled to keep whatever profits it generates. Of course, they might
be legally entitled to do so—but as we’ve seen, what is legal does not
always correspond with what is moral, especially not when it comes to
fiscal rules.

How far should entrepreneurs and investors feel entitled to keep their
profits? Well, for starters, all the arguments we’ve just covered still apply. If
you’re successful as an entrepreneur, but have been given a head start by a
significant inheritance, then you’ve benefited from an unfair advantage. Of
course, you might then do very good things as a result, such that society as
a whole profits. But that doesn’t change the verdict that large inheritances
are never morally deserved, and hence the profits derived from those
inheritances aren’t, either. In addition, there is the huge influence of factors
that no one can claim credit for: intelligence, creativity, stamina, and other
such attributes, which, as we have seen, are not of one’s own choosing
(although as adults we do have a choice over whether we try to develop
them further, and whether we put them to good use or not). Beyond this,
rich children have access to nutritious food, stimulating after-school
activities, the best teachers, and many other services that significantly help
their early development. All of these factors help to generate that
entrepreneurial wealth, and none of them are fair.

Another issue concerns uncorrected market failures. According to
standard economic theory, a perfectly competitive market will be best for
consumers: competition should drive down prices to the level where longterm profit becomes minimal and prices reflect a good’s true cost. While
this is a nice idea in theory, in reality it is unfortunately seldom the case that
markets are perfectly competitive in this way. Instead, what economists call
“market failures” are ubiquitous. The costs and harms of producing
consumer goods are often shifted onto the local community, or onto society
at large—as in the case of environmental damage. And if a market becomes
winner-takes-all, it ceases to have the virtues of competition. Rather, it
assumes oligopolistic or monopolistic features, which allow for vast profits
but reduce consumer welfare, by contrast with a truly competitive market.

Big companies often actively try to achieve such market dominance—to
crush their competitors—sometimes using unscrupulous tactics to do so. In
all these scenarios, corporate profits are being made partly at the expense of
other stakeholders, and are thus, from an ethical point of view, unfairly
large.22
Beyond this, there’s the question of whether those profits are really being
divided up fairly. No one can become super-rich by themselves. There is a
very simple thought experiment we can use to assess the truth of that claim.

Take any multimillionaire or billionaire, and put them on a desert island.

They still have all the same talents and personal traits as before. How rich
could they become? Not very rich, obviously. Being rich is only ever
possible because there are others with whom we interact: a company owner
needs customers, and managers, and employees, and all the other groups in
the supply chain (and, indeed, in society at large) in order for their business
to exist at all. So the question of the conditions of those interactions,
including how to set the price of goods and to divide up the profits, cannot
be avoided.

As we saw in Chapter 3, Amazon could choose to have a lower return for
its shareholders, and thereby significantly improve the lives of Amazon
workers. Even a minimal adjustment to their returns on investment would
allow for a significant improvement in the working conditions and lives of
Amazon employees based in countries with weak legal protection for
workers and without strong unions. There is a profound moral decision to
be made here, based on the following questions: does the economy, in this
case represented by a multinational company like Amazon, exist to serve
the people, or are the people there to serve the winners of the economy? Do
we consider decent working conditions to be optional, or a prerequisite for
meeting a minimal moral threshold? Similar questions can be asked in
relation to our care for our planet. The clothing chain Zara could move from
producing “fast” to sustainable fashion, thereby reducing its significant
negative impact on the environment (both in terms of emissions and waste).

But this might cut into the net returns of the shareholders, most importantly
of its founder Amancio Ortega (currently twenty-third on the Forbes
billionaires list, with an estimated total wealth of more than $60 billion).

Ortega is reported to receive about $400 million each year out of his 60
percent ownership of Zara, which he invests mainly in real estate in Spain.

(In this we have the perfect example of what it means when people say that
the main goal capitalists see for capital is to accumulate.)
There is also the very important question of global justice. Recall Jason
Hickel, Dylan Sullivan, and Huzaifa Zoomkawala’s estimate that workers in
the Global South have lost out on trillions through unequal global trade
relations. Not to mention the atrocious treatment of workers in developing
economies by rich businesses based in the Global North. How can Tim
Cook, the CEO of Apple and who became a billionaire thanks to Apple,
sleep peacefully at night knowing about the poor, sometimes horrendous,
working conditions endured by men and women in the assembly line of
Apple’s Chinese factories? There are plenty of companies which make
considerable profits and whose shareholders get a very nice return on their
investments, yet which have, in the process, violated the human rights of
their workers, or others in the supply chain, or who have degraded the local
environment or even the planet. Organizations such as the Business &
Human Rights Resource Centre have documented a large number of such
abuses.23
There is one final reason why we shouldn’t assume that the profits that
entrepreneurs generate can rightfully be seen as theirs and only theirs: they
are building their wealth on the collective bequest of past generations.

MacKenzie Scott, the ex-wife of Jeff Bezos, understood this perfectly.

Upon their divorce, she announced to the world that she would donate her
entire fortune to organizations working to make society more just and
caring. She began her letter announcing this decision with the following
words:
Last year I pledged to give the majority of my wealth back to the society that helped generate
it, to do it thoughtfully, to get started soon, and to keep at it until the safe is empty. There’s no
question in my mind that anyone’s personal wealth is the product of a collective effort, and of
social structures which present opportunities to some people, and obstacles to countless
others.24
What MacKenzie Scott invokes in this letter is the fundamental
philosophical argument that, without collective institutions, public goods,
basic infrastructure, and collaboration with other people, it would be
impossible for anyone to become rich—in other words, that we all rely on
the social contract. Extreme wealth is always built on a foundation that
others have created. As the Italian-British economist Mariana Mazzucato
has shown in her book The Entrepreneurial State, many entrepreneurs who
have made fortunes have relied on innovations that were originally funded
by the government—and hence by all of us as taxpayers and as citizens who
shape the agenda through our votes. For example, many of the tech
companies that have created billionaires—such as Google and Apple—
depend for their success on technologies that can be traced back to state
support, including, most famously, the internet itself. It is doubtful whether,
without governments across countries investing in research with the
common good in mind, any of today’s tech billionaires, from Sergey Brin
and Larry Page to Bill Gates, would ever have become so wealthy and
successful.25
This point has been readily grasped by many of the scientists who have
developed medicines and technologies that have benefited humanity hugely.

Take the American doctor Jonas Salk, who invented the first vaccine against
polio in 1955. There is no doubt that he could have become immensely rich
from exploiting that invention—but instead he chose to sell a license to
several pharmaceutical companies who would roll out production, while not
earning from the patent himself. Within a few years, polio virtually
disappeared in America. It is reported that when he was asked who owned
the patent, he replied: “Well, the people, I would say. There is no patent.

Could you patent the sun?”26
Again and again, we encounter examples that remind us that rich and
super-rich people face a choice. If, like Salk, they recognize their moral
duty toward their fellow human beings, they might make the right one.

You might ask how important these historical foundations are, really, in
determining who gets to enjoy extreme personal wealth. One way to answer
this is to invoke another thought experiment. Suppose a ship with a hundred
passengers on board gets wrecked halfway between two islands. In one
scenario, the shipwrecked passengers manage to reach a desert island that
has no infrastructure and no previous civilization. In another, they reach an
island that has all the infrastructure, technology, and other trappings of a
prosperous twenty-first-century country—only, magically, all the people on
that second island have just left it a day or two ago (this is possible in
thought experiments; perhaps they had all just set off to conquer the
galaxy). How much material prosperity would this same group of
shipwrecked people be able to create in their lifetimes on the first compared
with the second island? The difference would be enormous. That just shows
how much of our prosperity is dependent on what previous generations
have developed for us. We cannot create prosperity without standing on the
shoulders of our forebears, meaning that, however entrepreneurial we are,
our own contribution to our success is limited.

With this question in mind, the American political scientist and Nobel
Prize winner in economics Herbert A. Simon calculated how much wealth
in countries such as the US or those of northwestern Europe could be traced
back to “social capital,” as he put it. According to Simon, at least 90 percent
of income in those countries is made possible by collective institutions,
such as technology or governmental structures. He argued that this justified
using this money for an unconditional basic income, granted to all
citizens.27 Certainly there was no case for keeping it in the coffers of the
wealthiest individuals.

It should be clear by now that although various principles can be used to
justify some degree of income and wealth inequality, they can only justify
inequality up to a certain point. None can be used to justify extreme wealth,
whether it comes from inheritance, labor, or entrepreneurship. We’ve
already encountered the various negative impacts of extreme wealth
concentration on the well-being of the poor, on democratic values, and on
ecological sustainability. Yet the problems with extreme wealth
concentration run even deeper. Even when we try to put those impacts to
one side for a moment, we discover that there is still no meaningful
justification for anyone having so much. We have thus found a set of
arguments for limitarianism based on principles, and a reason to organize
society in such a way that excessive wealth accumulation becomes
impossible. And if we think hard about how much wealth an individual
could justly claim to deserve, the hard upper limit of ten million that I have
proposed may seem very generous. Many reading this should begin to feel
the argumentative pull of the lower, ethical limit of one million.

These arguments might be disorienting if you’ve never looked at wealth
in this way before—as the product of the social contract and historical
contingencies as much as the individual’s choices, effort, and skill. It can
likewise be very upsetting to become so aware of the role of luck in our
lives. Some of us are born enormously lucky: in good health and with many
innate talents, to loving parents, in a caring community, in a safe country,
with ample material resources and lots of opportunities. Others are born
with a less favorable lottery ticket: in poor health, with mental or physical
impairments and few talents, without loving parents, in an uncaring
community, an unsafe country, with insufficient material resources and few
opportunities. We do not have a say in which of these situations will be
ours. It is entirely beyond our control.

Still, neoliberal ideologues will insist on stressing that, in modern
societies, everyone can become a billionaire—no matter how unlucky you
were at the start of your life, you can still make it. And they will be certain
to find examples showing that this is possible—just think Oprah Winfrey or
J. K. Rowling. This is the mantra of social mobility: you can pull yourself
up by your bootstraps; you only need to have the ambition and will to
succeed.

This narrative is very convenient for the dominant class. For the most
part, they have managed to convince us to treat each other as responsible
for our successes and failures—for whether we have done enough to seize
the opportunities that life offers us. This notion allows neoliberals to say
that the very richest deserve their fortunes. At the same time, it allows them
to hold the poor responsible for their misery.

Yet the existence of a few who have “made it” should not make us buy
into the ideology that tells us that we are all self-sufficient individuals who
can achieve whatever we want, as long as we keep believing in ourselves.

Empirical research has confirmed, in study after study, that social mobility
is very limited. And to the extent that it still exists in some countries, it is
lower today than it was a few decades ago.28
Again and again, biographies of people who have transitioned out of
poverty and into the financial or governing elite confirm that they are the
exceptions that prove the rule. Take Tim ’S Jongers, who was born in
Antwerp in 1981 into extreme poverty. He was raised in, as he described it,
a house without a toilet (there was a hole in the garden). His family was
dysfunctional and his young life was marked by material deprivation,
emotional duress, and no prospects. He ended up adopting some of the
criminal behavior that was widespread among his peers; as a teenager, he
saw no other future for himself. Then two things happened to make him try
to change his fate: first, his older brother ended up in a drug rehabilitation
clinic; and second, his mother’s new boyfriend intervened, telling him that
he had huge potential that he must not waste. At a young age, he left his
family and started to build his life on his own. For years, ’S Jongers
struggled to get by with little or no support, and no resources. Years passed,
until eventually conversations with his friends made him realize that he was
not taking proper care of himself. He decided to enroll at university in
Antwerp. While studying, he worked at night in a shelter where homeless
addicts were offered clean needles and hot soup. His task was to make sure
they were safe. He lived in two worlds: during the night, in the world of the
hopeless, those whom society had given up on; during the day, in the world
of the hopeful, most of whom had never experienced misery on this scale,
and took it for granted that they would end up in the upper-middle class—or
higher. For his master’s degree, ’S Jongers moved to the Netherlands,
where, a few years later, he was hired by the Council of Public Health and
Society to advise the local and national government in the Netherlands on
poverty-alleviation policies. A few years later, he became the director of the
Wiardi Beckman Foundation, the scientific council of the Dutch Labour
Party. Not surprisingly, journalists today frequently ask ’S Jongers whether
his life story is not proof that anyone can make it. But he is quite adamant
that for the rest of his life he will suffer the consequences of growing up in
extreme poverty, including the toll taken on him by excessive levels of
stress. As he has repeatedly insisted, his ascent of the social ladder is not
proof that social mobility is possible.29
Social mobility is dead in some countries, and crumbling in many others.

But still we cling to the myth of meritocracy. Ironically, this belief prevents
us from taking the action that would make social mobility a reality: the
massive redistribution of wealth. This simply cannot happen until we
recognize that no one could ever “deserve” the extreme riches enjoyed by
today’s economic elite.

There is an important philosophical objection to limitarianism that some
readers may have thought about by now: that it would unfairly restrict our
freedoms and opportunities. Modern societies grant each person a set of
basic freedoms that should not be violated. Central to this is the idea that we
should all have the opportunity to pursue our own conception of a good life,
which can include the life of an entrepreneur or of a thriving career person.

Once those opportunities are guaranteed, it is up to the individual to take
responsibility and seize them.

The principle of equal opportunity is fundamental to most liberal
democracies, and indeed to most modern societies. The worry is that the
limitarian ideal would violate it.

Take a person who chooses to forgo leisure in order to work more. If that
extra work then generates surplus money that they can use to obtain luxury
items, they should have the opportunity to do so. As such, limitarianism
undermines equality of opportunity, and should therefore be rejected, since
no matter what your political views are, everyone defends the fundamental
principle of equal opportunity—or so the objection goes.

But this is wrong.

Limitarianism restricts the financial reward associated with particular
opportunities, not the opportunities themselves. In a limitarian society, you
would still have the opportunity to be CEO of a major international
company, but you could no longer earn millions on a yearly basis.

If you took a very broad understanding of the word “opportunity,” you
could counter-argue that the opportunity to achieve a particular status
(namely, being a CEO with a vast salary) would no longer be available to
very rich individuals. You might moreover add that it’s not merely the
opportunity to enjoy additional earnings that is being ruled out, but also
what those earnings could be used to obtain (activities and goods that are
associated with a luxurious lifestyle and which reflect your high status).

This is correct. In a limitarian world, those at the top would see their
financial opportunities curtailed. But this is the price we pay for the massive
opening-up of opportunities for all other groups, and for making our
societies more just. Limiting the opportunity of a small handful of
individuals to become excessively rich would enhance the opportunities
available to most other people in the world. In fact, all other individuals
would benefit from the huge financial investments that the increased tax
revenue would make possible. The global poor would benefit, because if
profit-maximization ceases to be worthwhile (why make those dizzying
sums if you can’t keep them?), the wages of the workers in factories making
fast fashion or technological gadgets could be raised to the level of a living
wage (a wage that allows workers to lead a decent life). The disadvantaged
in affluent societies would benefit from social policies such as more
accessible mental-health services or housing for the homeless. Those living
in areas where the harms of global warming will be greatest, and who
would otherwise see their opportunities quickly diminish in the coming
years, could be kept safe from the harmful effects of super-rich people’s
historically polluting, climate-degrading lifestyles. And even those in the
middle classes—in fact, even the wealthy themselves—could enjoy greater
opportunities. If the increased tax revenue is used to strengthen society’s
safety net, then all citizens would have less reason to worry, and more
opportunity to think creatively and optimistically about the future. In New
York—where there is no public health insurance—families would no longer
have to live dreading a situation where, for example, an employed parent
might lose their job only for their child to become seriously ill. In London,
fewer people would be a paycheck away from homelessness. In the
Netherlands, the government could reverse its closure of sheltered
workplaces for vulnerable adults, which is an important welfare state
provision regardless of how rich the vulnerable person’s family is (sheltered
workplaces not only generate an income, but also make vulnerable people
feel respected and that they belong).

In a limitarian society, there would be enough resources to have expert
healthcare for all. High-quality public education for all. Affordable housing
for all. The opportunity to live a life free from the excessive stress endured
by many workers today. None of this is currently available. In a limitarian
society, these opportunities would be open to all.


There’s So Much We Can Do with the Money
The Covid-19 pandemic was a truly traumatizing time for people around the
world. Millions lost their lives. Some contracted long Covid and are,
months and years after the initial infection, still suffering from debilitating
impairments, such as exceptional fatigue that leaves them unable to spend
time with other people, let alone work. And even those who were not
infected still suffered when, without warning, schools were closed, or when
they lost their jobs, or were compelled to continue working in difficult and
often dangerous conditions. Many elderly people were prevented from
seeing their families and became very lonely, while children, especially
those living in precarious material circumstances, have struggled with their
mental health and accumulated learning deficits.

Very little of this affected the extremely wealthy, who already had access
to many forms of defense against the pandemic. They spent lockdown in
large houses with spacious rooms, which meant that home-schooling was
less of a challenge—especially when tutors could be hired to help their
children catch up on any missed lessons. Their privileged jobs, supported
by the most advanced technological backup—expensive tablets and laptops
and high-speed internet connections—made it easy to keep working while
avoiding meeting other people in person. And if the family started to feel a
bit stressed, there was always the holiday house in the countryside, for a
change of scene.

The pandemic should have taught us a great lesson in humility. It should
have given the lie to the view of human nature that neoliberalism promotes,
with its stress on people as atomized individuals who are each responsible
for their own fate. Our well-being depends radically on what others do for
us, as well as on the structures of our societies.

The rational reaction to being confronted with this collective
vulnerability would have been to work together in fighting our common
enemy, and to focus on protecting the most vulnerable. But it didn’t quite
happen like that. Rich countries collaborated to develop vaccines in an
unprecedentedly short time frame, but hardly shared them with countries
with limited financial resources. There were few signs that the pandemic
had provided the super-rich CEOs of pharmaceutical multinationals with
any reason to question their endless quest for wealth accumulation.

When the pandemic was at its peak during 2020–21, the richest four
hundred American billionaires saw their fortunes grow by $4.5 trillion,
making them 40 percent richer. In the UK, while small businesses faced
closure, the six biggest tech firms increased their market value by $4 trillion
and twenty-four multimillionaires became billionaires. While millions were
dying and billions suffering around the world, the richest were profiting
massively.


Rather than spreading the pain of the pandemic evenly or letting the
stronger shoulders carry more of the burden, inequality of wealth translated
into inequality of suffering: those who had more suffered less. The
pandemic intensified market failures by increasing oligopolistic structures
in several industries, such as food delivery and tech. Monopoly situations
are inefficient and bad for everyone except executive management and
shareholders: they allow companies to increase prices without really losing
customers, and thus produce excess profits. Progressive taxation on those
profits might address this issue, but as we’ve seen, the dominant class have
made sure that corporate profits are taxed much less than workers’ income
—and they have increased the number of fiscal loopholes, meaning they
can pay even less, and sometimes even nothing at all. So, while families
were mourning loved ones who died because they didn’t have the luxury of
working in safe conditions, the dominant class did what it has always
excelled at: accumulate money.

What would the alternative have looked like? If governments had
effectively taxed today’s decamillionaires and billionaires, they could have
used the revenue to provide everyone with protective masks and home test
kits. They could have provided unemployment relief for those who lost their
jobs, particularly given that, under pandemic circumstances, finding a new
one was often not possible. They could have installed proper ventilation
equipment in schools, which would have lowered the risk of the virus
spreading, while allowing schools to remain open. They could have
distributed laptops and free Wi-Fi to poor households, so that children and
students from disadvantaged families would have had adequate learning
facilities while at home.

If we had tax rates of the kind implemented before the neoliberal era,
and clamped down on tax avoidance and evasion, governments would be
more able to take the steps needed to protect and support all of us—whether
during a pandemic or at other times. An effective, progressive tax rate
(especially on income from capital and wealth) is not only justified on the
grounds that no one can be said to deserve extremely high levels of wealth
and income. It is also more efficient: the overall level of well-being in
society would be higher (and in some very unequal countries vastly higher)
if the surplus money were either redistributed to those who have very little,
or else used to fund public goods that benefit us all.

Behind this claim lies a fundamental insight known as the declining
marginal value of money. The idea was first developed by the British
Utilitarians Jeremy Bentham and John Stuart Mill during the eighteenth and
nineteenth centuries, and it is shared among economists, psychologists, and
philosophers. The basic intuition is very simple: the more money you have,
the less any additional unit of money contributes to your quality of life.

Suppose we can increase a person’s monthly income by $1,000. If you
are currently poor, or living near the poverty line, this will be
transformational. People living with an income around the poverty line can
only afford the essentials. In fact, often these essentials are only for physical
survival, and do not include what is required for emotional well-being or
social participation. Children who grow up in poverty are often hindered in
developing friendships. They are ashamed to bring their friends home, so no
friends visit. They cannot attend birthday parties since their parents have no
money for birthday presents. As teenagers, they cannot join their classmates
on trips to the mall or the movies, since they will often need to work after
school and on weekends to help keep the family afloat.

For someone who belongs to the dominant class, an extra $1,000 will
make no difference. If you have millions in assets, or if you have a yearly
income of a few hundreds of thousands or more, a monthly increase of
$1,000 won’t really affect what you are able to do, or how you are able to
live. The additional (or marginal) increase in welfare that money brings thus
declines the more you have.

Scholars dispute whether the value of additional sums of money always
remains positive but at a decreasing rate, or whether at some point we
encounter a saturation point. That seems to depend on your underlying
understanding of well-being. If you take well-being to mean having your
basic human needs met, and being able to do a range of things that are
broadly considered by your society to help you flourish, then there will be a
saturation point. You can eat more and better food, and you can have more
and better clothing, but at some point you will have everything a person
needs. There is no point in having twenty pairs of shoes.

If well-being is understood as having your desires met, no matter what
those desires may be, and no matter which new desires you develop
tomorrow, then there might not be a saturation point. It is always possible to
want another object or experience that costs money. Think of unique
paintings: wouldn’t it be nice to have a Van Gogh in your house? Or to fly
to space as a tourist? We now know from the space trip that Jeff Bezos
organized that a single person can buy a twelve-minute-long flight to space
for $28 million. Wouldn’t that be amazing!2
Sure, it might be, but it’s also unreasonable to expect that such fanciful
thinking should become anything more than that. There are many reasons
why we shouldn’t go after these excesses in real life, and we are totally
justified in demanding that people forgo them. We can all lead perfectly
good lives without ascending 66.5 miles above Earth, or having The Starry
Night hanging in our living rooms. Art and other forms of cultural heritage
should be available to all to see, learn from, and admire. That’s why we
have museums. And unique experiences that are so exclusive because they
are extremely expensive are simply a very wasteful, often harmful
allocation of money. The $28 million it cost to fly into space for twelve
minutes could have saved an estimated 6,200 lives.3
For many people, the extreme wealth enjoyed by some and the
deprivation suffered by others are fundamentally morally unacceptable.

There is no need to come up with any further arguments than that. I agree.

Other reasons are readily available—if we are willing to acknowledge that
much of our own financial situation is tied to luck, historical injustice, or
unfair trade and tax rules. But this is perhaps the simplest: the excess
money of the rich and super-rich should be reallocated to meet the urgent
needs of the vulnerable and suffering, because this shift of resources would
clearly bring us all into a better world. It is the essence of morality that if
we can prevent suffering at little cost to ourselves, we should do so. Excess
money is money one can easily do without. We should all think about how
much we need, and what we can give up. And, if you are living in a
situation similar to mine in the Netherlands, I would strongly doubt that you
need more than a million euros in personal wealth to live a very good life.

Why sit on that money if it can do so much good elsewhere?
This argument is based on an important assumption: that it is possible to
address today’s most urgent, unmet needs with money. But is that
assumption true?
Among conservatives and neoliberals, there is a mantra that it doesn’t
help to “throw money” at a problem, since most problems cannot be solved
simply by increasing the budget. “More money” doesn’t make people more
responsible. “More money” doesn’t address harmful societal issues such as
endemic corruption. What people need is to pull themselves up by their
bootstraps. What countries need is a government that does not interfere in
its citizens’ lives.

Frankly, this line of reasoning is usually just an excuse for doing
nothing. It enables the super-rich to continue being stingy and uncaring. It’s
true that most problems require more than just cash. For a few problems,
money may not even be the most urgent or most important thing that is
needed; think of issues such as granting LGBTQ+ people equal rights. But
for almost all problems that go beyond granting rights where rights are due,
the smartest, proven solutions also require funding.

Obviously, foremost among these is extreme poverty. What does it mean
to be extremely poor? We have all seen images of exhausted children who
are no more than skin and bones;of famine victims who are still alive, but
so undernourished and weakened that it is only a matter of time before they
will die.

Many development experts have argued that money is not the solution.

Institution-building is the answer. Combating corruption, holding politicians
to account, respecting property rights, supporting entrepreneurship. These
experts are right in so far as simply throwing cash at a government in a
developing country in many cases leads to money spent badly, often via the
enrichment of kleptocrats. Yet the fact that many forms of financial transfer
from rich to poor countries are not currently helping to end poverty doesn’t
imply that there are no other ways to use money to effectively and
efficiently change the circumstances of the most deprived on Earth.

In April 2011, a colleague and I visited the village of Otjivero in
Namibia. Dirk Haarmann, at that time a pastor of the Lutheran Church in
the capital Windhoek, was guiding us through the village and introducing us
to the villagers. I still vividly recall Dirk’s explanation of what it meant, in
this village, to be poor. Poverty meant not only that there was no food, and
no money to buy food. It also meant that there was no one around you to
whom you could go and ask for food. A young child cries, he is hungry.

What can the mother do? She starts to boil water. The sound of boiling
water makes the child believe food is being prepared. The mother keeps on
telling the child that food is being prepared, and eventually he becomes so
exhausted that he falls asleep. The mother has bought herself some time.

She can only pray that tomorrow there will be some opportunity to find
something to eat. Being poor, to these villagers, meant that life was literally
a daily struggle for survival.

The most straightforward way to connect money to poverty is by giving
money to the poor, no questions asked. Dirk and his wife Claudia were
members of Namibia’s Basic Income Grant (BIG) Coalition that had long
been arguing for a nationwide unconditional basic income of 100 Namibian
dollars (about US$14) each month. This would increase the income of the
poorest 20 percent of the population by 50 percent. In order to see what the
effects on poverty and economic activity of such an unconditional basic
income would be, Namibia’s BIG Coalition had introduced a pilot in one
village back in 2008.4 That village was Otjivero.

Between January 2008 and December 2009, everyone who lived in the
area was registered on the scheme and given a basic income of 100
Namibian dollars per month. Most residents had settled in the area because
they had nowhere else to go; the village was plagued by unemployment and
deep poverty.

Despite the fact that the income was very modest, it had significant
effects on the villagers’ lives. Before the experiment started, 76 percent of
residents were living below the “food poverty line” (the minimum amount
of money one needs not to go hungry and forgo basic necessities). One year
after the introduction of the basic income, the number of residents who did
not have the money to afford basic daily provisions dropped to 37 percent.

The scheme encouraged significant migration into the village. Poor family
members of the residents moved to Otjivero, even if they were not eligible
for a grant themselves. Without that migration, researchers estimated that
the poverty rate would have dropped even further, to 16 percent. Child
malnutrition decreased from 42 percent to 10 percent. The drop-out rate at
the local school, which was often the result of parents being unable to pay
school fees, fell from 40 percent to almost zero. There was also an
increased use of the local health clinic. All of these are clear indicators of an
overall decrease of poverty, and an increase in well-being.

One of the things that struck me most when we visited the village was
the near absence of a visible economy of the kind one would see in an urban
area. The village was a long way from the nearest town, and the residents
had no money to afford transportation. How are you supposed to build a
livelihood if your local area has hardly any resources, and nothing to offer
by way of opportunities, or even hope? Still, as my colleague and I traveled
through Namibia over the next few days, several of the people we spoke to
and who were interested in what we were studying, responded with the
typical neoliberal trope: yes, we should support the poor, but only the poor
who deserve it, those who are willing to work. Such reactions were so out
of sync with reality for the inhabitants of Otjivero. They were not poor
because they didn’t work; rather, they didn’t work because there were no
jobs and they were too poor to create job opportunities themselves. Not
only were they too undernourished; there was simply no economy that
offered them jobs. It seems a no-brainer that only a generous injection of
resources would make it possible to kick-start an economy (as we’ve seen
before, when the Marshall Plan injected massive resources into Western
Europe to rebuild it after the Second World War).

The introduction of a basic income enabled the residents of Otjivero to
start up some small businesses—such as brick-making or dressmaking.

People organized informal saving groups to which every member
contributed monthly, meaning that then, in turn, they had access to a larger
amount of money. One local resident, Frida Nembwaya, invested her
family’s basic income in an oven, and started to bake traditional bread rolls.

Soon she was baking two hundred rolls a day, seven days a week. Clearly,
small businesses such as these not only help to generate a virtuous
economic circle, but also gave residents more self-esteem. They were no
longer poor, hungry villagers, but villagers equipped with the means they
needed to improve their lives. As Ms. Nembwaya wrote on her newly built
house made from sheets of zinc: “Good life after struggle.”5
The basic-income experiment in Otjivero was part of an increasing use
of direct cash transfers by governments and NGOs. They can be either
unconditional as in Otjivero, or conditional on meeting certain
requirements. At the national level, Mexico launched Oportunidades
(Opportunities) in 2002, and Brazil introduced Bolsa Família (Family
Allowance) in 2003—both of which reached millions of people, with
positive effects on the well-being of the poor. These were large-scale,
government-supported transfer schemes, yet they were conditional: families
received modest cash transfers if their kids would regularly attend school
and if family members would pay visits to health clinics and participate in
workshops on hygiene and nutrition.

Since 2008, there have been subsequent experiments in which small
amounts have been given to very poor people directly and the results
studied by economists. The emerging body of research makes it possible to
draw firmer conclusions about the effects of unconditional cash transfers in
these extremely poor settings. We now know that giving poor people
unconditional cash transfers has positive effects on their savings, on their
possession of consumer durables (such as an oven), and their overall quality
of life. Despite the argument commonly used against unconditional cash
transfers, that poor people will spend the money irresponsibly, researchers
have found that these transfers do not increase the amount of money poor
people spend on alcohol and tobacco.6
An unconditional cash transfer is also simply a very efficient way of
giving; it comes with much smaller overheads than with means-tested cash
transfers, which are only given to a particular group if they can prove that
they meet certain conditions. The latter require much more bureaucratic
oversight and testing to determine who gets what—which costs time and
money. And moreover, unconditional cash transfers are much more
respectful to the poor than cash transfers that can only be used for one
particular goal. It affords poor people dignity and respect, acknowledging
that they know best when it comes to what they need.

There is, however, an important downside to the idea of freely giving the
poor small sums of money: these contributions to individuals can only go so
far in addressing systemic poverty. Solid institutions are extremely
important to economic prosperity—think of a stable currency, a reliable
government, the eradication of corruption, and a separation of governmental
powers that prevents politicians from raiding their country’s natural
resources for their own benefit, among other things. All of that is true. But
making the case for unconditional cash transfers for the global poor does
not imply that this is all that is required. Quite the reverse.

Obviously, the political and financial elite in the Global North should
stop supporting dictators and exploiting countries in the Global South for
their natural resources and cheap labor. But beyond this, former European
colonizers—as well as the US, a de facto colonizer—should acknowledge
that they have historically exploited those countries for their own interests
(in addition to other more noble goals they may have had), and should
compensate them for past damages. This is, at present, not a popular
proposal in Europe or the US, whose populations largely choose to ignore
the role their governments have had in making it harder for people and
governments in the Global South to function and thrive. It is easier to brand
such analyses as “woke” or “radical,” and duck the difficult questions. But
we have a responsibility that we cannot shirk. Ending extreme poverty will
require a package of different types of measures, and unconditional cash
grants would be a very powerful instrument in that overall package. The
wealth that will be needed to fund these measures must first of all come
from the super-rich, before we turn to the rich and middle classes.

Jeffrey Sachs has also argued along these lines, saying that we should
use the excess wealth in the world to address hunger, specifically. Sachs is a
renowned economist at Columbia University in New York, where he directs
the Center for Sustainable Development. He is also the president of the UN
Sustainable Development Solutions Network and holds many other leading
positions across the globe.

In a powerful speech that he gave at the UN Food Systems Pre-Summit
in July 2021, he addressed several of the ills of global inequality. In just
seven minutes, he made clear how much damage has been done. Sachs
reminded his audience that the US has a long track record of installing
politicians in power in countries that are important either because the
American dominant class needs natural resources or because it needs
something else from the Global South—cheap labor without much
regulation that protects workers, for example. He then criticized rich
countries for not looking at the actual financial needs of the poor, but
instead promising very modest amounts in financial support. It almost
looked like rich countries were motivated to do this only because they had
to tick a box to say that they’d given something. Instead, the world needed a
change of attitude, and to give a sum of the right order of magnitude,
adequate to meet people’s actual needs. But then where would this money
come from? Here’s what Sachs had to say:
The rich individuals are increasingly hoarding everything. If the billionaires want to go to
space, they could at least leave their money on Earth to solve the critical Earthbound problems.

We now have an estimated 2,775 billionaires with a combined net worth of around $13.1
trillion. I have it on good authority that you don’t need more than $1 billion to live
comfortably. Even if every billionaire kept $1 billion, that would leave around $10 trillion for
ending hunger, poverty, and environmental destruction. We should be taxing the vast and
rapidly growing billionaire wealth to help finance a civilized world.7
This is, exactly, the limitarian argument (although $1 billion is putting the
threshold too high).

Extreme global poverty is a clear case where a huge overall gain in wellbeing would be achieved if we were to use the excess money of the superrich to help the poor. But extreme global poverty is not the only unmet
urgent need we are facing. There are other burning issues that require our
attention.

One such problem is poverty in rich economies. According to the OECD,
on average about 12 percent of people in the affluent countries live in
poverty. Yet there are notable differences: at the lower end, in a country
such as Finland, 6 percent of residents are impoverished, whereas in the US
around 15 percent live in poverty. Moreover, 40 percent of people in rich
countries are financially insecure.8 In all these countries, people are
suffering because they have drawn an unlucky ticket from the lottery of
birth, or have been struck by bad luck later in life. Or they happen to have
colored skin, be a migrant, or have a disability—all factors that make
deprivation more likely, given the racism, xenophobia, and ableism rife in
rich societies. So, clearly, there is no silver-bullet strategy for addressing all
these problems at once. But nevertheless, much of that suffering could be
ameliorated if we took simple policy measures to address endemic poverty
—most of which cost money. For so many of the actions and policies that
are needed to make the world better, we need smart thinking, good design,
and hardworking and honest individuals to implement them. But also,
plainly, we need money.

There are very visible forms of poverty in rich countries, especially in
the case of homelessness. But other forms of poverty can remain invisible
to the public eye, as when people lack basic necessities such as food or
healthcare. The shame and stigma attached to poverty is considerable, and
many people who are struggling will try to hide their penury from others.

Once in a while, when poor people’s attempts to hide their poverty fail, and
a case is picked up by the media, it creates national outrage.

In October 2022, there was an outcry in the Netherlands. One Monday
morning, a child attending a school in Rotterdam became sick. He had been
experiencing severe headaches and was feeling unwell. The teacher called
his mother to come and pick him up, which is how she learned that they
hadn’t had any food since Saturday, simply because there was no money
left in the household. This was not an isolated case. Teachers in schools
across the Netherlands have been warning that children from poor
households often come to school without having had breakfast. They have
argued for free healthy breakfasts at schools, so that children do not have to
try to concentrate on an empty stomach. We know that the problem is
getting worse: more and more families are relying on food banks for part of
their groceries. If there were more tax revenue available, the government
could offer free meals for all students. This policy is easy to implement and,
of course, a matter of political priorities: public schools in New York City
already offer free breakfast and lunch to all students.9
How is it possible that in such affluent countries there are people who
are going hungry? On the one hand, the economic rules of the game are
rigged such that the profit-maximizing strategies of businesses can make it
impossible for those on low incomes to meet their needs. Some items that
everyone needs to spend money on, such as medication or housing, are for
many too expensive. Although there are also significant differences between
countries, we have seen that, increasingly, wages and benefits for the poor
are no longer high enough to make ends meet; benefits for the poor,
unemployed, and disabled have become much more difficult to access; and
the austerity measures that have been implemented since the 2008 financial
crash have made it harder for the poorest and most vulnerable to stay afloat.

These developments can all be traced back to the rise of neoliberalism, the
trickling-up of wealth, and the decline of the welfare state. It is a story of
decline that has been sharply depicted in the 2022 documentary The
American Dream and Other Fairy Tales, in which Abigail Disney and
Kathleen Hughes examine what happened to workers at California’s
Disneyland. While in the 1950s and 1960s workers at the theme park could
still live comfortable, middle-class lives, many are now trapped in poverty,
thanks to declining wages and increased living costs. At the same time,
Disneyland enjoys major financial support from the local government. And
Disneyland’s CEO earns 2,000 times the salary of a Disneyland
“custodian,” up from 78 times in 1967.10
Often the suffering of the poor is caused, or made worse, by bad social
institutions and poor government regulation. The case of health deficits in
the US is a painful example. America is one of the richest countries on
Earth. Yet it also has one of the most expensive and inequitable healthcare
systems. Good healthcare and affordable medication depend on your
insurance provider, which again depends on the generosity of your
employer (or the employer of your spouse). In early 2023, the world learned
that Hody Childress, a local farmer in Alabama, had given anonymous
donations to his local pharmacy for more than a decade. Thanks to his
donations, local residents who couldn’t pay for prescription drugs were still
able to access those drugs for free. The generosity of Mr. Childress is
heartwarming. At the same time, the idea that in such a rich country people
should need to depend on the goodwill of an anonymous local donor to get
access to prescription drugs is infuriating. Our human right to healthcare
shouldn’t depend on the odds that we have a neighbor who is
extraordinarily generous. A nationwide study showed that almost one in
four Americans has trouble paying for their prescription. At the same time,
the big players in the pharmaceutical industry have a profit margin almost
double that of the big companies in other industries: 13.8 percent vs. 7.7
percent. Unsurprisingly, it is an industry that has produced a large number
of billionaires on the Forbes list.11
There is nothing preventing the American government from regulating
the pharmaceutical industry in order to ensure companies can make a
reasonable but not exorbitant profit, while the needs of citizens can still be
met. The Canadian as well as most European systems are more efficient and
less expensive. But the first thing solutions like this require is for us to
recognize that, when it comes to profits, the sky should not be the limit.

And, perhaps, that not all goods should be provided via the market
mechanism.12
The examples of hungry schoolchildren in the Netherlands and patients
who can’t pay for prescription drugs in America are only two out of a whole
list of forms of deprivation in rich societies. Schools that provide education
for students with disabilities and developmental disorders are underresourced, unable to attract the most qualified teachers, and have class sizes
that are too large to properly encourage the development of those
vulnerable children. Organizations that help students who have had to flee
their home countries are constantly looking for funds to support these bright
young refugees hoping to finish their degrees. The homeless are in
desperate need of permanent shelter, since without a house it is very hard to
find a job and break the vicious cycle of unemployment, hunger, and
instability. And so on—the list is long. Too long.

In a limitarian world we would find much less poverty, and far fewer unmet
needs. And beyond this, the funds from the increase in tax revenue would
allow us to tackle “collective-action problems,” too. This is a category of
problem in which a group of people, rather than cooperating as they should
to solve the problem effectively, are failing to do so because of conflicting
personal interests. Solving a collective-action problem requires
coordination, typically from the government. These are issues that require
structural solutions, rather than individual acts. These are also problems
that, once they are solved, benefit everyone.

The most urgent current example is, of course, climate change and the
biodiversity crisis. There is no single solution, and no individual can solve
this problem on their own. We may decide to avoid taking airplanes or
eating animal-based products. We may decide to rewild our gardens. All of
this is admirable—and valuable as a means of raising awareness and
creating community among people who are working toward a better world
—but it won’t solve the crisis, even if we do manage to convince all our
neighbors to join us. As we saw, we need a green strategy that entails
different climate and biodiversity action at the highest level: vastly
increasing the production of renewable energy and getting rid of fossil
fuels; developing new, greener technologies; providing poor people with
off-grid electricity from renewable sources; drastically decreasing the
number of livestock; buying land to protect it from excess cultivation;
buying up the most environmentally damaging firms; and so forth. None of
this can happen without the coordinating power of the government. And
none of this can happen without money.

In addition to addressing collective-action problems, the government
could also use the additional cash to set entrepreneurial goals that would
have positive spill-over effects for the entire economy. Recall Mariana
Mazzucato’s observation in The Entrepreneurial State that the government
has historically been a very important engine of innovation. In fact, it is
much more important in this regard than is often believed. There is a good
reason why this kind of incentivization is a task for the government:
because major inventions require smart individuals able to work to a long
time scale without being pressured to contribute to short- or medium-term
profits. The state is the best, perhaps even the only, institution that can fund
risky, long-term research, since it can cope with failures, and is not
pressured by shareholders who want a short-term return on their
investments.

With the rise of neoliberalism the view spread that the government was
unproductive, and that entrepreneurs were the true and only agents of
innovation. Mazzucato has shown that this does not fit with the historical
track record. Most crucial innovations did not stem from private sector,
venture capital investments in the market but relied on government
subsidies. In a more recent book, Mission Economy, she has argued that
governments should aim for major innovations not only as ends in
themselves, but because they can lead to unexpected additional innovations
that will improve economic growth and welfare. She mentions the mission
to get a man on the moon as one such ambitious government-led innovative
plan, which led to the development and design of new technologies and
materials in a wide range of fields such as electronics, navigation,
communications, textiles, and nutrition. If the tax-raising capacity of the
government were restored, it could once again engage in such “moonshot”
ambitions.13
The bottom line is simply this: there is so much good our governments
could do with the excess money of the super-rich. And taking it from them
would probably not affect their welfare at all—not in any meaningful sense.

If there is a slight drop in the luxury of their lifestyles, it would be
massively outweighed by the gains to others, and the gains to the common
good.

On reading this, some will ask: isn’t this a case of killing the goose that
lays the golden eggs? If we curtail individual freedom to accumulate
wealth, then won’t we hurt not just the richest, but, in the end, everyone else
too? Won’t the collective cake shrink; won’t more people suffer? Won’t
limitarianism backfire?
This killing-the-goose objection is also known as the “incentives
objection.” The idea is that if we want someone to make an extra effort,
they will need to see material gain from putting in the extra effort,
otherwise they will have no incentive to do so. This argument assumes that
limitarianism entails a very strong disincentive for almost-rich people to
contribute more to the economy by putting in more hours, working harder,
innovating in smarter ways, and doing more business—though, as we saw
with Peter van der Veer, the relationship between performance and pay is
not as straightforward as this. Still, the consensus view among economists
is that the so-called “optimal top marginal taxation rate” for income tax,
which is the rate at which total tax revenues are maximized, is between 70
and 80 percent. If you increase the top marginal taxation rate much further,
then total tax revenues will decrease.14
The first point we should make here is that limitarianism does not
necessarily mean a top income tax rate of 100 percent. If we are able to
make substantial structural changes to the economy, ensuring that the
division of what we all produce together is fairer, then there will be much
less need for the fiscal system to intervene and claim the excess wealth. In
practical terms, this could be achieved by having minimum wages set at the
level of a living wage; by breaking up corporations that have a monopoly;
by protecting unions and criminalizing union-busting; and by taking other
measures to ensure that there is no group in the economy that has too much
power. These measures would leave us with much more modest top
incomes, and hence we might not need a 100 percent tax rate. In addition,
we need to focus much more on taxes on wealth, profits, inheritance, and
capital gains, as these are currently very low or nonexistent. In any case, it
is crucial that we think of limitarianism not just in terms of income tax, but
rather as a guiding principle that can help us to structure an economy that
results in less inequality in the first place.

The second point to make is that if a limitarian economy did turn out to
disincentivize workers, this might weaken the case for having a hard,
political limit to extreme wealth—but it certainly doesn’t affect the ethical
case. After all, as the Oxford philosopher G. A. Cohen has argued, in a fair
world there would be no justification for incentive-based inequalities that
benefit the most productive. In a just world, the most productive citizens
would accept that the moral arguments for permitting inequalities are very
limited. The genuinely moral case for allowing inequality is, as we’ve seen,
limited to inequalities due to compensation for differences in the burdens of
work (risk, investment in learning, and levels of stress) and differences in
the effort and hours people put into their jobs. But that is not what the
incentives objection is pointing to: the incentives objection is about people
bargaining their way out of limitarianism in order to get a better deal for
themselves, rather than having a real moral reason for keeping their money
or receiving more of it.15
Within the upper limit of ten million pounds, dollars, or euros, there is
plenty of leeway to accommodate justified incentives. But in our unjust
world, we are swamped by unjust incentives claims: these are pragmatic
concessions in a bargaining game, made by people who happen to be in a
strong position, which they would not have reached without at least some
pivotal amount of luck and profiting from the effects of unjust societal
structures that benefit the rich, but above all the super-rich.

One assumption that this objection makes is that the disincentive is real.

But is it? Would very high-earning people really stop doing what they do if
the highest marginal tax rate on income were, say, 90 percent, or would
entrepreneurs stop selling their products if the highest tax rate on profits
were 90 percent? Why would they do that? Is it not much more plausible
that most people who are currently extremely high up in the economic
pecking order no longer work for money, but rather for the status, networks,
and power that come with that position? In their book Against Inequality,
the Canadian professor Tom Malleson considers the findings of empirical
studies that look into whether the rich and super-rich work less if they are
taxed more, and concludes that we have no evidence that this happens. At
the very top, people are motivated much more by power and prestige, and
thus won’t reduce their professional involvement if they earn less after
paying taxes.16
We are faced, once again, with a widespread belief based on an
ideological assumption about what motivates people. The idea of human
nature embedded in neoliberalism tells us that material gain is what drives
people, but why should this be the case? And even if it were (to some
extent) the case, then we must not forget, either, that the degree to which
people need to be rewarded in order to contribute can change with the
zeitgeist. Neoliberal ideology, with its “greed is good” mantra, makes some
people believe that they are stupid if they do not go after the highest
possible wage, or the highest possible income. But why? Why should this
be the case? If we get used to being contented with fair remuneration for
work or entrepreneurship, and we divide up the benefits of what we produce
together more equitably, then it will become rare that one encounters zero
financial reward for additional effort.

Besides, even if there were zero financial reward for putting in
additional effort, it does not follow that you would get zero overall reward
for putting in that effort. A lot of people put in a lot of effort all the time for
zero financial reward—think of all the people who do voluntary work, or
activists who fight for the common good when the government or
companies have dropped the ball (as in climate action, or the generous
farmer in Alabama!). Or take the work of a teacher. Teachers regularly go
the extra mile for students who need more support, without receiving extra
pay. Teachers across the globe work regular overtime. When we ask them
why they do it, it’s rare to hear the term “reward” or “money” in their
answer. They do it out of an intrinsic motivation to do their work well,
following professional moral codes. They take their profession as a
vocation and do what it takes to do it well—within reason, of course. Yet
for those who like to use the terminology of reward, one might say what the
teachers are rewarded with is the pleasure and satisfaction of seeing kids
and teenagers grow and develop. They are rewarded in human flourishing.17
Bringing non-financial incentives into the discussion leads to the
following question: are there non-financial rewards or incentives that could
prompt highly productive people to make a greater effort such that society
at large benefits? Have we taken that question sufficiently seriously? Have
we properly investigated how we can introduce new forms of credit and
recognition that do bestow honor and gratitude on a person without making
them excessively rich? In science, most rewards work this way. Often there
is no financial prize, as with honorary doctoral degrees. If there is, it is not
generally meant to enrich the scientist or scholar receiving it. Instead, those
funds flow back into research and education. Everyone benefits from
scientific discoveries and scholarly insights; professors and researchers
share them as public goods for all of humanity. Why can’t that model also
be applied in other industries?
Sure, some might respond, it would be better if the fortunes of the rich
were used to benefit us all. But the best way to do this is by encouraging the
rich to engage in philanthropic giving. Isn’t the solution just to develop a
stronger philantrophic culture, so that the rich donate more of their wealth
to good causes?

Philanthropy Is Not the Answer
Remember Chuck Feeney, the guy who accumulated billions and then gave
it all away? Feeney acquired his fortune through a combination of hard
work and an astute business sense. He used the same entrepreneurial skills
and energy in the process of donating it. Feeney donated his billions for
laudable reasons: he felt that he didn’t need the money, and saw how much
good could be done with it elsewhere. More than that: he felt that giving his
money away while he was still alive was a smart way of achieving
happiness. If you only start giving after you die, you can’t enjoy the giving.

Feeney was born into a working-class family in 1930s Pennsylvania. The
enormous wealth that he would accumulate later in life would not change
his loyalty to the values and culture of the people he grew up with. As a
young man, he signed up to join the US Army knowing that this would give
him free entry to college upon completion. He learned Japanese while
stationed in Japan, and after he served his time, he went to Cornell
University on a military scholarship to study hotel administration.

Feeney’s business model was all about finding legal ways to sell
products without having to pay taxes. Feeney found clever new ways of
selling, duty-free, products that were heavily taxed and thus more expensive
in the US. At first he did so by selling liquor to American soldiers whose
ships were embarking in European ports (he took their orders and sent the
bottles direct to their homes; formally, they took them back from their trips
as “unaccompanied goods”). Later he would set up duty-free shops in
airports in Hawaii, which attracted many Japanese tourists. By the time he
was fifty, he had built the Duty Free Shoppers (DFS) empire, and drew an
annual dividend that for many years surpassed $20 million.

Later in life, Feeney became increasingly unhappy with the fortune he
had amassed. Dismissive of the lifestyles of the super-rich, he decided to
devote his energy and skills to improving the lives of other people. Over the
span of a few decades, Chuck Feeney gave away almost his entire fortune,
more than $8 billion. He gave very large amounts to Irish universities, to his
alma mater Cornell University, to the Vietnamese healthcare system, as well
as toward the peace process in Northern Ireland, along with many other,
smaller causes. Feeney lived according to his own motto: “give while
living.”1
For a very long time, Feeney was able to donate anonymously, which led
to Forbes describing him as “the James Bond of philanthropy.” At a certain
point, however, due to a legal dispute with a previous business partner, he
could no longer remain anonymous. Since then, he has received praise from
all corners of the globe for his extremely generous giving. No one has ever
given away such a large percentage of their fortune while alive. Warren
Buffet has called him “my hero.” Bill Gates has gone on record saying that
Feeney “sets an example for all of us.” Forbes awarded him the 2014
Lifetime Achievement for Philanthropy. In 2012, all the universities of
Ireland, North and South, bestowed a doctor honoris causa on him. In
2022, the University of Queensland also gave Feeney an honorary doctorate
in recognition of his generosity to Australia in general and the university in
particular, as well as announcing it would open a “Feeney Way” on one of
its campuses.2
In short, the admiration and gratitude for Chuck Feeney’s generosity has
been overwhelming, and it has repeatedly been said that all billionaires
should follow his example. It shouldn’t be a surprise that so many regard
him as a hero. Imagine how things would be if all billionaires acted like
him. That would be a limitarian world! Wouldn’t it?
If I were a neoliberal thinker or politician, this would indeed be where
the story would end. I do feel enthusiastic about Feeney’s attitude to giving.

But a proper moral analysis should go deeper, and pose questions that might
be potentially uncomfortable. In the case of any millionaire or billionaire—
whether they choose to give away their money or not—we need to ask a
few questions. We must ask, first of all, how much of that money is dirty. In
the case of the entrepreneurial super-rich, we must ask whether they and
their firms have respected the human rights (including labor rights) of their
employees. We must ask whether they have avoided paying taxes by
manipulating or even changing the law. And we must ask whether their
income-generating activities have happened at the cost of the environment.

Unfortunately, Feeney’s biography suggests that, for some of these
questions, the answers are troubling.

Feeney built his entire business empire on the basis of tax avoidance. He
set up his first office in Liechtenstein, a fiscal paradise. He was not legally
allowed to be there, so he stayed in hotel rooms, where he and his
employees had to check in and out regularly to stay out of the hands of the
police. Later, he listed his shares in the company under the name of his
French wife, so that he didn’t have to pay tax in the US. She was in no way
involved in the business. When one of the international tax differences that
his businesses had been exploiting was about to end due to a change in the
law, Feeney and his lawyers stayed for a while in Washington to engage in
direct lobbying. So there is no doubt that Feeney’s dedication to tax
avoidance has cost American (and international) tax collectors dearly—and
thus, too, US citizens, who could have decided democratically what to do
with that lost revenue. They might have chosen to devote those billions to
something other than Feeney’s alma mater or to massively investing in Irish
universities.

What lessons can we draw from Chuck Feeney’s example? The first is
that our assessment of a given person’s philanthropy needs to take in the
broader picture. The first rule a rich person should follow is to earn their
money in a morally sound way, before even thinking about philanthropy.

Some might take offense here. Is it not wildly misplaced and even crass
to start asking critical questions of someone who gave away his entire
fortune, almost $8 billion? Most super-rich people give only a tiny fraction
of that amount, and instead prefer to build up dynastic wealth, passing most
of it on to their children. Or they spend it on things as crazy and wasteful as
golden toilets. Are we expecting philanthropists to be saints?
Of course, if I were to meet Chuck Feeney, I would not start complaining
about his taxes. This is not about the individual. This is about social
structures, and about politics. Our analysis is meant to contribute to a
forward-looking agenda. Yes, we can talk about how public–private
partnerships can improve the world. We can talk about how much good
philanthropy can do. But first we need to talk about the basic structures of
our societies, about the social contract; about the basic agreements made in
our parliaments, and our international economic treaties. We need to decide
whether we should allow so much tax avoidance and evasion, and so much
lobbying for the legislation that facilitates it. We need to think about
whether we should press each other to live according to the spirit of the law
rather than the most self-serving legal interpretation of it.

Laxness in this regard has contributed to the current state of affairs,
helping Feeney to accumulate the fortune that he later gave away. This is
the second lesson to draw from Feeney’s exceptional example: when it
comes to philanthropy, the personal is political.

We cannot talk about philanthropy without considering its relation to
government and taxation. Philanthropy is often needed because the
government is failing to meet urgent unmet needs. Think of food banks: if
governments had effective poverty-reduction strategies, we wouldn’t need
this form of charity. On the flip side, any form of tax avoidance or evasion
(upon which most large fortunes depend) has a clear negative impact on
disadvantaged stakeholders: the workers or consumers who have to pay
more tax in order to compensate for the decline in tax revenue, or who
suffer the consequences of there being inadequate funding for essential
public services.

This is not just a matter of logic. We can also map out the relation
between philanthropy, unmet needs, and taxation by looking at the data.

With a poverty rate of 15 percent, the US is doing worse than almost all
European countries; the UK is, with a poverty rate of 11 percent, doing
better than the US, but slightly worse than most Western European
countries. The data for income inequality looks even worse: almost all
European countries, as well as Canada, South Korea, and Japan, do better
than the UK and the US. These are just two indicators of the broader picture
that Western European countries have better-developed social protection
and redistributive measures than the UK, and even more so than the US.3
Yet the influence and importance of big philanthropy is exactly the
opposite. Of the 100 biggest philanthropic foundations, 90 are based in the
US, 5 in the UK, and the remaining 5 are divided between Canada and
continental Europe.4 In other words: the political and indeed moral
discussion of philanthropy has a distinctly Anglo-American flavor. And that
is because other countries, including those of Western Europe, have chosen
an economic model in which only a few can earn billions and subsequently
set up philanthropic foundations. And there is, at the same time, also much
less need for these foundations, since these governments have the resources
to meet more of their citizens’ needs. Yet there are voices in continental
Europe saying that they, too, should mobilize the goodwill of very rich
citizens more, in order to help governments who are said to no longer be
able to provide the support that they gave in the past. But do we really want
the hungry schoolboy in Rotterdam to receive his breakfast courtesy of a
local philanthropist, while the richest avoid taxes on a grand scale, and
various fossil industries are given annual tax cuts of up to €30 billion?5
I don’t think this is a path we should follow. Philanthropists are not a
substitute for a properly functioning government. If philanthropists pick up
the slack for the government, the government is handed a convenient
excuse to continue not fulfilling its duties. And those whose needs are met
by philanthropists are deprived of a say in what happens.

An appraisal of philanthropy must therefore always be part of a broader
discussion of tax and the public goods and services that the government
provides. And it must also form part of an even wider discussion of other
possible worlds. The most fundamental question that anyone who wants to
look critically at philanthropy must answer is: why do we need a
government at all? After all, can’t philanthropists do what governments are
doing right now—only much more efficiently?
We should start by recalling that a properly functioning government and
a shared set of rules are the basis of our social contract—what is saving us
from lawlessness and violence. The idea that we do not need a government
is plainly absurd. The real question is what we want that government to do
for us.

Most conservatives and libertarians are against “big government.” Their
objection is that the government interferes too much in our lives, and
unjustly takes money from one person in order to give it to another. The
arguments that we’ve already encountered show that such a view starts
from a mistaken understanding of the extent to which we can say that
something is properly ours. The markets, which are designed and enabled
by the government, are what give us our ability to earn money in a peaceful
and effective way. We accrue any wealth we have by drawing on the
infrastructure and knowledge imparted to us by those around us, and by
those who have come before. Besides, the vast majority of people want to
live in societies with greater collective well-being and much less inequality
than we currently see, and the government is, simply, the best mechanism
we have to accomplish this.

Those who lobby for smaller government tend not to understand this,
especially if they no longer have (or never had) friends or family members
who come from the bottom half of the wealth distribution. As Morris Pearl
of the Patriotic Millionaires has observed, conservative politicians (he was
talking specifically about Mitt Romney) live in a world of their own, where
money is plentiful. Romney had told students that they should borrow
money from their parents so that they didn’t have to work while studying.

In Romney’s universe, every student apparently has parents with enough
money to pay the steep fees of Ivy League universities. No wonder, then,
that he didn’t see the need for student grants and general governmental
support for students.6
There is a very strong case, in terms of social justice and fairness, for
having a government that enables people to thrive, and supports them when
they are in need or when things go wrong. Yet there are people who think
that there is only one goal that matters, and that is efficiency. The purpose
of government is to make the way we organize our interactions more
efficient, and nothing else.

As it turns out, efficiency is a goal that is also much enhanced by having
a more expansive social state. Efficiency has, for decades, been one of the
two main reasons (next to solidarity or fairness) for establishing social
security programs, in particular public health insurance and pension and
unemployment systems. Suppose each of us had to save on our own to
cover the risk of a medical emergency, or of becoming unemployed, or for
income provision during old age. If we couldn’t afford to save because our
wages were very low, then the lack of security would cause us a debilitating
level of stress. If we did have some money to save, then we would tend to
save too much. And that would then suppress our consumption—and hence
our own welfare—during good times, which would have a dampening
effect on the economy as a whole.

When risks are shared among an entire population—we are all at risk of
ill-health, unemployment, and so on—then it is much better to pool them.

And while insurance companies can facilitate this, their focus on profitseeking means that they are unsuited to providing most of these goods. In
the case of healthcare, the information asymmetry and power differences
between a patient and a doctor lead to a type of care that is not the best but
the most profit-maximizing, which costs lives. In the case of unemployment
benefits, unregulated private insurance companies tend to develop a bias
against those who are more likely to become unemployed, whereby they
either charge higher rates for coverage or (if it is not illegal to do so)
decline a “risky” application for insurance. There are very good reasons
why the expansive social security systems in proper welfare states around
the world have been strongly regulated or organized by the government.

And while in monetary terms these are not the richest countries, they are the
ones that score highest in terms of quality of life and happiness or the UN’s
human development indicators. If you care about efficiency, don’t leave
everything to the private sector—don’t just rely on the market and
philanthropy.


It does not follow, however, that a bigger government, measured in terms
of what percentage of national income flows through its hands, will always
make people’s lives better. A neoliberal government might be the same size
as a generous welfare state government, but will reallocate part of its
expenditure from redistribution and social support to systems of control and
oversight of those needy citizens. That is what some European governments
did when they took a neoliberal turn: they increased layers of regulation and
monitoring across the public sector and across the welfare state, purportedly
in order to eliminate “scrounging” or free-riding. There are instances where
control and accountability are indeed necessary, but these measures also
display an outsized distrust in the recipients of benefits, or in the
professionalism of the public-sector workers.

Today, the Dutch government’s attitude toward the needy goes
something like this. Since a poor person cannot be trusted with their welfare
allowance, an army of public servants must be hired for checks and
controls. They must keep tabs on whether the person is receiving gifts from
family members (in cash or in kind). They must ensure that the person
doesn’t have more than a few thousand euros in savings, which is the
maximum they can have to be eligible for state support. And if they have a
disability or disorder, they must go for frequent reassessments to confirm
their inability to work, even if the disability or illness is lifelong and cannot
improve. In his 2016 film I, Daniel Blake, Ken Loach, the unrivaled
socially critical British film director, presents a portrait of how these layers
of control crush people—often the most vulnerable ones. A philanthropist
should distribute free copies of I, Daniel Blake among public servants—
perhaps that would inspire them to pose the questions they need to ask their
superiors.

So it isn’t the case that government control of wealth and resources is
always better for citizens than philanthropy. That depends on whether the
government uses its powers to improve the lives of its citizens, and of any
living creature its policies might affect. Some big governments spend an
enormous amount of taxpayer money on public well-being and for
redistributive purposes; other big governments are hugely inefficient and
spend a lot on mechanisms of control—or, as Noam Chomsky would
remind us, on military infrastructure to maintain geopolitical dominance. It
all depends on their priorities.8
Perhaps because of all this, some rich philanthropists are reluctant to entrust
governments with the redistribution of their wealth. This point was made
powerfully by Abigail Disney in a 2021 article for the Atlantic. As we have
seen, Disney is an outspoken critic of growing wealth inequalities in the
US, and a member of the Patriotic Millionaires. In her article, she describes
“the blueprints for dynastic wealth” that are used to socialize children from
rich families. There are clear rules. Never touch the “corpus” (that is, spend
the capital that you have inherited), so that you can leave it to your children.

Marry someone from your own economic class, since too great a difference
in income and assets (and therefore power) might lead to friction. And use
all the available tools that are within the law to pay as few taxes as possible,
since the government cannot be trusted with that money, and will only
abuse or misspend it.9
The philanthropic advisers and super-rich heirs that I interviewed
confirmed the prevalence of these “rules”—so when I spoke to Abigail
Disney, I asked her why the super-rich felt such distrust toward the
government. I had already gathered part of the answer from other
interviewees, who explained it as a general distrust of government
inefficiency or unwise spending. And this distrust did not just emerge
accidentally; rather, it is one of the most salient features of the neoliberal
turn taken in the last decades of the twentieth century, which was patiently
orchestrated by a coalition of libertarian ideologues and their supporters
from big business.10
Abigail Disney offered an even more sinister explanation, based on what
she had learned from one of her uncles. A deeply conservative man, who
had served in the Reagan administration, he told her that there were many
stupid people who should not be trusted with governing the country. That
task should be left to people who are smart, who know what they are doing.

And those are the people who have been successful—their wealth being an
indicator of how successful, and therefore how smart, they are. To his mind,
being poor essentially meant being stupid, and incapable of governing or
leading. It was best, therefore, to keep the democratically elected
government as small as possible, and as much under the control of rich
people as possible, while using philanthropy as a mechanism to deal with
the major societal problems that required attention.

In other words, one of the reasons why some super-rich people feel the
government should stay small is a stunningly deep-seated, class-based
prejudice that informs how they regard themselves, and how they regard the
poor. They think of themselves as the rightful leaders, as evidenced by the
fact that they are rich. Some, such as the adherents of prosperity theology,
go a step further, and, backed up by a skewed interpretation of Protestant
doctrine, believe that their wealth shows their high degree of moral
worthiness. Most of them think that the poor are to be blamed for their own
predicament, making them unfit to decide on policy. And, they believe,
since governments are democratically elected and therefore run by the
population rather than the smart elite, they should not be trusted with
solving society’s problems. Better to leave that in the hands of the very
wealthy, by giving them much of the actual power, as well as by letting
them keep their money and call the philanthropic shots.11
I have no idea how many tax-dodging philanthropists (knowingly or
unknowingly) subscribe to this way of thinking. But I do know that it gets
the prize for the worst possible reason for endorsing philanthropy over
paying taxes.

It is tricky to speculate why anyone would hold this position. Three
possible explanations come to mind: racism, narcissism, and a general lack
of knowledge of the poor.

Why would racism explain this obnoxious view? When Abigail Disney
told me the story about her uncle, I was reminded of something I had heard
an American labor economist say many years before. A PhD student at
Cambridge University at the time, I attended a talk from a visiting
professor, who afterward went for lunch with a group of students. His
research focused on the effects of a minimum wage on the economy. I asked
him whether there was ever a chance of a basic income being implemented
in the US. He responded that he very much doubted it, because the net
beneficiaries would be the poor. And in America, the poor are
overwhelmingly people of color. His view was that racism was ultimately
the reason why an unconditional basic income was politically unfeasible.

Given the overwhelming whiteness of the wealthy and super-rich in the
USA and beyond, is the general lack of care for the poor thus also
motivated by racism?
And then there is narcissism. It seems hard to deny that some of the
super-rich display narcissistic behavior. It’s a vicious circle: a person’s
narcissistic traits make them (usually “him”) more likely to achieve their
goal of becoming successful, and therefore rich. At the same time, their
narcissism will also prompt them to present this success as being of their
own making. We all suffer from attribution bias, but it seems plausible that
narcissists do so even more. Their success is theirs. Not due to luck, nor to
society’s collective inheritance of infrastructure, knowledge, and
innovation, nor to the collaboration or hard work of others, such as their
teachers when they were young, or, now, their employees.

Or there is the third possible explanation: obliviousness. Most of the rich
and super-rich have surrounded themselves primarily with other very rich
people. So how could they know anything about who the poor are and the
challenges they face? Frankly, they don’t have a clue. So they freely project
cultural prejudices onto their fellow citizens, believing it to be in everyone’s
best interests if successful people make the decisions. And that doesn’t
mean democratically elected politicians, but those who have proven to be
financially successful. The super-rich, in other words.

Let’s assume that most philanthropists don’t have such deeply antidemocratic, misanthropic, racist, and arrogant motives. Let’s also disregard
the super-rich who abuse philanthropy as a wealth-defense strategy—for
example, by hiring family members to do some very well-paid work for a
philanthropic foundation, or by setting up a philanthropic financial structure
that makes it easier to move the money to a fiscal paradise. They are
effectively in the business of tax avoidance.12
Let’s focus instead on those who are genuinely well-meaning. Should we
embrace their philanthropy as the solution to climate change, poverty, and
our other pressing problems? If we want to tackle those issues urgently and
effectively, is philanthropy not a better strategy than limitarianism and other
forms of redistribution?13
Unfortunately, the answer is no. Here’s the biggest problem with
philanthropy: it is deeply undemocratic. This is, of course, affected by
scale. Very small donations—you and I giving a few hundred pounds,
dollars, or euros to charity—don’t undermine democracy. Giving a little is a
bit like going to buy a new outfit: it’s totally fine to make our own choices.

The problem is that some philanthropic donations comprise huge sums, and
thus come with huge power. And the people enjoying that power are not
accountable to anyone. Philanthropists have no one they need to answer to.

And the rest of us have no say over where they spend those vast amounts of
cash.14
One of the scholars who has made the argument, in some detail, that
philanthropy is undemocratic is Rob Reich, a professor in political theory at
Stanford University. In his 2019 book, Just Giving, Reich argues that
philanthropy is not just about charitable giving, but also about plutocratic
power. Many proponents of philanthropy believe that it leads to more
liberty and equality. But, as Reich argues, a closer inspection shows that it
is not doing much, if anything, toward equality. One explanation for this is
the fact that, in its current form, philanthropy is subsidized by tax
deductions, and thus leads to a reduction in tax revenue. That lost revenue
could have been spent on, say, fostering equality of opportunity. But instead
it stays in the pockets of the philanthropists, until they decide to give some
of it away to a cause of their choosing.15
I also worry that the undemocratic nature of philanthropy can escalate
when it leads to a “crowding out” effect—the process whereby
philanthropists take over tasks that should be done by the government. Take
the government’s duty to reduce poverty. In most countries, the population
has democratically decided that their government must fight poverty among
its people, yet their government fails at this task—for example, by not
imposing a proper minimum wage, or by making it bureaucratically
complex for poor people to apply for the benefits for which they are
eligible. Philanthropists step in and try to address the rising deprivation.

This, however, takes away the urgency for the government to get its act
together, since benevolent citizens have already stepped in where the
government has failed in its duty. One can see similar mechanisms at work
in other areas where the government retreats (in part or completely) from
areas where it previously was active—say, in funding for the arts, sports, or
local libraries. The cynical conclusion might then be that having a large
philanthropic sector weakens the demands for a radical overhaul of the
social contract, making it less urgent for the government to close tax
loopholes and start taking its responsibilities seriously. The idea here is that
suffering must be deep enough before political pressure builds up to a
critical point, at which radical change can occur. One of the philanthropic
advisers I spoke to mentioned a very rich conservative donor based in the
US who had given a lot to food banks, motivated, the adviser thought, by
the belief that such donations would lessen the risk of the poor taking up
pitchforks.

Could there, then, never be what philosophers call a “principled
justification” for allowing people to accrue wealth so that they can then
donate it? (This is a justification based on some ultimate moral principle,
independent of any pragmatic considerations or of what the actual effects of
such philanthropic decisions might be.) Rob Reich distinguishes between
two arguments that are sometimes given as principled reasons for
philanthropy. The first is the “pluralism argument.” Because governments
are motivated by short-termism and the interests of the average voter—they
always have their eye on the next election—they are strongly inclined to opt
for only very limited, and low-risk, public-goods provisioning. If public
goods like, say, childcare, libraries, and nature conservation are also
delivered by laypeople, this could complement the government’s typically
restricted approach. Philanthropists and philanthropic foundations can
broaden the type of public goods that are provided, including goods that
serve future generations, as well as those of people whose interests are not
in the political mainstream.

Reich is skeptical. He suggests that the pluralism argument is plausible,
but that it is not strictly necessary, because individuals making relatively
small charitable donations to non-profit organizations may be enough to
achieve this. Moreover, the preferences of the wealthy are not
representative of the preferences of the wider citizenry, so their spending
will retain its plutocratic character.

The second proposed justification is the “discovery argument.” Because
they are not accountable to the competitive pressures of the marketplace,
nor to the pressure of electoral processes, philanthropic foundations can
experiment with riskier, more radical and more long-term social policies
and institutional proposals. They could, for example, heavily invest in the
development of climate technologies that neither the market nor the state
will provide. Bill Gates would presumably agree, as this is precisely what
he has argued rich people should be doing with their money in his recent
book on climate change, as we saw in Chapter 5. Reich believes the
argument for democratic experimentalism is a stronger principled reason for
large-scale philanthropy, since the government’s short-termism does not
afflict foundations. Their lack of accountability, which is often rightly seen
as a democratic problem, can thus be turned on its head and be put to the
service of democracy.


But don’t Reich’s objections to the pluralism argument also hold for the
discovery argument? Couldn’t individuals, each giving a little, pool their
charitable donations and thus fund risky experiments or social
interventions, such as universal basic income trials, or the development of
new green technologies? In fact, this kind of crowdfunding was precisely
what happened with the basic income experiment in Otjivero: the money
came from a coalition of donors, including ordinary people. There is a long
history of economic provisioning by cooperatives. We don’t need to leave it
all up to the market and the government. If they don’t finance the projects
we need, we do not necessarily need to turn to wealthy philanthropists;
thousands of individual citizens could come together to make them happen.

The advantage of this strategy compared with leaving the discovery
processes to philanthropic foundations is that it comes without the
plutocratic power.

It remains difficult to find a principled argument in favor of large-scale
individual philanthropy. Perhaps the best available reason for supporting it
may be found by taking a critical look at the way politics works today. Our
democracies are not well suited to protecting the interests of those who are
not part of the electoral system, such as future generations, or animals and
ecosystems like the rainforests. And some political problems are so
monumental that they are extremely unlikely to be solved by our existing
democratic institutions, except, perhaps, if there is enough political pressure
put on those elected by means of lobbying, protests, civil disobedience, and
so forth. Some of these problems, such as climate change, are time-sensitive
and require urgent, far-reaching interventions that go against the short-term
interests of voters. In such cases, only drastic civil disobedience—leading
to political revolution—may deliver the policies we need. This brings us to
a unique justification for the giving by wealthy philanthropists, since they
are able to fund such political movements instantly, whereas crowdsourcing
is often a slow process, as is electoral change. In short, philanthropists can
use their plutocratic power to help us address an urgent and severe crisis
that democratic institutions, as we currently know them, are much less
likely to address. Philanthropic power can then be used to rescue one form
of democracy (defending the interests of all affected parties, including
future generations) from another form of democracy (policy-making by
majority voting).17
Yet even with this principled reason for philanthropy, two concerns
remain. One is that even if philanthropists use their excess power in a very
good way—to counterbalance the lack of adequate action by the
government—it is still the case that they have an excess of power. Largescale philanthropy will always be problematic because of this power
asymmetry.

The other concern lies in the assumption that philanthropists will know
what is needed. This concern has often been raised in relation to the
effective altruism movement, which calls upon small and large donors to
donate generously, but only in ways that are proven to be most effective by
impact studies. Some versions of effective altruism go even further and call
upon us to earn as much as possible, by almost whatever means possible—
including by working in corporations that are at the heart of neoliberal
capitalism. This is an essentially technocratic approach to addressing social
problems, as if all the requisite information could be deduced from impact
studies. These are certainly relevant, but, like any evaluative tool, they only
look at what they are programmed to measure, and what they measure is not
comprehensive, neglecting, for example, to take into account whether the
recipients of philanthropy should get to decide on what is important to
them. Given that many very rich people think of themselves as being
excellent decision-makers, the risk of hubris is real. They might assume that
they know best, despite the fact that most super-rich people, especially
those who grew up in the upper-middle class or who inherited wealth,
generally have no idea of the lives and struggles of the poorest and most
destitute. They should be humble enough to acknowledge this.

Everything we’ve discussed so far gives us strong principled objections
to big philanthropy. But what does this mean for the messy world in which
we live? People are suffering and dying, and climate change is getting
worse and worse; and our neoliberal governments are doing little about it,
continually failing to increase their revenues through properly taxing the
rich. Wealthy philanthropists are flooded with requests for help. In this
unjust world, what should large-scale donors do?
Let’s start with an open goal. The first thing that any wealthy donor
should do is this: avoid causing further harm through wealth acquisition,
and repair any harm that the creators of their fortune may have done in the
past. They should ask themselves the following questions: Am I exploiting
workers? Am I polluting the environment or engaging in production
processes that harm the health of the local community, or my customers, or
the planet? Am I bending the law to minimize the taxes I pay?
The outdoor-clothing company Patagonia, again, offers a good example
of how to get this right. According to Yvon Chouinard’s memoir, Let My
People Go Surfing, the company never hired anyone from the wealthdefense industry to look into ways that it could avoid paying taxes. It paid
what it had to pay, no more and no less. The company investigated the
environmental impact of its production processes, and changed them so as
to minimize the damage. And then Chouinard gave away all future profits to
environmental activism and nature conservation. There are no university
libraries or wings in the Met emblazoned with his name. Nor is there a
philanthropic foundation making use of fiscal paradises in Bermuda.

Instead, Chouinard and his family paid $17.5 million in taxes on gifts when
they transferred their stocks to the non-profit foundation.18
The second rule for philanthropists in the real world is: support structural
change. What this means, practically speaking, will differ from country to
country, but here are some things it might encompass: Ensuring that
everyone who wants to vote can vote. Supporting organizations and
political parties that fight for the basic principles of liberal democracies,
such as a free press that does not spread lies and propaganda. Supporting
unions and raising awareness among workers of what difference unions can
make to their wages and working conditions. Funding organizations that
fight for tax justice and supporting organizations that uncover major
economic injustices, such as the International Consortium of Investigative
Journalists, who published the Panama Papers.

There is no point in simply relieving the symptoms while doing nothing
to address the root cause of a problem. And this is a very difficult point for
many philanthropists to accept, because they are often themselves profiting
from the social structures that stand in the way of a just world. The fortunes
of many philanthropists exist thanks to those unjust structures. This is what
we saw in Chapter 4: the economic elite speak about improving the world,
but are only willing to do so on their own terms, which typically means
applying inadequate market-based solutions to meeting the needs of the
poor and vulnerable.

The third thing that philanthropists should do is to put the money where
it’s actually needed, rather than spend it on vanity projects. Most of the
money they sit on is not morally theirs. So it is not their call to funnel it into
non-urgent projects, such as already-rich universities or arts collections.

The Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation has made this choice. Its founders are
devoting their fortune to basic health needs in the poorest countries. The
contrast with the space race between Jeff Bezos, Elon Musk, and Richard
Branson couldn’t be greater.

This doesn’t mean that we cannot give any money to university funds or
to arts collections. We can, but only the money that we can genuinely regard
as morally ours. And that is only a fraction of what most very wealthy
people have.

When it comes to the question of what small donors should do, the
answer is much easier. These people can do good, and don’t have
disproportionate individual power to worry about. They can generate power,
however, by joining with others. By acting together, people who cannot
donate large sums on their own can do great things—such as countering the
malign influence of abusive states and corporations. Amnesty International
is a good example of a members-led organization in which none of the
donors has a disproportionate say. Yet acting together, their investigations
can put governments and companies under pressure to respect the human
rights of all people.

Small-scale philanthropy matters. A fair economic system would not
generate billionaire philanthropists at all; in a fair system, there would be no
need for large-scale foundations. There would, however, remain a need for
citizens to join forces to provide a counterbalance for the power of the state
(and others with a disproportionate amount of power). And the world would
definitely be much more pleasant if citizens who could afford to do so
continued joining forces to support those activities that enrich us all
culturally, socially, and intellectually—community activities, the arts and
sciences, festivities and celebrations to honor those who have gone beyond
the call of duty. All these nice things are still possible in a world without
extremely rich people.

Philanthropy, then, is not the answer to the problems with extreme wealth.

It doesn’t get rid of the need to limit wealth to a level where it can’t do any
harm, a level at which rich people can plausibly claim that they deserve the
money. We should still be talking about capping wealth at ten million
pounds, dollars, or euros.

But what responsibilities does limitarianism imply for those who have
less than ten million? Don’t the arguments we’ve encountered in this
chapter apply to them, too? In fact, most of the arguments we’ve looked at
apply to any well-off person—anyone who would still lead a very good life
if they were to give some of their wealth away. We all have to consider how
much is enough for us. And this is where the ethical threshold comes into
play.

Limitarianism holds that any affluent person should allocate wealth that
they do not need for their own quality of life in a way that meets unmet
needs, addresses collective-action problems, and tackles the structural
injustices in a society. We know from the research on the riches line, as well
as from research on the declining value of money, that there is no point in
hoarding more and more. The answer to the question of how much we each
need will necessarily be personal and context specific. For example, if we
have family members who are vulnerable or have a low standard of living,
we might want to provide for them, too. If we are living in a country that
doesn’t have a robust pension system, we might have to put something
aside for our old age. But as a rule of thumb for anyone living in a
developed economy with a reasonable healthcare, pension, and housing
system, the limit of one million pounds, dollars, or euros per person seems a
good starting point.

This idea is already guiding the philanthropic thinking of some superrich people as they decide what to keep and what to give away. It is central,
for example, to the mission of a British organization called the Good
Ancestor Movement. This is the UK’s first firm advising wealthy
individuals and foundations about radical wealth distribution. Their work
starts with the question: what does it mean for us to be good ancestors?
How do we want to be remembered when we are no longer alive? I spoke
with Jake Hayman, the organization’s co-founder, and asked him what role
the riches line plays in their work. Hayman told me that it differs from
person to person; they are led by the values of their clients: what those
values say about the process in which they acquired their wealth; what they
say about how much money a person should keep; and what they say about
how that person should go about giving the excess away. But what, then, I
asked him, if people set their threshold extremely high? What if they want
to hold on to, say, £100 million? On this point, Jake was clear: the
organization does not work with clients who want to hold on to more than
£25 million.19
What about those of us who don’t have millions in the bank—don’t we
need to do something too? I was asked this question by an elderly man after
I had given a talk one evening to a group of people in a local community
college in Eindhoven, in the south of the Netherlands. The man presented
me with the following thoughts. He started by saying that he could easily
agree with all of these arguments for limiting wealth. But wasn’t this
argument also dangerous, since it gave an excuse for those of us who were
well-off to do nothing? After all, we weren’t multimillionaires, most of us
were not even millionaires, so we could point a finger at very rich people.

But we’d profited a lot—for example, from the steep rise in housing prices.

A house bought in the 1970s, for instance, would have increased by a few
hundred thousand euros in value. We weren’t super-rich, but we did have
more than we needed. Shouldn’t we also contribute by making donations to
the worse-off?
That is a very good question. Luckily, the answer isn’t difficult.

Limitarianism tells us about the duties of those above the riches line, and
why they have those duties. It doesn’t tell us about the duties of those below
the riches line. But, of course, many of the non-rich also have a moral
obligation to give away any excess money they may have. Given the appeal
made to us by those who suffer, and given the fact that our financial
situation is to a significant extent undeserved, we should all try to
contribute to alleviating the suffering of others, to the extent that our
resources allow.

How far should we go? One way of answering this would be that we
should seek to maximize the total well-being of all human beings, no matter
where they live. This is the utilitarian approach, and this principle is also
often extended to other sentient beings. Given the declining marginal value
(or “utility”) of money, the less unequal a distribution is, the higher the total
well-being. At the level of what we can do individually, utilitarianism
would imply that we should give away our money as long as giving away
another pound, dollar, or euro would make someone else better off to a
greater extent than it would make us worse off. In other words, as long as
the cost to yourself of giving another pound/dollar/euro is less than the
good you do with it, you should keep on giving.20
This is a very clear position. But it is also rather extreme. There are very
few philosophers who endorse it, and even fewer who live up to it in
practice. One reason to reject this version of utilitarianism is that it would
turn us into utility robots—no longer complete human beings with fears,
desires, individual attributes, and ideas of what we might want to do with
our lives, but rather creatures whose choices are driven solely by the overall
well-being of society. Another problem is that this form of utilitarianism is
overdemanding: it is simply too much for us to carry all the misery of the
world on our shoulders.21
There are a range of possible answers to the question: how much should
I give? The organization Giving What We Can has a helpful website
outlining the different options.22 The two extremes are easy to describe. On
the one hand, you could give nothing at all. There are circumstances in
which this can be justified—for example, if you are poor yourself, or a
student on a shoestring, or if you are having to spend all the money you can
spare on caring for a disabled child. The other extreme would be to give
away all that you have, thereby neglecting your own needs. Or, one might
say, neglecting the needs of those to whom you have what philosophers call
“special obligations”—obligations that arise from your relationship with
them. Giving should not lead to self-neglect or self-harm, and shouldn’t
lead to the neglect or harm of those to whom we have special obligations:
our parents, partners, children, and so on. But in between those two
extremes there are many other options. We could, for example, donate just 2
to 6 percent of our income, as many donors do.

Giving What We Can advocates a pledge to give away 10 percent of our
income. The 10 percent pledge has some clear advantages—it is low
enough to be accessible yet high enough to be meaningful; it is more than
what people tend to give; and it is not overly demanding and thereby offputting. The co-founders of the organization have further clarified that they
believe this to be a moral principle that should apply to those in the top half
of the income distribution. That is an important qualification.

The costs of giving are much smaller, and the benefits of donating to
others much larger, than we tend to think. These benefits are various. To the
donor, it is likely that they will feel a warm glow, happy about what they
did. But if they spend their money wisely, and choose a charity that can be
effective in reaching its goals, their donations can save lives, reduce
poverty, or support political activism that will help us reach a fairer world.23
Is this 10 percent principle morally adequate? One striking feature is that
it is not progressive: it doesn’t ask the rich and the super-rich to contribute a
larger share than the middle classes. Wouldn’t it be better to ask those in the
middle of the income distribution to contribute 5 percent, and the highest-
earning 20 percent? After all, in the past they would have paid 70 to 80
percent marginal income tax, and this has now dropped to below 50 percent
in many countries. So history has shown us that they can afford it.

One limitation of this alternative scheme is the loss of simplicity. The 10
percent rule is extremely straightforward, and that makes it powerful. But
the 10 percent rule also focuses on income, not on wealth, which is where
the surplus lies. For wealth holders, the 10 percent rule is not enough. There
is no way around it: wealth holders should use a riches line, and decide on a
personal limit. This ethical limit could then be combined with the 10
percent principle or a progressive donation schedule below the riches line.

The limitarian ethos, in the end, is this: we should not want to hold on to
more money than we need to lead a secure and good life, and beyond that
we should heed the moral call to share what we have with the least
fortunate. Many people living in the Global North, as well as the well-off in
the Global South, can live very good lives with less, sometimes much less,
than we currently have. And the rich might even see their lives improve.


The Rich Will Benefit, Too
A world that accepted that the sky is not the limit—that there is only so
much any one person should have—would be a world transformed.

Democratic values would be restored and a fair economic settlement would
be achieved; people would receive what they actually deserve for their
work. We would no longer endure the disastrous impact of inequality on
people’s social lives and their mental and physical health. Massive funds
would be freed up, allowing us to combat poverty, halt global warming, and
shore up the hospitals, schools, and libraries that have been sorely neglected
by fifty years of neoliberal governance.

But how would it affect the super-rich? Obviously, they would end up
with less material wealth compared to what they have now. And that means
fewer privileges and less of the power that comes with it. Thus far, I’ve
argued that this would represent a huge moral gain. Many philosophical
traditions believe that acting morally is what makes us human, and thus you
could even argue that the rich and super-rich would benefit in terms of
regained humanity. But might they perhaps also have something to gain,
beyond becoming more fully human?
I believe that, as well as becoming better people, the super-rich do have
something very important to win from the shift to a limitarian world. In
fact, I believe that it is in their own best interests. In other words, there are
also self-serving reasons why the super-rich should endorse limitarianism.

How could that be? While it might seem implausible at first sight, digging a
bit deeper reveals three main reasons why limitarianism is, on balance,
better for the super-rich too.

*
In January 2020, a letter was sent to the participants at the World Economic
Forum meeting in Davos. It was signed by 121 millionaires and billionaires.

They argued that there are two kinds of wealthy people, “those who prefer
taxes and those who prefer pitchforks.” They warned that escalating
economic inequality would have negative consequences. It would increase
tensions between different groups in society. It would lessen social trust and
spread a sense of unfairness, which would diminish social cohesion. And it
would make the global community unable to properly address the climate
crisis. The letter signatories called on their fellow millionaires and
billionaires to acknowledge that the solution would be higher taxation.1
These super-rich signatories drew on a range of arguments in their call
for changes to the system. Yet most central was their argument that
inequality was now getting so out of hand, if nothing happened, the superrich could expect increased political instability, and possibly an uprising
before too long.

Since then, the Patriotic Millionaires have continued writing open letters
to those attending Davos. They keep stressing the societal instability caused
by inequality. In January 2023, they asked: “Extremes are unsustainable,
often dangerous, and rarely tolerated for long. So why, in this age of
multiple crises, do you continue to tolerate extreme wealth?”2
Other multimillionaires have likewise been stressing the looming threat.

In 2014, American venture capitalist Nick Hanauer (whose fortune is
estimated to be around half a billion dollars) published an article with the
unambiguous title “The Pitchforks Are Coming … for Us Plutocrats.”
Hanauer called upon his fellow “zillionaires” to open their eyes to the
dangers of rising inequality. Hanauer’s argument was deliberately not based
on moral grounds, but appealed purely to the self-interest of the rich
themselves. He argued that the super-rich have two important self-serving
reasons to endorse strategies that reduce inequality. First:
If we don’t do something to fix the glaring inequities in this economy, the pitchforks are going
to come for us. No society can sustain this kind of rising inequality. In fact, there is no example
in human history where wealth accumulated like this and the pitchforks didn’t eventually come
out. You show me a highly unequal society, and I will show you a police state. Or an uprising.

There are no counterexamples. None. It’s not if, it’s when.

The other reason why Hanauer thinks the super-rich should fight inequality
is economic growth: if we take measures to reduce inequality, the total pie
will grow and everyone will be better off. Hanauer dismisses trickle-down
economics and argues for strengthening the middle classes by raising their
wages. The rich will become richer if the middle classes can prosper. How
can businesses prosper when workers have no money to spend on buying
flowers or new clothes, or going out for dinner? A strong middle class that
earns decent wages would be in the interest of the rich, since the demand
for their goods would go up, and the rich could make more profits.3
The concern that if inequality becomes too great, violence and political
instability will follow, is an old one. In The Laws, Plato argues that the
property of those who have the most should be limited to, at most, four
times that of those who have the least, in order to maintain stability in
political communities.4 Four times! Imagine where that upper limit would
lie. In fact, that ratio would be impossibly small today, since at present in all
countries at least 10 percent of the population have virtually nothing—not
even enough in savings to replace a broken washing machine or to cover
three months of income loss. If we implemented Plato’s recommended
standards for wealth differences today, we would achieve a massive
reduction in inequality. It would actually imply a much more radical
distribution of wealth than most citizens currently support.

With Plato’s argument in mind, the big question to ask is: how large can
economic inequality become before it triggers political upheaval? The
contemporary political landscape gives us ample cause for concern. The
destabilizing consequences of rising wealth inequality are not just a concern
for very unequal countries such as the US, Brazil, or South Africa, although
the blows those democracies have received in recent years are very good
reason to be extremely worried. Even in countries with a smaller and less
wealthy class of super-rich, and a still better (though also weakening)
welfare state, commentators warn of growing unrest among those who are
losing out. The Dutch journalist and entrepreneur Sander Schimmelpennick,
himself of wealthy descent, has similarly raised the “threat of the
pitchforks” as one of the reasons to do something about growing inequality
in the Netherlands. He also believes there are other reasons, in particular the
decline of equal opportunities, but the threat of a revolt by the less well-off
stands out among them. We should indeed be concerned by the effects that
the rise in insecurity, precariousness, and economic inequality will have on
right-wing populist parties that will channel this resentment into various
forms of violence—xenophobia, anti-Semitism, and hatred of sexual
minorities, especially transgender people.5
But support for right-wing populist parties is not the only way that voters
have shown their increasing dissatisfaction. In some countries, we are also
seeing a rise of groups at the exact opposite end of the political spectrum,
such as the Green parties. So far, they are proving to be a much weaker
threat to the super-rich. Given their respect for the rule of law, they have
only legal means at their disposal—and with the limited political power that
they wield, their influence has been modest. And, much more critically, as
some would argue, a number of the leaders of those progressive parties
have either already been indoctrinated by neoliberal thinking, or become
captive to it as soon as they enter a coalition with neoliberal parties.

There are, of course, many centrist voters who are also losing out from
the recent rise of the super-rich, if you consider what lives those voters
could lead in the best available alternative world. Why, then, have they not
protested more vocally? My hunch is that some voters do not believe that
political action (whether through voting or organizing) will make a
difference, while many more are simply unaware of how large the
inequalities are, and how self-serving the capitalist class has been in
influencing the rules of the game. Not enough people know what CEOs
earn, or the size of inheritances that will be passed down over the next
decades to lucky heirs, while their own children will get next to nothing.

And because they want to protect that small sum they saved to pass on to
their loved ones, they oppose inheritance tax, without understanding that it
would be a great equalizer, allowing us all to start out on a playing field that
has been genuinely leveled.

It might also have to do with how dominant neoliberal ideas have
become. Most people currently alive have grown up in a predominantly
neoliberal political and economic environment. And, just as fish can’t see
the water in which they swim, it is difficult for us to recognize neoliberal
ideas and values if we have never known anything else. Thanks to the
spread of neoliberal ideology, people in many countries no longer regard
themselves as citizens who have a civic duty in jointly governing the
political community, but rather see themselves as consumers, as people with
professional identities, and as private individuals with families and friends.

Too many of us have become depoliticized. Too many of us have no
experience of activism and organizing, and hence do not know what
enormous potential there is in acting together to fight for justice or to
defend a common interest.

Yet if there is, as many suspect, a fuse waiting to be lit, it might only
need a spark. We saw this during the Arab Spring. In January 2011, the
Tunisian street vendor Mohamed Bouazizi set himself on fire when he
could no longer stand his repeated humiliation and harassment by a
municipal officer, which had culminated in the confiscation of his wares.

His heartbreaking act triggered a series of protests that would ultimately
bring down several regimes across the Middle East, in Libya, Egypt, and
Yemen. Individual tragedy once again sparked international uprising
following the death of George Floyd, an African-American man who was
killed by Derek Chauvin, a white police officer, in Minneapolis in 2020.

This horrible, racist murder sparked massive protests and saw the Black
Lives Matter movement take root in countries all around the world. The
movement has turned into such a political force that discussions about a
society’s social contract are much more attuned to the question of racial
justice. One of the people I interviewed, who advises US-based
philanthropists, mentioned that the death of George Floyd and the rise of
Black Lives Matter protests also opened the eyes of some philanthropists,
who had not given much thought until then to the pronounced racial nature
of wealth inequalities. Thanks to the Black Lives Matter movement, these
American philanthropists now understand that, as part of addressing such
inequality, empowering Black communities is also urgent and necessary.

When there is a slumbering discontent with the way things are, an
incident can very quickly escalate into protests, riots, and even regime
change. The only way to avoid this kind of dramatic upheaval is to revise
the social contract to ensure that everyone benefits fairly.

Beyond the looming threat of an uprising against the wealthy, there are
other, more constructive personal reasons for the super-rich to part with
their wealth. When speaking with Jake Hayman, co-founder of the Good
Ancestor Movement, I asked how his multimillionaire clients who had
given up their fortunes felt about it. Did any of them regret what they’d
done? He didn’t have to think long about his response. “I have never met
anyone with an ounce of regret. Everyone I’ve spoken to who has given up
extreme wealth has called it a freeing.” When I asked why, he said:
Because money takes up so much of your life, when you’re rich. You have to meet with these
people whom you do not want to meet, you have to live with guilt, you’re in a constant position
of power over other people, because you could help change their lives and you don’t. So it
becomes a choice for you, and it feels wrong. And it is exhausting. And you row with your
family over money, but money is not important really, because there is more than you need.

Jake’s assessment resonated with what some of the wealth holders had told
me. They felt the excess money was a burden, and a barrier to the ordinary
world—a world that they wanted to be part of. Thirty years after having
given away his inheritance, Chuck Collins came to this conclusion: “I have
no regrets. If anything, I feel liberated. My decision enabled me to live my
life more aligned to my values. It opened up a source of energy.”6
There are many ways in which having too much money can be a curse in
disguise. For Abigail Disney, a fundamental concern was what becoming
rich does to a person’s psychological makeup. She spoke to me about the
mental burdens of the power a rich person has over other people. “For each
homeless person you walk by, you know that you could take them out of
that situation,” she said. Moreover, everywhere she goes, she is seen as a
potential donor. It is exhausting. Everyone wants her to make donations to
their cause. One of the consequences of this, she said, is that, as you acquire
more money, you narrow your social circle to people who are more like you
—who do not ask you for money. Yet this also changes you as a person. You
risk losing touch with the real world.

“For me the problems are also soul-related,” Disney explained. “There is
a corrosive quality to the presence of wealth, and especially the presence of
deep inequity, that every person faces as a deep challenge to their moral
well-being.” She went on to talk about the constant daily choices you have
to make as a very rich person, each of which could transform another
person’s life. That constant calculus, which other wealth holders that I
interviewed also mentioned, changes you, too. It is, Disney said,
itself an exercise that takes something out of me, and wears me out, and leaves me emotionally
exhausted—which people do I help, and which people do I not help. And if you do not engage
with this calculus, you have no choice but then to take that person on the sidewalk and reduce
him to something that is not human, and in doing so you develop a habit in seeing people that
need something from you as less than human. It is hard to convey, just how constant the asking
is. It is almost impossible to walk into a room and not encounter somebody who wants me to
know what they need from me, and wishes I could transform what is creating that need.

As a means of emotional self-defense, the wealth holder will create a barrier
between themselves and the people who want something from them.

This reaction, though predictable, isn’t very healthy, mentally speaking.

“Once you have constructed your safe room, and the safe people, and the
safe environment, you are a star in that room, and you develop a need to be
worthy of your stardom, so it feels a little performative,” Disney went on.

“It feels like ‘I had better be the person who is worthy of these advantages.’
” All this has an impact, changing the rich person both psychologically and
morally—and Abigail Disney thinks not for the better, especially not for
white men for whom codes of gender and race intersect with this mindset in
an unhealthy way. As she explains,
There is that risk, when everyone is telling you that you are right all the time, and everything is
telling you that you are that great, and you’ve constructed a whole world in which you are the
center, you can mistake yourself for the sun that rises and sets. And the rooms you are not in
have no light in them because you are the sun. And so when you leave the room, those people
cease to exist. There is this kind of godlike quality that you take on that is difficult to fend off.

Disney says you can see clearly how ultra-rich people like Jeff Bezos have
changed over time. She also saw it in her father’s life. “I saw him one by
one lose his friends [and] … replaced by people who were in some paid
capacity.” And ultimately, those men were the only people he trusted.7
One particularly acute cause for concern is the psychologically corrosive
effect of extreme wealth on the children of the super-rich. Jessie O’Neill has
described the dark side of growing up in a very wealthy environment in her
1997 book, The Golden Ghetto. As the granddaughter of a former president
of General Motors, O’Neill is herself from the third generation of a wealthy
family, and has also worked as a therapist. She coined the term “affluenza”
to denote the harmful psychological effects of extreme wealth, especially on
children. They are often raised by nannies, which sends the message that
they aren’t important enough for their parents to spend time with them. This
leads to attachment problems, not least because nannies and au pairs change
frequently. In general, the children of the super-rich receive a lot of material
things but very little attention. Showering children with material goods
prevents them from understanding the value of delayed gratification and
means they are never given the opportunity to learn to be patient and
tolerate frustration. To make matters worse, because they receive so much
money, they are prevented from ever knowing whether they could have
“made it” on their own—a worry Abigail Disney also expressed to me, and
one that she believes explains why so many women who inherited fortunes
end up studying for a PhD. After all, it is not possible to buy a doctorate
from a reputable university. If you want to be able to put “Dr.” before your
name, you’ll have to earn it with your own sweat and toil. O’Neill also
writes at length about how affluenza in a super-rich person often leads to
addiction, causing dysfunction in the family, which in turn triggers
addiction among their children when they grow up.8
Few have portrayed the emptiness of the world of super-rich kids as
vividly as American photographer Lauren Greenfield. She had been
interviewing and photographing the super-rich in Los Angeles for twentyfive years, resulting in the impressive photo book Generation Wealth,
published in 2017 at the same time as a museum exhibition and a
documentary film. In addition to exposing appallingly wasteful luxury
spending, the interviews and photos also show mostly unhappy children.

The extravagance around them does not bring them any joy: they are
habituated to it. When you grow up in luxury, especially if you are living in
the bubble of other very rich people, then an extravagant consumption
pattern becomes normalized. One of Greenfield’s respondents, Wendy, was
surrounded by opulence growing up, and recounted how difficult it was for
her when she turned eighteen and was told by her father that, from that day
onward, she would have to pay her own bills. Wendy said that it was very
hard, having grown up with so much, to then have it all taken away. From
then on, she couldn’t enjoy anything, given what she had taken for granted
throughout her childhood. Even eating out at an expensive restaurant didn’t
seem like a treat, because in her youth this had just been a normal thing to
do.9
These mechanisms of psychological adaptation are borne out in the
scientific work of psychologist Mihaly Csikszentmihalyi. He discovered
that rich people are not happier than everyone else. For those with little
money, acquiring greater material wealth leads to greater happiness, but
those who are very rich no longer experience this. On the contrary: because
time is the ultimate scarce resource for us all, it becomes extremely
expensive for very rich people who are still focused on making money to
have any quality time with others—to spend an afternoon playing games
with their children or going to a family gathering. In that time frame, they
could otherwise be earning a lot of money. So, after a while, they lose their
sensitivity to the experience of happiness in slow pursuits—like taking a
walk in the woods, or having a cup of tea while chatting with a parent or
friend. Busy, rich people become desensitized to the value of idleness and
activities that do not revolve around material goods and status.10
If, as the evidence seems to suggest, growing up in the wealthy classes is
not something that guarantees a balanced, happy childhood, then this gives
us another reason to oppose extreme wealth. And in fact, more specifically,
to limit it. Because the psychological mechanism underlying the
unhappiness of the very rich is their continuous quest to grow their fortunes.

That, as a class, they are driven to keep accumulating more and more, is
beyond doubt, backed up by material from wide-ranging sources—from
autobiographical accounts by those born to wealth, through qualitative
sociological research on multimillionaires, to the evidence afforded by the
massive growth in the wealth-defense industry.

In The Psychology of Money, his bestselling book from 2020, Morgan
Housel argues that never having enough is a dangerous mindset. He
describes how Rajat Gupta and Bernie Madoff, both highly successful and
holders of more than $100 million, were eventually lured into committing
crimes—simply because they had no sense of having enough. The problem,
Housel explains, is that the goalposts keep moving. We are motivated by
social comparison—we always look upward and compare ourselves with
those who have much more. We’ve seen this mechanism at work in CEO
compensation. It is also at work in what heirs of fortunes are taught: let the
money “work” so that it can grow. Housel advises his readers to develop the
skill of stopping the goalposts from moving. Since there will always be
someone richer (literally, for all but one single person), trying to overtake
the person who is above you in the wealth line is a battle that can never be
won. “The only way to win is to not fight to begin with—to accept that you
might have enough, even if it’s less than those around you.”11
A cynic might object that if the rich want to destroy their own souls by
hoarding money, we should not feel sorry for them, as they are choosing to
live that way. People are free to make themselves as unhappy as they like.

But that doesn’t take away our societal responsibility toward their children.

After all, if from the perspective of mental well-being the children of very
rich parents are just as disadvantaged as poor children, why would we think
that we have a moral duty to care for the poor kids, but not for the superrich ones? The cynic might then ask us to focus only on the adults: is the
moral and psychological distress of the very rich really something we really
need to worry about? If the rich feel that their lives are taking a turn for the
worse, they can afford to get professional aid from therapists. It’s a problem
for the individual, which only they need address.

I think this is too easy a response. I don’t see why we should care less
about the well-being of the super-rich than the well-being of any other
social class, simply because the super-rich have much more money and
power. They are just as vulnerable, psychologically, as the rest of us, and if
we care about the vulnerability of other people in general, then we should
also care about how excessive wealth can destroy the lives of the super-rich.

Most moral theories endorse the claim that societies should be organized to
protect the autonomy of all individuals. Yet, as philosopher Danielle
Zwarthoed points out, psychological mechanisms such as the ones just
described undermine the moral autonomy of those who have excess wealth.

A society that wants to enable, nurture and protect the autonomy of all
should therefore limit how wealthy we can become.12
The number of very wealthy people who talk about how easy it was for
them or their family members to fall into drug abuse, makes it clear that,
from a psychological point of view, they are deserving of our empathy as
much as anyone else (politically, I agree, it is another matter; it should be
clear by now that I have zero sympathy for their pivotal role in the social
and economic changes over the last half century). Yet the theme of
addiction rears its head twice. On the one hand, addiction is widespread
among the super-rich, which is a clear indication of a lack of well-being. On
the other hand, wealth accumulation itself is addictive. In The Psychology
of Money, Morgan Housel doesn’t use the term “addiction,” but in essence
identifies it as such. As he puts it, “ ‘Enough’ is realising that the opposite—
an insatiable appetite for more—will push you to the point of regret.”13
Others have embraced the language of addiction when describing the
psychological effects of accumulating wealth. In 2014, Sam Polk, who had
quit his job as a Wall Street trader three years earlier, wrote an op-ed piece
in the New York Times that began:
In my last year on Wall Street my bonus was $3.6 million—and I was angry because it wasn’t
big enough. I was 30 years old, had no children to raise, no debts to pay, no philanthropic goal
in mind. I wanted more money for exactly the same reason an alcoholic needs another drink: I
was addicted.

Polk, who had previously abused alcohol and drugs, diagnoses the business
culture on Wall Street as a form of “wealth addiction.” Moreover, the belief
of Wall Street traders that they truly deserve those enormous salaries and
bonuses are, he argues, simply the rationalizations of addicts.14
But there is still another compelling reason to care about the super-rich,
which was well put by Abigail Disney when we spoke: “I think it is
important to pay attention to the personal part. Because the very wealthy
people are also public people. And as the inner corrosion occurs, they take
that faulty and damaged sense into the public arena, and use this moral
compass that has been really corroded and changed by who they are, to
make decisions to how the world should be.” She considered Elon Musk to
be a perfect example of this problem, concluding, “Someone shaped by
having too much money is precisely the last person you want in a position
of power.” Moreover, given that large sections of society still are in awe of
multimillionaires, they almost automatically become role models for young
people. The creation of a parallel online world via social media—a fake
reality, in effect—only makes things worse. The 99 percent shouldn’t want
psychologically damaged super-rich people to be role models for their
children (or for themselves, for that matter).

We should be alive to the danger that the psychological mechanisms that
are negatively affecting the rich may end up affecting us, too. A range of
studies have shown that lower-class and less affluent people tend to be more
empathic and compassionate than rich people. Empathy is crucial for a
well-functioning society—indeed, even the quality of the state’s
bureaucracy and of the judiciary can be said to depend on its office holders
having sufficient empathic skills. Those who lack empathy are more likely
to bully or harass others in the workplace or in social interactions,
poisoning the environment around them. In short, the negative
psychological effects of extreme wealth are not just affecting the super-rich
themselves. They hurt all of us, too.15
A final reason for arguing that the rich would be better off in a limitarian
world relates to the underlying insecurity that characterizes affluent
societies today. One striking finding from sociologist Rachel Sherman’s
research into the lives of very wealthy New Yorkers is that, despite having
multiple millions in assets, these wealth holders still express the view that
they must hold on to that money because it is their insurance policy to
ensure security, for themselves and for their families. If bad luck strikes,
they might need it. Some of these families have only one earner, and if that
person were to lose their job and a family member were subsequently to
become ill, they would not have health insurance to get them the treatment
they needed. There is certainly some truth to this: household wealth can
indeed function as a private insurance mechanism in the face of divorce,
disability, or unemployment, as research has shown.16 The research team
from London who organized focus groups on extreme wealth likewise
found that vast wealth accumulation was seen as justifiable because of its
role as a private safety net. The fact that many people accept this logic
might help explain the paradox that, on the one hand, inequality has
increased while, on the other, popular concern about levels of inequality has
not. A large proportion of the population might well accept wealth hoarding
because they agree that the rich and super-rich need this money as a
strategy for dealing with strokes of bad luck in the future.17
What should we make of this? Perhaps for some wealth holders invoking
the need for security is simply an excuse. Yet it is not implausible that some
of them genuinely experience fear. Still, this is a chimera. Real security
requires a society with a protected minimum living standard for all.

Hoarding money might give us a safety net in a world of isolated
individuals, the atomized beings that neoliberalism wants us to believe that
we are. But we are strongly interdependent. In the world in which we live,
the best way to gain security is to pool risks. This is, simply, the best way
forward, both ethically and economically speaking. Rather than stockpiling
cash in case they find themselves in the (highly improbable) scenario of
suddenly being without any income at the exact moment that one of their
children becomes terribly ill and needs very expensive treatment, a superrich person would do better to advocate for high-quality healthcare for all,
independent of employment status. Interestingly, this pretty much sums up
the choice Chuck Collins made. When Collins decided to give away his
inheritance at the tender age of twenty-six, his father (heir to the Oscar
Mayer meat-processing company) tried to talk him out of it with the
argument that he might become sick or disabled. To which Collins
responded that this was the situation millions of his compatriots were living
in, and he would deal with the problem if it arose, just like everyone else
did.18
Even though it does make sense to accumulate some degree of family
wealth as a buffer for hard times, given the stripped-back welfare state in
many countries today, there are still clear limits to how much we should
accumulate for that purpose. Beyond that point, it’s hard to see what benefit
the additional cash could possibly bring.

What is the point of accumulating money endlessly if it doesn’t serve the
good life? If it doesn’t make you happy or fulfilled? As the philosopher
Edward Skidelsky and his father the economist Robert Skidelsky have
rightly pointed out, this is a question we have ceased to ask under
capitalism—but it was an important question in earlier eras. Thinkers from
Aristotle to Aquinas have argued that a good life is one that acknowledges
clear limits; one that admits the satiability of our wants and needs. There
have been plenty of proto-limitarian thinkers throughout the history of
philosophy who have considered it natural for there to be limits on the
material goods we can accrue.19
We have erased these insights from our collective memory, because they
go against our modern self-perception: today, we like to believe that we are
the authors of our own destiny and should be held responsible for how
much—or how little—we can win for ourselves. But this is foolish. It’s not
just that luck plays a major role in our lives, or that we owe our ability to
make money in the first place to our fellow humans, both past and present.

It’s that our very character and wants are to a large extent shaped by the
society we live in. Today’s society uses all manner of neoliberal capitalist
tricks to turn us into self-centered consumers with limitless desires;
creatures whose sole goal is to fulfill those desires; who can live happily
while others around us languish in misery. But it doesn’t have to be like
this. There are much better lives available to all of us, including the rich and
super-rich, if we can liberate ourselves and our imaginations from the
neoliberal capitalist spell.


The Road Ahead
We’ve arrived at a point where the arguments against extreme wealth—and
for limitarianism—are piling up, one on top of the other. There are many
different reasons why you might endorse a limitarian worldview. There is
the principled objection against inequality. Or there’s the fact that so much
excess wealth is tainted. Society’s richest have appropriated an unfairly
large part of the economic gains of the past century, and they need to
redistribute that surplus. Or you might support limitarianism because it
would do a huge amount to address existing power imbalances and protect
political equality—to halt the erosion of democracy, and prevent the
domination of politics by the wealthy few. Or it might be the fact that
limitarianism can take us a long way toward saving our planet, given that
the lifestyles, business strategies, tax avoidance or evasion, and lobbying of
the super-rich have led to civilization-threatening ecological harm. A world
on fire needs a lot of money to extinguish the flames, and the super-rich are
holding on to money they don’t need. It makes much more sense to take the
money for dousing the fire from the super-rich than from the middle
classes, let alone the poor. The same point also holds for meeting other
needs beyond protecting the livability of the planet, such as fighting poverty
and other forms of deprivation. Collectively acknowledging that at some
point enough is enough would also make the rich themselves better off.

Finally, and perhaps most fundamentally: no one can claim that they
deserve to be a millionaire.

In short, a limitarian society would be a better society. And, even if the
idea of imposing a limit on wealth is not politically feasible in the short run,
drastically reducing economic inequalities from the top down would make
the world a much better place.

To what extent are ordinary people aware of today’s immense economic
inequality? Do they know that this inequality is not “natural,” by any
means? Do they know that the dominant classes have quietly established a
set of global economic rules that favor their own interests, that they have
influenced national decisions on taxes and spending, and that, while they
have thrown a few breadcrumbs to the poor and vulnerable, they have
largely sought to improve their own financial position?
I’d venture that many people have no idea how deep the problem goes.

Such ignorance applies to everyone—the rich, the poor, and the middle
classes. As we saw at the beginning of this book, many studies have found
that when people are asked where they situate themselves in the income
distribution, they routinely get it wrong. The poor tend to think they are
richer than they are in reality. The rich tend to think they are less affluent
than they are. Other studies have asked people direct questions about what
they think the income and wealth distribution looks like, and here, too,
research shows that people have only limited knowledge of the actual
distribution of income and wealth. Studies tend to find a consensus around
the idea of reducing income inequality through redistribution, although in a
few countries those who would have less money after such redistribution
did not favor it.1
One striking study was published in 2011 by Michael Norton from
Harvard Business School and Dan Ariely from Duke University. They
wanted to find out what Americans believed about the distribution of wealth
in their country, and what they would like the distribution to be. The study
divided the population into quintiles—groups that each represented onefifth of the population. In the first part of the study, respondents could
choose between three ways of distributing wealth. The perfectly equal
distribution gave each of the five groups exactly 20 percent of all wealth. A
somewhat less equal distribution gave each of the quintiles a different share
of the total wealth. They received, respectively, 36 percent, 21 percent, 18
percent, 15 percent, and 11 percent of all wealth. The last option was the
actual wealth distribution in America in 2005, with the five groups holding
84 percent, 11 percent, 4 percent, and virtually nothing for the last two
groups. A whopping 92 percent of respondents choose the second option.

Americans clearly do not want the very unequal distribution of wealth
that they currently have. So why, then, do they not vote for more
redistribution? There are many possible explanations. One is that they
believe in the existence of social mobility—in the American Dream—
despite the evidence showing that social mobility is not just very limited but
also declining. Another possible explanation was offered in the second part
of the study, which asked the same participants to venture what they
thought the actual distribution of wealth was, as well as to state what they
would ideally want that distribution to be. The participants dramatically
underestimated how unequal the distribution of wealth in their country was.

The top 20 percent of the population at the time of the study had 84.4
percent of wealth, but respondents thought it was 58 percent. They wanted
it to be even smaller, namely 31 percent. The bottom 20 percent had almost
no wealth (0.1 percent, to be precise), yet participants in the study thought
they had 3 percent, and would want them to have about 11 percent.2
Studies from other countries have confirmed the same pattern: people
drastically underestimate wealth inequality. And they want the distribution
of wealth to be even less unequal than what they think it is. The same holds
for wage inequality. Here, too, people think that inequality is smaller than it
is in reality, yet they would wish income to be even less unequal. Their
underestimations are very large. In an international study, respondents
thought that a CEO earned on average 10 times the pay of an unskilled
worker, and believed this should be reined back to 4.6 times. However, in
reality, in most countries for which the study had data, the ratio of CEO to
unskilled worker pay was much larger than 10, with CEOs earning many
times more than what their unskilled workers earned: 30 times more in the
US, 40 times in Australia, and almost 42 times more in South Korea.

Interestingly, the ideal pay ratio that people hoped to see implemented
didn’t differ across the political spectrum: whether people positioned
themselves politically on the left, center, or right, they all thought that the
ideal was a much more limited pay gap than what it was at the time of the
study.


Why does this matter? Well, if people perceive or believe that
inequalities are high, they might well make stronger demands for
redistribution. If, as is the case, they are mistaken in believing that
inequalities are smaller than they really are, their demands for redistribution
will be more timid. But whatever the size of the inequalities, and whatever
the demands, we want people to form views based on facts; whether
citizens demand change or not, they ought to have easy access to accurate
information.

Perhaps it is against this background that we should understand the
reluctance of the rich to talk about money, and especially about exactly how
much the very wealthy and super-rich have. That refusal to do so is
insidious. Having a more open debate on economic inequalities, one
grounded in fact, might strengthen political support for redistribution—and,
I expect, for a hard upper limit on how much money any one person can
have.

It is not only the rich who do not want to talk about inequalities, however.

There are many from the working and middle classes who also resist
reducing inequality, and especially dislike talking about a limit on wealth.

As I mentioned earlier, no matter where limitarianism has been debated,
there have always been people telling me via social media that this would
wind up as communism. On several occasions journalists have asked me
outright whether limitarianism is communism in disguise. And when
journalists or ordinary people ask about communism, they are not thinking
of a theoretical and utopian world where a government is no longer
necessary because all decisions are taken collectively and with the common
good in mind. Instead, they mean USSR-style communism: the despotic
central planning of the economy by the government.

Since the fall of the Berlin Wall in 1989, and the subsequent crumbling
of the Communist Bloc in Eastern Europe and the USSR, the dominant
view has been that the communist experiment failed. Some citizens had
spent years trying to escape these countries, but by that point the majority
had decided they had had enough of living in repressive regimes while
across the border people were living much better lives. In those planned
economies, material living standards were much lower. There was severe
political repression that infiltrated all levels of society; you could not be
sure that your aunt or friend wasn’t a spy for the state. In several countries,
the state made important personal decisions for its citizens, such as who
could study and what subject. Technological innovation lagged much
behind that of advanced capitalist societies. There were very few who felt
that the economic experiment that had taken place in Eastern Europe and
the USSR between 1945 and 1990 could be rescued by some minor
modifications to its social and economic structures.

We’ve thus ended up in an era in which very few people will defend
communism, understood as the central planning of the entire economy. To
me, that is not surprising. I reject it too. Thinking that an entire economy
can be planned from above, including who needs which consumer goods,
who will do what kind of work, where to buy groceries and at what prices,
and so on, seems an incredible act of hubris. And it is not difficult to see
that, on a national scale, such a massive planning exercise could only be
done in a non-democratic system, since many people would prefer to be
entrepreneurial.

The claim that limitarianism is essentially communism—defined in this
manner—is at once hilarious and deeply sad. It is hilarious because you
really don’t need an economics degree to see that there is no need for
USSR-style communism if we want to live in a world without extreme
wealth concentration. The claim entails a confusion of categories:
communism is an economic system with political implications, whereas
limitarianism is a moral principle that should, first of all, guide the design
of our economic and social institutions, and, secondly, our own personal
decision-making. So those who want to play the communism card against
limitarianism should, at the very least, ask a question that spells out the
relationship between the two: would economic limitarianism lead us to a
centrally planned economy? Clearly, there is no reason why this would be
the case. We can move in the direction of limitarianism without having to
adopt a command economy. Yes, we would have to implement a package of
economic measures. But none of these measures would entail the
introduction of central planning, or the abolition of markets, private
companies, or private property.

But the suggestion that limitarianism is akin to communism is also very
sad, perhaps even maddening, since it indicates that, all too often, the
opponents of progressive ideas are not really interested in having a genuine
discussion about these proposals. Instead, they want to caricature them in a
way that they know will put many people off the discussion entirely. They
are in effect trolling as part of a rhetorical strategy to attempt to end a
serious conversation about whether limitarianism would be a good thing for
society, and what it would require in terms of changes to our social and
economic institutions.

The current mainstream debate on economic systems has been ruined by
dichotomous thinking. The collapse of the Soviet Bloc was seized by
defenders of capitalism to declare victory. Capitalism was, to their minds,
the only desirable and feasible option that remained. Any subsequent
criticism of capitalism has all too often been painted as an implicit defense
of communism, or, more recently, some poorly understood notion of
“socialism.” This way of framing the different economic systems from
which we, as citizens, could choose is extremely simplistic. And given the
widespread consensus that communism is not a desirable option, it compels
most of us to conclude that capitalism is the only available one. As
Margaret Thatcher famously put it, “There is no alternative”—meaning that
the only defensible system is capitalism.

Such dichotomous thinking is unhelpful and misleading. So let’s get the
basics straight. An economy is a social system that humans use for their
provisioning—to deliver goods and services to those who need or want
them. A modern, large-scale economy must necessarily have a state run by a
government, at the very least to protect the constitution and the legal order,
and to provide a set of public goods, such as physical security and
infrastructure. There are a range of economic actors that can produce goods
or services: the state, individual professionals, profit-seeking entrepreneurs,
and non-profit-seeking entrepreneurs and organizations. Property can be
held privately, publicly (when the state holds it), or collectively (when a
group of people share it). Markets can be regulated on a scale from
completely unregulated to very strongly regulated. The same holds for the
enforcement of those regulations. These regulations can concern a wide
range of aspects, such as the safety and quality of goods for sale, the terms
of a legal contract between buyer and seller, and the setting of minimum
and maximum prices. Regulation also means that some goods and services
are rendered illegal and that some companies are deemed too large to allow
the market to function properly so that the consumers’ interests are properly
protected.

All of these things currently exist in our economies. We call them
“capitalist systems” but in reality any capitalist system operating today still
has various elements of the mixed economy that was the dominant model in
the Global North between 1945 and the 1970s. We have property held by
the government and cooperatives, regulation of various sorts, goods still
being delivered by the state, or whose production is paid for by the state,
and regulation on markets.

But while Western economies still are mixed economies, the
composition of the mix has changed enormously. Since the 1970s, a larger
part of the provisioning of goods has shifted from the public to the private
sector, and a lot of public property has been transferred to the private sector,
too; regulation of the private markets has weakened; while regulation and
bureaucratic control of the public and semi-public sector (such as schools,
welfare, and healthcare systems) has intensified. Some well-known
examples of this process include the privatization of the railways in many
countries; the privatization of the postal and telecom services and the sale
of state-owned banks; and the sale of social housing (previously owned by
local governments or by non-profit cooperatives) to private owners.4
Deregulation has shifted the economy’s center of gravity toward private
owners and in particular the owners of capital (wealth or businesses).

Wealth holders have profited enormously from the deregulation of the
financial sector, which has enabled them to accumulate more and more.

Even so, as the massive bailout of financial institutions after the 2008
financial crisis showed, when they fail, the government is there to pick
them up. In large part, this has been a case of socializing the risks and
privatizing the rewards.

Deregulation has, meanwhile, been decidedly disadvantageous for most
workers whose jobs were “reinvented” after their companies were
restructured, whether by private equity firms or by internal processes
focusing on cost-cutting and efficiency. Workers who previously had decent
jobs with financial security and social protections saw them recrafted into
“flexible” jobs—where the downsides of flexibility fell on the workers, and
the employers or shareholders reaped the benefits. The clearest example of
this is the emergence and growth of the platform economy, whereby
workers are required to be available to deliver food or do other work if and
when they are called upon by consumers via the platform. This is heralded
as allowing people to work as and when they want, but would more
accurately be termed a contemporary form of day labor. It might be a good
way for a young person to earn some extra cash while they are studying and
living with their parents, but it does not provide the basis for an adult to
raise a family in decent living conditions. In the meantime, the owners of
these new platforms, as well as the owners of the companies with
employees-turned-flex-workers, have become multimillionaires and
billionaires.

The changing nature of our mixed economies has led to a decrease in
public wealth in comparison with privately held wealth, and a shift of
power from the state to the private sector. It has also generated a sharp
increase in inequality, through the massive enrichment of the wealthy, and,
in many countries, an increase in poverty. Still, it is important to remember
that governments and collectives all continue to own property too. That is
the case today and has always been the case, and in that sense we will
always be somewhere on a continuum with many different types of mixed
economy. Take the national parks, so beloved by Americans and Canadians.

They belong to the federal and local governments and visits are run as a
public service. Most citizens would be horrified at the thought of selling
them to the highest bidder. Across the world, there are also many collectives
of individuals, in the form of non-profit organizations, who buy up and
restore land, in order to increase biodiversity and protect it from being
destroyed. They are creating a public good, by restoring biodiversity for all
and by opening some of these natural spaces for visitors, without relying on
the government or profit-seeking individuals.

Governments also continue to intervene in the economy in many
different ways. They fund public goods such as schools, and (in most
countries) higher education and research institutes, too. Many countries
have a minimum wage, which is nothing more than a minimum price for
one hour of labor. In the winter of 2022, when the Russian war in Ukraine
jeopardized gas and oil supplies to the rest of Europe, European countries
set a maximum price for gas and electricity.

I doubt that any economy operating today is a form of pure capitalism.

Companies and citizens alike are supported by subsidies, benefits,
regulations, and so forth. The question we should be asking is not whether
we should have capitalism or socialism. It is, rather, which specific mix of
markets, regulation, distribution, government ownership, private ownership,
and collective ownership should we have?
There are very few questions as important as the question of which
economic system we need for the future. Yet I cannot answer that question
using the arguments for limitarianism alone. Making the decision to move
toward a new economic system means choosing a new set of rules and
institutions. It is essentially a political decision. Choosing these rules and
institutions can only be done once we have determined what our collective
wants and needs will be. This raises questions that go beyond the limitarian
view, and include, for example, questions about the future of work and the
future of the financial sector. The limitarian project contributes one clear
demand to our quest for a new economic system: we must design an
economy that keeps inequality within bounds, and that uses the excess
money of the rich to meet urgent needs and address collective-action
problems. Let us not forget, either, that the limitarian project is a moral one
with a personal ethical component. Yes, we need a different economic
system, and structural changes should take precedence. But in the
meantime, as human beings who are capable of acting morally, we should
not be hoarding or wasting resources that could make a real difference to
the lives of vulnerable people and to the world.

This ethical dimension is important, because the precise form that an
economy takes changes over time and according to society’s priorities. We
don’t just need institutional design and fiscal choices; we also need to
develop a set of public values that are culturally embedded, where material
gain is not the leading incentive—where people may also choose to work
hard because of personal commitment, challenges they have set themselves,
or for intrinsic pleasure, esteem, and honor. That is perhaps the biggest task
that we need to undertake: we must rebalance our view of society, and our
view of ourselves as human beings. If we can make that shift in perspective,
limitarianism becomes very natural. So while this change in how we view
ourselves might seem fuzzy and remote from concerns about money and
wealth, it is perhaps the most profound first step toward limitarianism.

It is a cliché, but a true one nonetheless: we need each other—in order to
survive, and in order to thrive. Moreover, we are all vulnerable, in the best
case only for periods at the beginning and at the end of our lives and when
we are sick or injured, but some of us are less lucky and need support
throughout our time on Earth. It is fodder for psychologists why so many
people have such a great urge to believe that they are strong, capable of life
on their own. We are not. None of us can survive very long without other
human beings.

Accepting this fundamental vulnerability would have drastic
consequences for how we organize society. Care and community-building
would become central to our collective decision-making. That would mean
making reasoned, balanced decisions about when it is appropriate to
prioritize our own commitments, and when we must prioritize caring for
others. Does this sound like the world Elon Musk and Jeff Bezos are giving
us? I don’t think so.5
Over the last few years, there have been many proposals for a more
considerate, values-based economic system. Some have argued that we
should stick to capitalism but implement a universal basic income. Others
have proposed what they call a “property-owning democracy,” in which the
distribution of the ownership of the means of production would be widely
shared. Some believe that democratizing the workplace is essential if we
want to make our economies more humane. Still others have argued that it
is more important to correct the inequalities created by the market by
revitalizing the welfare state, such that an essential range of goods and
services is not provided via the market but by the government. Some
proposals focus directly on the value created by firms, and the role that
governments (should) play in the regulation of firms and corporations.

Austrian economist Christian Felber has proposed “the economy of the
common good,” which rejects the notion that satisfying people’s cravings
and enabling the accumulation of material comforts are the goals of the
economy, and posits instead that we should be concerned with fulfilling
needs, for both present and future generations, and taking ecological
considerations into account.6
Still other proposals for a new economic system argue that we should
start by replacing our obsession with GDP growth with an ambition for
sustainable prosperity, sometimes known as “degrowth.” One of the most
well known is the “doughnut economy” proposed by English economist
Kate Raworth, whereby a ring doughnut is a metaphor for the space
between the “social foundation”—where all basic human needs are met—
and the “ecological ceiling,” where our activities must stay within planetary
boundaries. Raworth argues that moving to a doughnut economy would
require us to reduce inequality and pay more attention to the non-market
economy (which puts household production and care center stage). Another
proposal in this area is the “well-being economy,” which is a group of
proposals from different thinkers and policy makers, brought together by
the Wellbeing Economy Alliance. A well-being economy is an economic
system in which current and future human well-being (rather than GDP) is
the cornerstone of government policy. Wales, Scotland, and New Zealand
have signed up to the well-being economy framework, and are currently
developing the policy guidelines to work out and implement these ideas.7
This long (yet still very incomplete) list of proposals for alternative
economic systems is, in my view, extremely encouraging, as it shows that
many people—from politicians and scholars to ordinary people—are
working to move us in the direction of a better economy. Yet the list also
makes it clear that there are many different alternatives that could be
endorsed by limitarians. Evaluating these proposals in their entirety is
impossible to do here. But what I can and should do is to ask the question:
what would limitarianism imply in practice? What is needed to make
limitarianism a reality? What changes are needed to create a world in which
no one is super-rich?
Before answering that question, three points need to be stressed. The first
is to remind ourselves that limitarianism is a regulative ideal—something to
strive for but which will be very difficult to definitively achieve—and thus
will involve us taking a lot of different steps as we move forward. We will
find ourselves having to agree to compromises in the short term, without
giving up on moving closer to the ideal in the long run. We will need to
rally together to make these changes happen. And this will always mean
building coalitions with those who might not go as far as we would wish
toward the ideal, but who nevertheless could help us to get closer to it. It is
important to note, of course, when endorsing such a pragmatic strategy that
we should not stop pursuing our ultimate goals after an initial win. Suppose
tax havens were to be closed. That would be a huge victory—reason enough
to throw a party! And while it should be celebrated, limitarians shouldn’t
rest on their laurels but continue fighting for the other changes that are
needed to attain the goal of a world without extreme wealth.

The second point is that there is no silver-bullet solution for abolishing
extreme wealth (or, indeed, abolishing poverty and disadvantage). For most
people advocating for less inequality, this is obvious, and most activists and
organizations recommend a range of policy proposals. Yet those who
oppose limitarianism, or who oppose any kind of progress toward equality,
will caricature this point of view by simplistically reducing it to a single
proposal, such as a 100 percent highest marginal tax rate on income, to be
implemented in full tomorrow. This is silly, and should be seen as no more
than a (rather poor) attempt to discredit limitarians. Rather, we need a
patchwork of measures, none of which will be perfect on its own, but
which, taken together, will help us reach our goal.

The third point is that, ultimately, the public must decide what needs to
be done. There is not one single person who can claim to know exactly
what is needed. So we must now have a major public debate on whether we
should endorse limitarianism, and if so, how it could be implemented. My
role here is not to come up with the answer but rather to lay out a number of
general principles that I hope can inform this debate, and lead to further
ideas, undoubtedly better ones. Together we know more. So, with all this in
mind: what changes would limitarianism require in order to be put into
practice?8
The first and perhaps most important action limitarianism requires is one
that we’ve already touched on: to dismantle neoliberal ideology, because it
is at the heart of the problems we are facing. This ideology has changed the
way we look at ourselves, how we regard society, which norms and values
we take to be important, the politicians we vote for, the way companies
operate, and the structure of our basic societal institutions. In other words,
over the last century neoliberalism has gradually taken material form,
evolving into the neoliberal societies that we inhabit today. Limitarianism
and neoliberalism are fundamentally at odds. As long as neoliberalism is
our dominant ideology, fighting its consequences will be insufficient. We
must therefore attack the root cause and replace neoliberalism with
something more humane, something based on a range of values that
recognizes fundamental human rights as non-negotiable and makes fairness
pivotal, rather than an ideology focused only on a narrow concept of
economic efficiency.

Neoliberalism propagates the view that we should implement
“technocratic” solutions to problems, rather than solutions that emerge from
democratic deliberation. For every problem there is a technocratic solution
that it considers beyond democratic debate. Neoliberalism’s view on human
nature has made us see ourselves as investors in our “human capital,” or as
consumers, or as workers offering our services on the labor market—but not
as activists, organizers, debaters, engaged as neighbors or members of
political book clubs, and so on. So we need to find a different way of
looking at ourselves, at other people, other sentient beings, the Earth, and
all the practices we engage in. This requires us to be more engaged as
participants in communal practices, as those who shape democratic
processes, as political animals. We need to reclaim politics, and we need to
reclaim democracy.

We have seen that neoliberal ideology did not just fall out of the sky. It
was the result of a concerted effort by intellectuals, businesspeople, and
politicians to make us believe that governments are incompetent and
corrupt, that public sector workers are self-serving, and that free markets
are absolutely superior to anything else. These efforts have changed the
mainstream media narrative, what children learn at school and in society,
and the professional discourse that businesspeople and public servants use.

Concrete social and economic reforms have changed our world into one
where competition and greed rule. Neoliberalism has manifested itself in
different ways across different countries, but everywhere it is real people
who have chosen to implement and strengthen this ideology.


The good news: this means that we can also change it. We need people to
advance alternatives to neoliberalism—to its values and norms, to the way
it has shaped our thinking and our self-understanding, to our policies and
the design of our institutions. We need changes at all these different levels
—in the stories we tell ourselves, in the culture of schools, businesses, and
organizations, in the way we cooperate in society and internationally.

We cannot do any of this without first coming to understand what the
neoliberal system is doing to us all. Until now, the critique of neoliberalism
has been developed at the margins, among people with heightened political
and economic awareness. We must share this critique with everyone. We
can do this through politics, through education, and through the arts—this is
precisely the aim of films such as Ken Loach’s I, Daniel Blake or Abigail
Disney and Kathleen Hughes’s The American Dream and Other Fairy Tales
or Ruben Östlund’s biting satire on the super-rich, Triangle of Sadness,
from 2022.

Once the workings of neoliberalism are laid bare, it will be obvious that
there must be winners and losers under this model. And thus, it will also
become much easier to show why we need to change it, and why some
alternatives are far preferable.

The second thing limitarianism requires is that we reduce class
segregation. We must do so because it will directly help to restore and
nurture democracy, in particular democratic citizenship. Class integration
creates a culture of empathy for people from different walks of life and
generates more opportunities for cross-class friendship. It is easy to vote for
a neoliberal government that will impose austerity measures on the most
vulnerable if you don’t know any poor or vulnerable people, and believe
that they are poor because they are lazy, or that they have somehow blown
the opportunities that society may have given them. Right now, too many
middle-class and rich people, not to mention the super-rich, simply know
nothing of the lives of the working class, and this has serious consequences
for the economic and political decisions that they make. Creating more
understanding among the rich for the realities faced by those in the working
class would almost certainly help us to abolish the institutions and policies
that have done so much to increase inequality, such as the dismantling of
social housing, or the labyrinthine systems of control and humiliation that
have been imposed upon those who need state support. This isn’t just
because it would clarify the role of luck in determining who is rich and who
is poor: reducing class segregation would also illuminate just how bad
inequalities are. Right now, the political demand to limit inequality is not
very strong, but this would change if we saw the problem at first hand. It is
absolutely no coincidence that Chuck Feeney and Yvon Chouinard opted for
modest lifestyles and ultimately to give away their fortunes, given their own
working-class backgrounds. Having experience of what it means to be poor
does matter.

Should it be left to individuals to reduce class segregation? After all,
anyone can join a club or sports team that is socially mixed. You might
think that there is nothing that the government needs to do; that it is up to us
to make choices that will widen our social circles. Alas, relying on
voluntary action will not do the trick. If class desegregation is made
voluntary, then we can expect that many very rich and privileged people
will not join in. They will remain firmly shielded in their bubble, in their
parallel society. Many wealthy people are “upward looking” in the sense
that they look to those who are even richer as their benchmark. Research
predicts that this group will resist attempts to desegregate: as we’ve seen,
limiting their social circles to similarly well-situated people is one of their
strategies for avoiding feeling bad about their wealth. They simply don’t
want to be confronted with the gap between themselves and the less welloff.10
We need to make structural changes so that class interactions happen
more naturally. We need public policy in areas such as housing and
education that will foster social integration. For example, governments
should be building neighborhoods with mixed types of housing (owned and
rented, commercial and social). When governments need to decide about
the future purpose of public spaces that are no longer used, such as old
public buildings or open areas, they should not just sell them to the highest
bidder, but rather think about the importance of having enough contact
between all citizens.

We also should take very seriously the idea of a national civil service
requirement for all. Debra Satz, a professor of philosophy at Stanford
University, has recently defended a proposal to establish a mandatory year
of national public service for all US citizens between the ages of eighteen
and twenty-five, with an exemption for those doing military service or with
underlying conditions that make it impossible. The participants would
maintain public land, work with the elderly or in education, or on other
kinds of public projects. Satz argues that democratic citizenship not only
requires citizens to have the right to vote and the duty to pay taxes and obey
the law, but also the willingness to comply with democratic processes. Yet
that willingness requires public-mindedness, which has weakened
considerably over recent decades. Because there are very few compulsory
collective activities where all socio-economic groups mix, different groups
in society increasingly lack a basic understanding of each other. Jury duty is
one such institution (and in the US it is the only example), but most will
never be asked to serve on a jury, and the experience is time-limited and
might only come later in life. A universal service requirement would go a
long way toward addressing today’s partitioning between social groups.11
The third action limitarianism requires is for us to establish a balance of
economic power. It is interesting to observe that, when it comes to political
power, liberal democracies embed the notion that some core civic rights are
beyond the realm of governance, as well as the idea that it is important to
have a separation of political powers—that the three principal branches of
the state (the executive, legislature and judiciary) should be clearly divided.

This is necessary to prevent power abuse, safeguarding citizens’ liberties
and protecting us from tyranny. We all agree that we need a system of
checks and balances; if we delegate political power to one institution, then
we need countervailing power in others.

Why then, don’t we have such a balance of economic power? That
economics is a domain of power was first recognized by thinkers centuries
ago. Adam Smith pointed out in The Wealth of Nations, published in 1776,
that there was a great power imbalance between the owner of the pinmaking workshop and his workers. If the workers felt that the wage they
were getting for their work was too low, they could in theory refuse to do
the work. Yet they had mouths to feed and no savings, so, in essence, they
had no choice, or bargaining power: they had to simply accept the paltry
wage that the workshop owner was offering. The owner was not subject to
the same time pressure, and hence he was much more powerful, and could
abuse the vulnerability of the poor.


Contemporary political philosophers would describe such a situation as
one of domination or exploitation, as the workers didn’t have any other
reasonable options. That’s why labor unions were invented: to resist the
domination of workers. This is also why union-busting, which is currently
occurring in the US, is such a blow to workers, as it makes them much more
vulnerable to exploitation.13
The late British economist Anthony Atkinson, who dedicated his entire,
very distinguished career to questions of poverty, inequality, and public
policy, made an agenda of fifteen proposals and five ideas for improving the
social contract in his 2015 book, Inequality: What Can Be Done? His
second proposal focuses on the importance of bolstering countervailing
economic power. This would entail giving workers some decision-making
power within firms; protecting the trade unions; and, finally, setting up a
“Social and Economic Council” involving “social partners and other
nongovernmental bodies” to discuss these matters at the policy level. Such
countervailing power would restrict inequality at the bottom, by improving
and protecting wages and working conditions, but also at the top, by
restricting exorbitant levels of CEO compensation.

If we want to restore the balance of economic power today, there are
clear strategies that we should pursue. One, as Atkinson points out, is to
protect and strengthen unions, and criminalize union-busting activities.

Another is to educate workers about the importance of collective
organizing. Some scholars and activists have proposed that work should be
democratized, either in a modest way by more widely adopting the German
codetermination system in companies, where half of the seats on company
boards are taken by employers and the other half by employees, or else
more radically by implementing workplace democracy, whereby companies
are run on a democratic basis by all who work there.14
Work is not the only economic domain in which there are large power
inequalities, though; there are also important questions about the balance
between, for example, shareholders and the interests of society at large, as
we saw in Chapter 5. There is thus a question about what wider package of
measures would be required to avoid a concentration of economic power.

Such power concentration—which we see in companies, in entire
industries, in financial institutions—is what has led to such extreme wealth
concentration, with multimillion CEO compensation packages and
shareholder primacy taking precedence over the interests of workers,
consumers, and the environment.

Limitarianism also demands that we restore the government’s fiscal
agency. A country’s tax system is the heart of its social contract. How much
tax should be paid, and what benefits residents are entitled to, are essential
aspects of the division of benefits and burdens in a society. Without a wellfunctioning fiscal system, economic justice is jeopardized. Whether people
want to strive for limitarianism, or for progressive taxation, or for any other
form of taxation scheme, they cannot do so if others can simply avoid or
evade taxes. It is therefore essential that we restore the ability of the state to
raise the taxes that the citizens decide should be raised, and to clamp down
on tax avoidance and evasion.

During the neoliberal era, the state’s fiscal power has weakened
dramatically. The number of tax loopholes has multiplied. The state
departments charged with checking tax returns and other fiscal business are
understaffed and underfunded. Fiscal paradises are thriving. The
international capacity to combat cross-border tax fraud is weak.

As long as this is the case, the state’s abilities for increasing the highest
tax rates, especially on wealth and capital income, are too weak. Even with
our lax tax arrangements today, which in most countries favor business
owners and the rich, we still witness massive tax avoidance and evasion.

Increasing the taxes on profit and investment revenues, or increasing the
highest marginal taxes on overall income, might well make this worse. I
don’t think it’s sensible to count on a sense of civic responsibility inspiring
the richest to pay their taxes according to the spirit of the law, rather than on
the basis of the most self-serving legal interpretation. Past experience has
not given us any reason to do so. Neoliberal culture has made endemic the
view that it is foolish to pay more tax than you can get away with paying.

Is it possible to restore a country’s fiscal agency? As long as we have
international tax competition and the corresponding capital flight—that is,
the wealthy moving their money to the countries where it will be taxed the
least—individual states will be limited to making their own fiscal choices.

But capital mobility is not like gravity: it can be regulated, if governments
are willing to cooperate with each other. Peter Dietsch, a German-Canadian
economist and political philosopher, has developed a detailed analysis of
how to address this problem. The idea at its heart is simple: governments
should agree to tax people in the country where they live—where they
benefit from the state infrastructure. Additionally, tax policies that are
unjust and strategically motivated should be forbidden—there should, in
other words, be no tax havens; no places with a zero percent tax rate like
Bermuda’s. An international tax organization should be established to
monitor compliance and settle disputes. These measures would minimize
profit-shifting and capital flight, yet would still allow each country to
decide on their own fiscal policies. This is just one proposal of many:
political scientists, economists, and philosophers have developed schemes
for restoring a country’s fiscal agency and stopping the international fiscal
race to the bottom. It’s up to us to ensure such policies are implemented.15
The fifth change that limitarianism requires is the confiscation of dirty
money and the payment of reparations for past harms. The confiscation of
criminal money shouldn’t provoke much resistance. Yet I have argued that
there are many shades of grey where it concerns how dirty some fortunes
are. And several of the examples we’ve come across have also indicated
that liberal democracies often tolerate a lot of kleptocratic activity.

There is a clear relationship between this and the previous point—of
restoring a country’s fiscal agency. That goal requires the closure of tax
havens. It cannot be overstated how important this is. Perhaps journalists
should ask all candidates running for political office two basic questions: do
you have, or have you ever had, wealth (in any form) in a tax haven? And
what would be your policy regarding tax havens if you were to assume
office?
The payment of reparations for past harms will be much less likely to
command broad consensus than clamping down on tax avoidance and
evasion. It is already being resisted in many countries where the population
has benefited from economic activities that have harmed the human rights
of others. We are often unwilling to look at these matters in a calm, rational
way. The multimillionaire class is not any different. But there are also
reasons to be cautiously optimistic. As we saw in Chapter 3, there are
several recent examples of families, firms, universities, and even
governments choosing to investigate their historical relationship with
slavery and embark on restorative-justice projects. Change may be slow, but
those who set an example make it much harder for others to keep looking
away.

Limitarianism calls for an even wider form of economic justice, too: we
should make the international economic architecture fair. There is no point
in scattering a few crumbs in development aid if we do not also ask
questions of fairness at the level of international trade. We don’t just need a
reasonable balance of economic power in each country; we need this
balance to apply to the global economy and to international trade relations.

In 2022 a citizens’ initiative was launched in the European Union to ask for
legislation that forces fashion companies to pay their own workers, and
those in their global supply chain, fairly. As the campaigners write, if
garment workers were paid a living wage (that is, a wage that allows each
worker to lead a decent life), the final cost of a piece of clothing would
increase by a mere 1 percent—a price increase that could, of course, equally
be taken from the vast profits enjoyed by the billionaire owners of fashion
multinationals. The very low wages of the working poor and the wealth
hoarding of billionaires are intimately connected. A significant increase in
human welfare is possible if the shareholders or owners of a company
contented themselves with moderate, rather than limitless, profits.16
Which brings us to another of the key actions that limitarianism requires:
to limit executive pay. As one longtime business leader told me, there has
been an upward spiral in executive salaries because the norms around
compensation have changed, and corporate culture with them. In the past,
my interviewee said, you would feel ashamed if you earned a hundred or a
thousand times more than the lowest-paid person in your company. Now,
that shame is gone.

Many experts have recommended limiting pay inequality not just by
raising the bottom level of pay but also by lowering the top. We should not
just ensure that we have a decent mandatory minimum wage; we should
also have a maximum wage. This could be achieved either by introducing
legislation or by companies taking the initiative themselves. We can also
change social norms concerning executive pay. As the political theorist
Fergus Green has shown, moral norms have evolved globally to censure and
thus change practices that were once widespread, such as slavery, and they
are currently beginning to encompass fossil fuel–related activities. They
could evolve to include extreme salaries, too. What it requires is that
influential people lead by example (and don’t give up): we need celebrity
CEOs to limit their payouts and talk about their reasons for doing so; we
need social movements to keep arguing against excessive compensation;
and we need prominent journalists, writers, and moral leaders to keep
calling for a limit on top earnings.17
Perhaps this process has already begun. In his 2018 book, The Case for a
Maximum Wage, labor reporter Sam Pizzigati lists a whole range of people
—journalists, activists, academics, and politicians—who have all called for
a cap. In Switzerland—where referenda are a widely used instrument in
democratic decision-making—citizens voted in 2013 on a limit to the wage
ratio. The proposal was that executives could not make more in a month
than the company’s lowest-paid worker makes in a year, thus limiting the
wage ratio to 12:1. A poll released prior to the referendum indicated 44
percent support for the proposal. This was followed by a huge advertising
campaign against the proposal, funded by businesses. On election day, the
proposal gained 34 percent of the vote and therefore lost, but something
very important was won: a discussion about reasons to consider limiting
pay.


While a maximum wage would avoid turning business executives into
multimillionaires, it doesn’t help us to limit income from capital. This is
sorely needed, since generally income from labor is taxed at a higher rate
than income from capital (profits, dividends). There are some positive
developments on this front. As of 2023, 136 countries who together hold
more than 90 percent of the world economy have agreed to impose a 15
percent minimum corporate tax rate. This proposal isn’t perfect: one issue is
that it applies only to corporations with a turnover of at least $750 million,
and hence does not apply to about 85 percent of multinational businesses.

Clearly, it does not solve everything, but it is certainly a step in the right
direction.19
At the national level, it seems a no-brainer that fairness requires that
income from labor should not be subject to higher tax rates than income
from capital. Yet this is precisely what happens in many countries. In the
Netherlands, the last major tax overhaul in 2001 saw the same tax rates
applied to both income from labor and from capital, but over the years a
series of smaller changes, including several exceptions provided to income
from capital, have led to a tax rate on income from labor that was 11
percent higher than the tax rate on income from capital. This is not only
unjustified in itself, but also turns the Dutch tax system into a regressive
one, since capital is concentrated at the top of the wealth distribution. This
information only became public in 2022, after the government
commissioned a study to which all relevant agencies and parties contributed
and the best available data was analyzed. Countries that do not have this
information would be wise to conduct a similar report of their own. They,
too, might discover that even in a country that has an egalitarian reputation,
the fiscal system favors capital over labor.


In addition to re-examining the difference between the tax rates on
income from labor versus income from capital, there should also be a re-
examination of tax rates overall. In the 1960s and 1970s, tax rates in the
OECD countries were much more progressive, with top marginal tax rates
between 60 and 80 percent not being exceptional. These rates have
plummeted: in many countries the highest marginal tax rate on income is
now well below 50 percent.21
The final policy change that I believe limitarianism requires is perhaps
the most urgent of all: to halt the intergenerational transmission of wealth.

That is, to radically cap lifetime inheritances and gifts. Some philosophers
have argued that the right to bequeath should be fully abolished: once you
die, all your wealth should be put back into the society from which it
originated. Several scholars, including the political philosopher Stuart
White and the economists Anthony Atkinson and Thomas Piketty, have
made the case for drastically raising inheritance tax; they also argue for a
stake for young adults that would be funded from a variety of sources,
including a wealth tax and inheritance tax. Recall that in Chapter 3 we saw
that properly taxing the rich in the US would allow a savings account to be
opened in each child’s name with $6,350 deposited in it each year until they
turn eighteen.22
I would suggest a variant on these proposals, which takes into account
the moral considerations that apply to the inheritor (who doesn’t, morally
speaking, deserve any inheritance at all) and the freedom of the donor
(whose preference to save and bequeath, rather than to consume, should
also carry moral weight). The idea would be to impose a cap on how much
a person could receive in terms of inheritances and gifts over their lifetime,
and then to return all of the collected tax revenues to the citizens of that
country.


The state could collect this inheritance money and just add it to their
coffers, using it to fund roads or schools or for other public expenditure.

But there is another, much better alternative. The money could be
redistributed to all young citizens, so that everyone receives a slice of the
wealth of previous generations.

There are three major reasons for doing this. First, having a modest
amount of wealth has important beneficial effects for the owner, as
defenders of a citizens’ stake have argued at length.24 This is not just the
case in communities that are extremely poor, as we saw in Otjivero. In
richer countries, too, it allows young people to start up a business, to go to
university, or to give their own children a good start in life. A relatively
small amount of money can give everybody some degree of security. It
takes away worries and stress. Why would we grant this only to those who
happen to be born to rich parents?
The second reason is that redistributing inheritance tax revenues to
younger citizens will address the huge inequality between the old and the
young today; many scholars are worried that the young are being badly
short-changed. Often, inheritances are given by those who die in their
eighties to their children who are in their fifties. These heirs have a
considerable advantage before they actually receive the inheritance: for
example, they can take out student loans or mortgages with the knowledge
that some money will eventually come their way. And they are likely to
have already received significant gifts from their parents earlier on in life.

By redistributing the tax revenue from inheritances to those in their midtwenties, much more good will be done for the prosperity of the entire
population. Every young person will be able to start their adult life without
worrying unduly about how they will get by.


The third reason to choose to redistribute the money in this way is the
fact that there is very deep resistance to inheritance tax: it has often been
called the most despised of all taxes. That is not surprising, because it is
surely the most emotionally charged. It comes right at the point when
people are mourning their loss. Their loved one has been taken from them,
and now the state wants to take their money? But while such feelings are
understandable, the widespread opposition is irrational. After all, most
people inherit next to nothing. It is only the wealthy and the super-rich that
inherit very large amounts. If we were to fully redistribute all the revenue
from inheritance tax, it would very quickly become obvious that the vast
majority of the population had only something to gain by it.26
This proposal raises an obvious question: at what level should the
inheritance cap be set? It should not be higher than what, in a just society,
you could save by living frugally, aiming to save for future generations.

Needless to say, it is notoriously difficult to put a number on this, since
people have such different lifestyles. One possibility would be to base this
calculation on an “average” person taken from the middle of the middle
class: two-thirds of the population would have an income that was lower
than this person’s, and one-third would have an income that was higher.

Economists and sociologists can certainly make an estimate of what
difference it would make for such a person to live frugally compared with
being more spendthrift. Suppose that difference is estimated to be $400,000
for a two-adult household with two children, over their lifetime. Then each
person could inherit, or receive as gifts, $200,000 in their lives, and the rest
would go to the tax collector, and thus provide for all. But other
benchmarks are possible, such as the median market value of a house in a
country. As with the political limit on wealth as a whole, this is ultimately a
question for the people to debate and decide on together: we might rely on
citizens’ panels to discuss these questions, and develop concrete proposals
for lawmakers.

This raft of proposals should get us a long way toward making our
economies and our societies limitarian. Obviously, much more than this is
needed to tackle some of the world’s most pressing issues. For example, ask
any expert what needs to be done to address climate change or the
biodiversity crisis and they will suggest many measures not discussed here.

The same can be said about the housing crisis, or the mental-health crisis, or
the ongoing tragedy that billions of people live in poverty worldwide. The
actions listed above will not magically solve all our problems. But they will
help.

In the end, the most important change is to abandon the mantras that
“greed is good” and “the sky is the limit.” They are wreaking so much
havoc. That we have come to believe and enact them is shameful and, as we
have seen, destructive.

Some readers might wonder what they should do next. In the many
dozens of public talks I’ve given on limitarianism, there has often been
someone in the audience who despairs, wondering how we are going to
make all these urgent changes. It can feel overwhelming to consider how
many problems need to be fixed.

But here’s the good news. Those who will gain from a new limitarian
economic system vastly outnumber those who will lose from the transition.

Once we recognize this and commit ourselves to changing the status quo,
we simply have to divide up the work—and suddenly, what looks
overwhelming in the aggregate becomes much more manageable. We can
each pick an action point that interests us most, and devote ourselves to it.

We all have different skills, interests, and social networks, and for each of
us there are different ways in which we can contribute to making society
more humane. And what we will discover, as we work toward that better
world, is how much energy and joy collective action generates, and how
many lasting friendships emerge from it.

There is huge untapped potential in the actions of the 99 percent. The
promise of a better future lies with us.

Acknowledgments
For a long time, bookshops have been to me what candy stores are to
toddlers. I love the enormous riches of all those stories, arguments, and
pockets of knowledge. I love to look at all the different covers and admire
the creativity of their designers. I love to talk to the shop-owners when I
need a recommendation or two. This feeling hasn’t ever changed: I still love
browsing in bookstores; inhaling air filled with words and sentences. But
having now written a few books of my own, I increasingly find myself
looking at the shelves and thinking of the enormous efforts that have gone
into making all those books. The bouts of despair and sleepless nights of
their writers! And while there is generally only one person’s name on the
cover, all books are the result of the efforts of many people. The same is
true of this one: many people have contributed to making this book
possible, and I would like to close it by thanking them.

I started to develop my research on the political philosophy of wealth
concentration and the idea of limitarianism sometime in early 2012. I thank
the universities and academic associations where I presented the first results
of that research, in particular as an invited keynote speaker at the
conference of the Society for Applied Philosophy (Oxford, July 2012) and
the NOMOS conference on Wealth (Washington, August 2014). I had
particularly interesting discussions with those who attended talks organized
by the McCoy Family Center for Ethics in Society at Stanford University in
February 2014, and the Victoria colloquium on political, social, and legal
theory at the University of Victoria in March 2014. I thank Debra Satz and
Colin MacLeod for the invitations, for great conversations, and for their
encouragement to dig deeper. Many talks at other places (in person or
online) would follow, and I thank all my local and international colleagues
for their interest in limitarianism, and for offering me opportunities to try
out arguments and ideas. I especially want to mention Kalle Grill and JanWillem van der Rijt from the philosophy department at Umeå University,
where I gave the 2019 Burman Lectures on limitarianism. In 2017, the
European Research Council awarded me a Consolidator Grant (#726153)
which allowed me to put together the Fair Limits team that would analyze
whether we need an upper limit to wealth and its relationship to ecological
resources. I thank the members of the Fair Limits team for co-creating a
setting that allowed me to learn a lot as well as pursue this agenda: Fergus
Green, Colin Hickey, Tim Meijers, Bart Mijland, Petra van der Kooij, Dick
Timmers, as well as a larger group of colleagues and students who joined
our meetings and writing. Yet the arguments in this book go far beyond the
scholarship that I did before and during the Fair Limits project, and I am
grateful to the FLAX foundation who gave me an Emma Goldman Award in
2021, which has supported me to continue working on this book.

I tried out some first ideas for writing a trade book on limitarianism at
the June 2018 meeting of the Economic Ethics Network, an informal
gathering of political philosophers working on economic questions that has
been meeting annually for ten years now. After George Monbiot wrote an
op-ed in the Guardian in September 2019 endorsing limitarianism on
grounds of climate justice, his editor at Penguin, Chloe Currens, reached
out to me to ask whether I had any interest in writing a book. And so the
vague plan took wing. Alas, as I unexpectedly had to serve as interim
director of my institute, writing it had to be put on hold, until time would
allow me to do so. Nevertheless, the encouragement of George Monbiot and
Chloe Currens at that early stage made it clear that this book had to be
written, and I thank them for playing this pivotal role.

I have tried out several ideas, including strategies for bridging the gap
between academia and the public, at the group blog Crooked Timber. This
blog, where I have had the privilege of being a contributor for the last
eighteen years, has been a great source of debate, and I thank my fellow
bloggers for co-creating this fully independent space, entirely free of
external interference and influence. Many thanks, also, to our remarkably
smart and good-spirited (pseudonymous) commentators—I don’t know who
you are, folks, but that doesn’t make me any less appreciative for your
willingness to discuss limitarianism (and many other topics) over the years.

I have also learned a lot from people who have attended talks, debates, and
most recently an interactive theatre performance on the subject, as well as
from conversations on social media and discussions with the journalists and
podcasters who have interviewed me over the last ten years. Many of them
have asked questions that got me thinking on yet another aspect of this
topic, and as such have unwittingly contributed to this book.

In May 2022, Chapter 5 was discussed at a workshop at the Leibniz
University in Hannover, and I thank the participants for a fruitful
discussion, in particular Simon Caney, Lisa Herzog, Mathias Frisch, and
Andrew Crabtree. In July 2022, the same chapter was discussed at the
Montreal Political Theory workshop, and I thank all the participants,
especially Alexandre Gajevic Sayegh, Colin Macleod, Pablo Gilabert,
Daniel Weinstock, and Sylvie Loriaux for their comments. In December
2022, a group of colleagues came together in Utrecht to discuss a draft
manuscript of this book. Not only did that work as a very effective carrot
(or stick?) for me to get things done, but it also helped me to see which
parts of the manuscript required most development. Thanks to Yara Al
Salman, Constanze Binder, Huub Brouwer, Rutger Claassen, Josette
Daemen, Willem van der Deijl, Liesbeth Feikema, Dorothea Gädeke, Colin
Hickey, Maurits de Jongh, Jos Philips, Hanno Sauer, Naomi van
Steenbergen, Dick Timmer, and to my Dutch publisher Haye Koningsveld
for that memorable day, and in particular to Naomi, Jos, Huub, Dick, Colin,
and Josette for also sending written comments. Others read parts or the
entire manuscript at various stages of the writing process, and I want to
mention in particular the very useful comments I received from Tania
Burchardt, Chris Neuhäuser, John Quiggin, and, especially, Tom Malleson.

Many friends, colleagues, and even strangers sent me links to research
findings, interesting interviews, new books on the topic, or the latest
wealth-related societal issue while I was writing this book. Others have
responded to specific queries I had. Since I didn’t keep track I will no doubt
forget to name some, but despite this list being incomplete, let me thank
Joel Anderson, Christoph Baumgartner, Constanze Binder, Huub Brouwer,
Annelien De Dijn, Peter Dietsch, Jonas Franzen, Dorothea Gädeke,
Rebecca Gowland, Eelke Heemskerk, Colin Hickey, Annemarie Korte,
Matthias Kramm, Chris Neuhäuser, Enrica Chiappero-Martinetti, Tim
Meijers, Jennifer Olmsted, Sam Pizzigati, Roland Pierik, and Dick Timmer.

I also am grateful for the conversations about economic inequalities and
wealth concentration that I have had over many years with sociologists,
political scientists, economists, historians, and philosophers. While the
number of people from whom I have learned is much longer than I can give
here, I want to thank in particular David Axelsen, Bas van Bavel, Tania
Burchardt, Vincent Buskens, Rutger Claassen, Enrica Chiappero Martinetti,
Abigail Davis, Ian Gough, Tammy Harel Ben Sahar, Katharina Hecht, Lisa
Herzog, Elena Icardi, Chris Neuhäuser, Lasse Nielsen, Amartya Sen, Rachel
Sherman, Liam Shields, Zosia Stemplowska, Simon Toussaint, Tanja van
der Lippe, Martin van Hees, Bruno Verbeek, Alex Volacu, Lea Ypi, and the
members of the Fair Limits team.

In refining my ideas and “testing” my arguments, I was lucky to be able
to talk to and learn from people who stand much closer to the world of the
super-rich than I do. Most of them had never met me before we spoke, and I
thank them for trusting me and being so frank about their views and
experiences, and in a number of cases for agreeing to be quoted in the book:
Abigail Disney, Rebecca Gowland, Morris Pearl, Judi Powell, Elisa Van
Waeyenberge, Jake Hayman, Yahya Alazrak, Marlene Engelhorn, and
several others, who have chosen to stay anonymous. I also thank those who
are cited by name for approving the quotes in this book, as well as Ina
Conradi and Dirk and Claudia Haarmann for checking my memory of our
encounter in Otjivero.

Special thanks also to the people who kept me going at a time when the
task of writing this book seemed overwhelming or when the lures of
procrastination were very strong, in particular my husband, Roland, and our
children, and my sister Charlot, who lent me her house so that I could, free
from distraction, finish another set of revisions. Thanks also to Dominic
Roser, who offered to team up as writing buddies in the fall of 2022.

Finally, I thank the wonderful teams at Penguin and Astra House for
their hard work on this book. In particular, Chloe Currens, my editor at
Penguin, and Alessandra Bastagli at Astra House, who commented on all
aspects of the book—from structure to the choice of examples—and who
helped me to translate academic ideas and findings for a broad audience. I
also thank the team at United Agents, especially my agent Sophie Scard,
who helped me navigate the world of trade publishing.

I have dedicated this book to all activists who are fighting against injustice.

I use “activists” here in a broad sense, referring not only to those who are
on the barricades, but also to those writing pieces for newspapers, setting up
organizations, and trying in other ways to mobilize people and power for
the good. There are parts of academia, politics and even the population at
large that don’t fully appreciate the work that activists do, or, worse, look
down on them. Although this book is not about activism or activists, I trust
that its arguments have made clear how mistaken such a position is. While
there are some activists pursuing misguided goals or using inappropriate
means, there are many, many more who are, against the odds and often at
great personal cost, fighting for a better world. They are pivotal in changing
all of our lives for the better. To all those brave people: this is for you.


About the Author
Ingrid Robeyns currently holds the chair in ethics of institutions at Utrecht
University. In 2018, she was elected as a member of the Netherlands Royal
Academy of Sciences and Arts and in 2021, she was awarded an Emma
Goldman Award for her work on inequality studies and feminism by the
FLAX foundation in Vienna. She lives in Utrecht, Netherlands.

